CHAPTER 19
Progressive Movements, Progressive Politics, 1879—1917
The Revolt of the Intellectuals The Transformation of Cities Religious Responses to the Gilded Age Progressive Politics on the National Stage
Conflict in the West
Buffalo Bill's Wild West Show created the image of the American West for many people, which was more fantasy than reality.
CHAPTER OBJECTIVE
Demonstrate an understanding of the post-Civil War changes in the American West
THE TRIBES OF THE WEST AND THE U.S. GOVERNMENT
16.1
Explain western development from an Indian perspective and the way Indian and white cultures shaped each other.
THE IMPACT OF THE TRANSCONTINENTAL RAILROAD,
1869 16.2
Analyze the building of transcontinental railroads and its impact on the nation, especially the West.
THE TRANSFORMATION OF THE WEST
16.3
Analyze how indigenous people, ranchers, farmers, miners, outlaws, politicians, and mythmakers shaped the West and our understanding of its history.
In the midst of the Civil War, Abraham Lincoln worried about the potential for alliances between the Confederate States and some western Indian tribes. He met with 14 western chiefs at the White House in March 1863. He did not offer much but urged them to adopt the “peaceful ways of the white people.” Chief Lean Bear of the Cheyenne reminded the president that whites were responsible for most of the violence in the West. He did not mention the irony of Lincolns statement coming in the midst of the bloodiest war in American history.
Subsequent presidents had similar, usually unproductive, meetings.
President Grant tried hard to implement what came to be known as the Grant Peace Policy, but, though well intentioned, that policy ultimately depended on the U.S. Army to settle matters in the West, and the army in the field was often anything but peaceful. While the most intense interaction between white settlers and Indian tribes east of the Mississippi River lasted for over 200 years, the major battles between the western tribes and the U.S. Army lasted for less than 30 years. What began as a series of bloody skirmishes during the Civil War erupted into the Great Plains Wars in the 1870s and 1880s. By the 1890s, the armed conflict was all over as tribes were defeated and moved into ever shrinking reservations.
At the same time, white ranchers, farmers, and miners built new settlements across the West. What began as great cattle ranches were replaced within 30 years by smaller-scale farms producing beef and wheat for national and world markets. These agricultural developments of the
post-Civil War era depended on new technologies—most of all the development of railroads that brought supplies to isolated farmers and shipped their products—and on new economic and political arrangements. This chapter examines the growth and changing nature of the American West between 1865 and 1890.
16.1
Significant Dates
THE TRIBES OF THE WEST AND THE U.S. GOVERNMENT
Explain western development from an Indian perspective and the way Indian and white cultures shaped each other.
Native Americans fought on both sides in the Civil War and sometimes used the country’s division to expand their territory, forcing both North and South to divert troops from other battles. The Civil War also changed the lives of American Indians. For most whites, however, Indian matters existed only on the margin of their attention during the war. Once the Civil War ended, white relationships with Indian tribes, especially on the Great Plains, took on greater significance. As many Americans, whites and some blacks, began to look for more land in the aftermath of the war, they ran directly into newly empowered Indian tribes.
The Comanche Empire
For the Comanches, arguably the most powerful tribe on the western frontier in 1860, the Civil War was a great gift. The U.S. Army, the Texas Rangers, and other whites who had been harassing them for decades were called to fight against each other on distant battlefields. The Comanches welcomed their absence.
In 1700, the Comanches were a small tribe who had recently moved into what is now the Southwest of the United States. They developed expertise using two European imports, rifles and horses, becoming the much-feared “Lords of the South Plains.” The Comanches built a way of life based on hunting the buffalo, and like the buffalo, they traveled widely over the Great Plains. They also made alliances (especially with the Utes), traded (with everyone), and fought bloody battles (especially with the Apaches and the Europeans) while they stole horses and supplies as well as kidnapped settlers and people from other tribes. By the early 1800s, although they were without a permanent capital, borders, or bureaucracy, the Comanches ruled an empire that was equal in size and power to the United States or the Republic of Mexico.
Nevertheless, by the late 1850s, the Comanches seemed to be in decline. Working with Texas Rangers and with smaller tribes who had been Comanche victims, the U.S. Army began to gain the upper hand in Texas. The Comanches needed ample space for hunting, trading, and fighting; they had no interest in being settled in any permanent locations. In battles during 1858, over 100 Comanche warriors, including chiefs, were killed and a large number of women and children taken prisoner. Some Comanches were ready to seek peace. The Penateka Comanches, who had split from the larger tribe, gave up warfare and settled on a Texas reservation just before the Civil War.
The Civil War and, later, Reconstruction, opened up new opportunities for the Comanches. The war diverted troops from Texas to distant battlefields, and as early us 1863, Comanche raiding parties began to move back into parts of Texas they had left in the 1850s, stealing horses and cattle. When Texas joined the Confederacy, Comanches developed a brisk trade selling stolen Texas cattle to Union Army agents in New Mexico. With the coming of peace in 1865, the U.S. Army demilitarized any forces in Texas that had fought for the Confederacy in the Civil War, including the feared Texas Rangers. While U.S. Army troops were stationed in Houston, San Antonio, and along the border with Mexico, west Texas, with several million cattle wandering on huge range lands, was only lightly protected. The Comanche saw their opportunity. They developed a rich trade with prosperous New Mexicans who came to be known as the comancheros because of the trade.
450
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
1858 John Butterfield opens overland stage route | 1862 Congress passes the Homestead Act
1864	Navajo Long Walk to Bosque Redondo
1865	Civil War ends, units of U.S. Army return to patrol the West
Chicago Union Stock Yards opens
1867	Chisholm Trail to Abilene, Kansas
Medicine Lodge Creek Treaty between U.S. government and Comanche
1868	Treaty of Fort Laramie with Lakota Sioux Treaty of Bosque Redondo with Navajos
1869	Transcontinental Railroad completed at Promontory Point, Utah
President Grant announces new Grant Peace Policy for American Indians
1872	Modoc uprising in California
1873	Panic and Depression
U.S.
Army defeat of the Comanche Black Hills Gold Rush into Sioux territory in the Dakotas
1876	Battle of the Little Bighorn
1877	Nez Perce under Chief Joseph surrender to U.S. Army
1878	Billy the Kid and Lincoln County War in New Mexico
El Fronterizo, Spanish-language newspaper begins publication in Arizona Territory
1879	Beginnings of Carlisle Indian School
1881	Gunfight at the OK Corral Beginning of Great Dakota Land Boom
1882	Gustavus Swift creates new refrigerated rail car allowing shipment of meat
Opening of Anaconda Copper Mine in Montana
1883	Buffalo Bill's Wild West Show
Four standard time zones created for the United States
1887 Dawes Act begins dividing Reservations into private allotments
1889	Oklahoma Land rush; North Dakota, South Dakota, Montana, Washington become states
1890	Lakota Sioux Ghost Dance and massacre at Wounded Knee
White Cap resistance to land development in New Mexico
Idaho and Wyoming become states
1892	Johnson County War—Wyoming Stock
Growers Association drive out smaller ranches
1896 Utah admitted as a state
1907 Oklahoma admitted as a state
1912 New Mexico and Arizona admitted as states Chapter 16 Conflict in the West 451
Medicine Lodge Creek Treaty
An 1867 treaty between the Comanches and the U.S. Army in which the Comanches agreed to settle on a reservation.
From the mid-1860s into the early 1870s, great annual trading gatherings took place where comancheros, often backed by investors from the eastern United States, traded salt, hard bread, flour, sugar, tobacco, blankets, and knives as well as the ever-in-demand latest issue revolvers and rifles in exchange for cattle that the Comanches had recently acquired in Texas. The Comanches also continued to trade in people—Mexican and Indian captives, especially women, who were in great demand as brides in New Mexico. While these trading gatherings integrated the Comanches into U.S. markets, the stolen cattle and the continued trade in humans were sources of serious tensions between the Comanches and the governments of the United States and the state of Texas.
To restore order to the Southwest and open up new land for white settlement, U.S. peace commissioners met with more than 5,000 Comanches as well as Kiowas, Naishans, Cheyennes, and Arapahoes at Medicine Lodge Creek in Texas in October 1867. The U.S. delegation was led by William Tecumseh Sherman, head of the army of the West, a post he had also held during the Civil War. As a show of strength, the army team included 500 well-armed soldiers in dress uniform. A newspaper reporter also at the meeting wrote that the Comanches arrived “with all their war paraphernalia, their horses striped with war paint, the riders bedecked with war bonnets and their faces painted red.” They also knew a thing or two about a show of strength.
After elaborate opening ceremonies and the exchanges of gifts—including 6,000 pounds of coffee, 10,000 pounds of bread, and 3,000 pounds of tobacco from the government—the U.S. representatives made it clear they had come to Medicine Lodge Creek to end the Comanche status as a sovereign people. The government would help them become farmers on a reservation, but would not tolerate a continuation of the old hunting, trading, and stealing ways. Sherman concluded, “You can no more stop this [change] than you can stop the sun or the moon. You must submit and do the best you can.”
The Comanche chiefs were outraged by the government’s demands. Several, including Paruasemena, the leader of the Penateka Comanches, expressed their anger in eloquent responses, but in the end, the chiefs signed a treaty, although it was one that left much open to interpretation. The Medicine Lodge Creek Treaty provided for a Comanche reservation but also gave them the right to hunt on open plains below the Arkansas River in Indian Territory (Oklahoma). The government representatives assumed that the Comanches would become farmers on the reservation while venturing out on occasional hunting trips to track the buffalo. The Comanches thought that the reservation would make a perfectly good winter campground, and they were more than happy to receive government rations, but they had no intention of becoming settled farmers. Along with hunting buffalo, the Comanches expected to continue hunting for Texas cattle and trading them to New Mexico buyers.
The radically different interpretations of the Medicine Lodge Creek Treaty between the Comanches and the U.S. government became clear the next spring when several thousand Comanches, having spent the winter on the reservation, collected their government payments and began raiding cattle and horses in Texas, New Mexico, and Indian Territory. According to one report, 6,255 horses and 11,395 cattle were lost to Indian raids in Texas between 1866 and 1873.
After several unsuccessful peace efforts, the United States gave up on negotiations and ordered the army to attack and force the Comanches onto a permanent reservation. From 1871 to 1873, the army and the Comanches fought. While the army attacked, American buffalo hunters decimated the buffalo herds as industries found new uses for their hides. The buffalo had been at the heart of Comanche life, not only as food but also as a way to understand the universe, and their destruction undermined the Comanche way of life.
During the fighting from 1871 to 1873 a new Comanche leader emerged. Quanah Parker was the son of a Comanche chief and Ann Cynthia Parker, a white Texan who had been captured by the Comanches. He became the fiercest opponent of compromise with whites. Then in 1874, Isa-tai, a young Comanche spiritual leader or shaman, became prominent, sharing a message heard many times among different Indian tribes that if they would get rid of white ways and end their dealings with white
2 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
American Voices
Paruasemena (Ten Bears), Speech at Medicine Lodge Creek Treaty Meeting, 1867
16.1
Paruasemena was one of the Indian leaders to visit Lincoln at the
White House in 1863. Four years later, the 75-year-old leader spoke to the U.S. peace commission at Medicine Lodge Creek. The passion and pathos of the speech touched many.
My people have never first drawn a bow or fired a gun against the whites.There has been trouble between us...my young men have danced the war dance. But it was not begun by us. It was you who sent out the first soldier....
Two years ago I came upon this road, following the buffalo, that my wives and children might have their cheeks plump and their bodies warm. But the soldiers fired on us.. .The blue-dressed soldiers and the Utes came out from the night.. .and for campfires they lit our lodges. Instead of hunting game they killed my braves, and the warriors of the tribe cut short their hair for the dead.
So it was in Texas. They made sorrow in our camps, and we went out like the buffalo bulls when the cows are attacked. When we found them we killed them, and their scalps hang in our lodges. The Comanches are not weak and blind, like the pups of a dog when seven sleeps old. They are strong and farsighted, like grown horses. We took their road and we went on it. The white women cried, and our women laughed.
But there are things which you have said to me which I do not like.They were not sweet like sugar, but bitter like gourds. You have said that you want to put us on a reservation, to build us houses and make us medicine lodges. I do not want them. I was born under the prairie, where the wind blew free and there was nothing to break the light of the sun. I was born where there were no enclosures and everything drew a free breath. I want to die there and not within walls. I know every stream and wood between the Rio Grande and
the Arkansas. I have hunted and lived over that country. I live like my fathers before me and like them I lived happily.
When I was in Washington the Great Father told me that all the Comanche land was ours and that no one should hinder us in living upon it. So, why do you ask us to leave the rivers and the sun and the wind and live in houses? Do not ask us to give up the buffalo for the sheep. The young men have heard talk of this, and it has made them sad and angry. Do not speak of it more. I love to carry out the talk I get from the Great Father. When I get goods and presents I and my people feel glad, since it shows that he holds us in his eye.
If the Texans had kept out of my country, there might have been peace. But that which you now say we must live in, is too small. The Texans have taken away the places where the grass grew the thickest and the timber was best. Had we kept that, we might have done the things you ask. But it is too late. The whites have the country which we loved, and we wish only to wander on the prairie ti, we die.
Source: Taylor, Nathaniel G., et al., (1910) Papers Relating to Talks and Councils Held with the Indians in Dakota and Montana in the years 1866-1869. Washington: Government Printing Office. (Original in the National Archives, Records of the Indian Division, Office of the Secretary of the Interior, Record Group 48.)
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
How did Paruasemena characterize the conflict between his people and the United States government?
2.	Contextualization
What light does this document shed on the differences between white and Indian cultural values in the 1800s?
people, the buffalo would return and life would be good again. In a great camp meeting in June 1874, several hundred Comanche warriors led by Isa-tai and Parker joined with Kiowas, Cheyennes, and Arapahoes to eliminate the white presence from the Great Plains. The Comanche attacked the buffalo hunters.
The army counterattacked. On September 28,1874, U.S. forces attacked Parker s main encampment, and though nearly all of the Indians fled, the army destroyed the camp, taking the horses and burning tents, blankets, and food. Faced with starvation, the Comanches began to surrender in small groups, coming to the army post at Fort Sill in Indian Territory over the course of the winter where they gave up their horses and rifles and moved to the reservations assigned to them. Isa-tai was discredited among the Comanches from then on.
The winter of 1874—75 was the low point of Comanche life, but it was not the end. Quannah Parker was only 27 when he surrendered to federal authorities. Over the next 4 decades, he became principal chief of the Comanches and led them from warfare to farming and ranching. Parker was a tough negotiator with the federal Bureau of Indian Affairs for expanded land allotments. He had eight wives, built a fine 10-room house, and before he died he had his own telephone, owned a car, traveled by train, and went hunting with President Theodore Roosevelt. The life Parker and his people lived as he grew older was radically different from the life he had lived as a youth, but he helped create the foundation for tribal survival in a new era.
Chapter 16 Conflict in the West 453
Bosque Redondo
A reservation in central New Mexico where the majority of the Navajos and Mescalero Apaches were confined during the Civil War.
The Navajos and the Apaches
The Navajos, or Dine as they prefer to be called, were as warlike as the Comanches and dominated large swaths of New Mexico, Colorado, and Kansas. The Union army ended their rule and that of the Mescalero Apaches, too. In August 1862, Union Brigadier General James H. Carleton arrived in New Mexico in command of California volunteers, but when he learned that Confederates in the region had already been defeated, he ordered his troops to attack the Apaches and Navajos instead. In early 1863, the army invaded Apache lands and soon confined some 400 Apaches at a new reservation at Bosque Redondo in central New Mexico. Carleton then appointed Kit Carson to lead the attack on the much larger Navajo tribe of some 10,000 people. Carson told the Navajos, “Go to Bosque Redondo, or we will pursue and destroy you. We will not make peace with you on any other terms.” Carson kept his word, marching into Canyon de Chelly, the sacred Navajo heartland, attacking Navajo encampments as well as destroying orchards, crops, and livestock. By the spring of 1864, some 6,000 Navajos had surrendered rather than die of starvation. U.S. troops pursued other resisters, and eventually 8,000 Navajos were forced on the “Long Walk,” 300 miles south to a strange way of life at Bosque Redondo.
The Bosque Redondo reservation was a complete failure. The Mescalero Apaches considered the Navajos to be their “inveterate enemies,” and the two tribes had no interest in cooperating. The arid land of mid New Mexico could not support thousands of families, even if they did turn to farming as the government asked them to do. In addition, the Comanches saw the confined reservation as an opportunity to attack old enemies.
After the Civil War, a congressional peace commission visited Bosque Redondo and realized that the government had created a disaster. On June 1, 1868, they signed a new treaty with the Navajos that allowed them to return to a reservation in their own homelands. A new Mescalero Apaches reservation in central New Mexico was established by executive order in 1873 and expanded in 1883. Navajo leaders negotiated several expansions of their reservation between 1868 and 1886 so it covered a large part of New Mexico and Arizona up to the four corners area with Colorado and Utah. They also managed to avoid the division of the reservation into individual allotments that destroyed tribal ways for other tribes. With the shared experience of suffering at Bosque Redondo andthe substantial new lands, the Navajo tribe had become the Navajo Nation. They kept their promise to stop raiding and recreated much of their old ways, living on lands they considered sacred and making a living by herding sheep, goats, and horses. The tribe grew from 10,000 in 1864 to 30,000 in 1900, an unusual experience for American Indians.
Navajos under guard at Bosque Redondo, ca. 1864. 454 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
The Modocs, the Nez Perce, and the Pacific Coast Tribes
Well before the Civil War, the rapid influx of white settlers who came to California with the gold rush was a catastrophe for the many small tribes that dotted the state. The California tribes had already been weakened by decades of Spanish and Mexican efforts to turn them into workers on the missions and the large rancheros of the state. The new American presence only made things worse. Federal commissioners negotiated treaties with 139 tribes to create small reservations, mostly in northern California, but Congress did not ratify the treaties and white settlers ignored them. In spite of the efforts of federal Indian agents to create reasonable safeguards for the Indians of California, settlers and miners ignored restrictions on Indian land if they thought they could find gold or plant a settlement. California Indians were starved and all too often simply murdered. In 1845, before the United States took control of California, there were some 150,000 Indians in California—down from probably 300,000 when the Spanish missionaries first arrived; just a decade after California became a state, only 25,000 remained.
In the fall of 1872, Kintpuash, a leader of the Modoc tribe in southern Oregon and northern California, led his people out of a reservation the Modocs had shared with the Klamaths and Snakes since signing a treaty in 1864. Kintpuash did not like reservation life, and the Modocs returned to their homelands on Lost River in California. The U.S. Army followed and attacked them, but the Modocs knew the territory, especially the great black lava fields that provided hiding to those who had grown up among them. The Modocs resisted, killing soldiers, settlers, and government negotiators. Orders came from Washington “that the name of Modoc should cease,” because they had violated their treaty and killed federal negotiators. Eventually, the army won. Surviving Modocs were relocated in Indian Territory far from their homeland.
The Nez Perce, the tribe without whom Lewis and Clark would have perished, had long lived in Oregon and Idaho, but they were a deeply divided tribe. One group, known as the “progressives,” signed a treaty in 1855 agreeing to live on a large reservation in Idaho. Another group, the so-called “nonprogressives,” refused. They lived independently in an area encompassing the Salmon River in Idaho and the Snake River in Oregon.
For some time, the nonprogressive Nez Perce were allowed to live in peace, but as white settlement grew in the Snake River’s fertile Wallowa Valley, pressure came to force them and their leader Chief Joseph, or Hin-mah-too-yah-lat-kekt, onto the Idaho Reservation. They resisted, but by 1877, the Nez Perce knew they could no longer live unmolested in the Wallowa Valley. They began a long retreat to preserve their independence, a retreat that turned into a well-chronicled but tragic journey. Initially, the Nez Perce moved east across the Bitterroot Mountains into Montana hoping to find sanctuary with the Crow or Sioux. Then they turned north, hoping to cross into Canada. All along the way, the U.S. Army pursued them. Finally, when they were less than 40 miles from Canada, the army caught up. A few escaped across the border, but the majority, led by Chief Joseph, surrendered. The chief said, “I am tired of fighting. Our chiefs are killed... .It is cold and we have no blankets. The little children are freezing to death... .My heart is sick and sad. From where the sun now stands, I will fight no more forever.” Most of those who had made the long journey with Chief Joseph ended up on a reservation in Indian Territory, although some, eventually including Chief Joseph, were allowed to return to the Pacific Northwest but never to their ancestral lands (see Map 16-1).
The Lakota Sioux—From Fort Laramie to the Little Big Horn and Wounded Knee
The Sioux, by far the largest group of tribes in the northern Great Plains, also fought fierce battles with the U.S. Army. Teton and Santee Sioux had been embroiled with U.S. settlers and army troops through the 1860s, but the largest battles of the 1870s were with the powerful Lakota Sioux.
In December 1866, the Lakota attacked and killed U.S. troops. Rather than risk further fighting, the government sought peace with the Lakota as well as their

4W
kJ
/

Chief Joseph of the Nez Perce who led the epic journey of his people.
Chapter 16 Conflict in the West
16/1
Major battles Trails Cattle trail
Chief Joseph’s route Railroads
■HMMMNMM
MAP 16-1 The Plains Indian Wars. As trails and then railroads brought more settlers, the great battles between the U.S. Army and the Plains Indians erupted all across the Great Plains.
Cheyenne and Arapaho allies. In the 1868 Treaty of Fort Laramie, the Lakota Sioux, led by Red Cloud, promised to avoid war, and the army agreed to abandon three provocatively placed forts. (An earlier Fort Laramie Treaty of 1851 was negotiated simply to keep peace between the tribes and give the U.S. Army and settlers rights-of-way across the plains to California and Oregon.) Although the 1868 Fort Laramie Treaty could be seen as a victory for the Sioux, one faction, led by Sitting Bull, derided the treaty, reservation life, and the government annuities that were promised, saying to those who signed, “You are fools to make yourselves slaves to a piece of fat bacon, some hard-tack, and a little sugar and coffee.” Indeed, the treaty that Sitting Bull criticized did not protect the Lakota or the other tribes involved.
Less than a decade after the treaty was signed, when gold was discovered in the Black Hills and miners and settlers descended on the region, the government ordered the Lakota to leave winter camps and settle near the agency headquarters. The Lakota resisted. The Great Sioux War of 1876-77 had begun.
General George Armstrong Custer led a battalion of troops in an attack on the Sioux who were refusing to move. At the Little Bighorn River on June 25, 1876, Custer and his troops were surrounded by a much larger force of Sioux and Cheyennes. None of the army troops survived. It was perhaps the most famous Indian victory, but that success was soon followed by defeat. Less than a month after the Little Bighorn battle, General Philip Sheridan led a huge force that attacked and defeated the Sioux. The government then broke up the Great Sioux Reserve in the Black Hills of Dakota Territory, creating six much smaller reservations: Standing Rock, Cheyenne River, Lower Brule, Crow Creek, Pine Ridge, and Rosebud, while giving some of the best land, now declared “surplus,” to white settlers and miners.
456 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
General William Tecumseh Sherman led the U.S. delegation in negotiations with tribal leaders, which led to the Fort Laramie Treaty of 1868.
The defeats of 1876-77, along with the destruction of the great buffalo herds, led to an era of depression, disease, and poverty for the Sioux. A little more than a decade later, in 1890, the religious phenomenon that had been seen among other tribes appeared among the Sioux. A spiritual leader, Wovoka, initiated the Ghost Dance movement, promising a return of the buffalo and the disappearance of white people if only the Sioux would take up the dance and return to their ancient ways, freeing themselves of dependence on white culture. The rise of the Ghost Dance frightened the white community, and the army was sent to Pine Ridge to investigate. A former Indian agent, Valentine McGillycuddy, appealed for calm saying, “I should let the dance continue... .If the Seventh-Day Adventists prepare their ascension robes for the second coming of the Savior, the United States Army is not put in motion to prevent them. Why should not the Indians have the same privilege?”
McGillycuddy also warned that “If the troops remain, trouble is sure to come.” He was right. One band of Sioux under the leadership of Big Foot left the reservation while the Ghost Dance continued, and U.S. troops went after them. When Big Foot and his band were caught, they returned to Pine Ridge without a fight but maintained their freedom. The next day, however, those who had followed Big Foot were asked to surrender themselves as prisoners. Ghost Dance leaders convinced them to make a stand. It was a fatal move. Gunfire erupted on the reservation and between 100 and 200 (some estimate as high as 300) Indians were killed. Armed Indian resistance in the West ended at Wounded Knee. The Sioux faced a bleak future after 1890, and it was decades before they made some of the same adjustments as the Navajos and Comanches.
Government Policy—The Grant Peace Plan and the Dawes Act
The rapid expansion of the nation after the Civil War added complex new issues to the government s Indian policy. The U.S. Army represented the U.S. government to Indians west of the Mississippi. Before the Civil War, the army’s goal was to limit warfare with and among the tribes while allowing white settlers transit across the Great Plains to California and Oregon. Few whites settled on the Great Plains before the 1860s, and the government was content to leave the Plains Indian tribes to themselves unless, like the Comanches, they fought directly with the army. The first Treaty of Fort Laramie in 1851 did not limit Indian land use except to try to keep the peace by keeping tribes
Ghost Dance
Part of a religious awakening among the Lakota Sioux in 1890 in which they believed that if they returned to their traditional ways and ceremonies, the whites would be driven from their land.
Chapter 16 Conflict in the West 457
16.1
Artist Frederick Remington depicted the 1890 Ghost Dance, which represented a hope for a new age.
Homestead Act
Law passed by Congress in 1862 providing 160 acres of land free to anyone who would live on the plot and farm it for 5 years.
apart from one another. No reservations were established. Rather, in exchange for gifts, the army asked the tribes to avoid conflict with one another, with military forts, and with the transit routes for the mail and for settlers. Asking for anything more was beyond the limits of what the 270 soldiers at Fort Laramie could reasonably ask in a meeting attended by perhaps 10,000 American Indians, including the Sioux, Arapaho, Cheyenne, Assinboins, Shoshones, Arikaras, Hidatsas, Mandans, and Crows.
After the Civil War, the pressure for space for white settlement greatly intensified. At the same time, U.S. Army units that had been fighting the Civil War were now available for service in the West. Among these units were segregated African-American units that were sent to the West and came to be known as Buffalo Soldiers because their white commanders thought their hair was like that of the buffalo. Even though most military units were demobilized after the war, there were more than sufficient numbers of soldiers—white and black—remaining in the army to provide a formidable fighting force in the West.
In 1862, a Republican Congress had passed, and President Lincoln had signed, the Homestead Act, fulfilling a major Republican campaign promise to make more federal land available for white settlement. The act provided 160 acres of federal land to a family that would settle and maintain the land for 5 years. The act, however, did not specify where the land would come from. Much of the initial homestead settlements were in Minnesota, Iowa, Nebraska, and Kansas, all on lands that had been prime buffalo hunting locations for various tribes. Unlike before the Civil War when most whites had moved across the Great Plains and kept going under the protection of U.S. Army, after the Civil War, whites were coming to the plains to stay and larger army forces were coming with them. In addition to farming, the discovery of mineral wealth in places like the Black Hills of the Dakotas brought more whites and further racial conflict.
Immediately after the war, the same Congress that was taking control of Reconstruction also created its own Indian peace policy and assigned the army to implement it. The battles with the Lakota Sioux led those in Congress to seek a peaceful way of proceeding, so they created the Indian Peace Commission to negotiate treaties with the Plains tribes. The congressional commission developed the idea of tribal reserves or reservations, large tracts of land that would, they hoped, be set aside for the Indians, protecting the tribes from encroaching white civilization while ensuring their eventual assimilation into white culture. It was same policy that had been used in negotiating with tribes that originally lived east of the Mississippi but with one big difference. The majority of eastern tribes had been forced onto reservations in the West, specifically, in Oklahoma or Indian Territory. There was no place further west to push the western
458 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
16.1
American Voices
Charles W. Allen, Report from Wounded Knee, 1890
Charles W. Alien, a white newspaper editor who had spent most of his life among the Sioux and was friendly with them, reported the event he saw while visiting his wife's family at the Pine Ridge Reservation on December 29, 1890. The first part of this report is taken from Allen's autobiography published in 1938. The second part is from a newspaper article he wrote for the Chadron Democrat three days after the events took place.
Presently all the Indian men began coming in bunches of from two to a dozen or more, stringing leisurely along then taking their seats in a circle on the grass before the commander and his staff....Then General Forsyth addressed in a firm but conciliatory manner.. ..[H]e told them that for the time being they were prisoners, and as such they were to give up their arms peaceably....He then told them to go back to their lodges, bring all their firearms, and turn them over to him. The Indians departed for their camp in a reluctant, obviously sulky mood....
After what seemed an unreasonable length of time the Indians came strolling back pretty much as they had come to the first meeting, except that they seemed purposely to adopt a more independent swagger in approaching the council field. Many of them were painted hideously and conspicuously grim of visage.... Quite a number of their wives had accompanied the braves to this meeting, robed in long blankets reaching almost to the ground, and each took a position immediately behind her husband... .The women who stood close behind their men concealed, under each blanket, a repeating rifle and well filled cartridge belt....
Chief Big Foot had been escorted from his tent, and urged his followers to maintain peace and comply with the general's orders....I also observed a Hotchkiss gun that had been placed in commanding position on a small knoll at the north edge of the camp, not far from the site on which the Catholic church now commemorates the tragedy....
Gen. Forsyth ordered a detail of dismounted troops under Capt. Wallace to close in and surround them at a distance of about twenty paces....During this procedure, which was very interesting, an Indian ghost dance master, arrayed in full paraphernalia, began to make medicine, holding his hands up to the sun and calling upon the Messiah to visit his wrath upon the soldiers. He would take up hands full of dirt and scatter it, then hold up his hands as if momentarily expecting the earth to open and swallow up the troops. It was evident that he was getting the Indians worked up and he finally told them to be brave and that bullets would not hit them if the soldiers did shoot at them. The commander was told of what he was saying, and he ordered him to sit down, which order he finally complied with after he had walked clear around the circle as though he owned the earth....They had proceeded to disarm but some eight or ten of these, when the brave who had been inciting them jumped up and said something and fired at the soldier who was standing guard over the arms that had been secured. The first gun had no sooner been fired than it was followed by hundreds of others and the battle was on. The fighting continued for about a half hour, and then was continued in skirmish for another hour.
Source: Charles W. Allen, From Fort Laramie to Wounded Knee: In the West That Was, edited with an introduction by Richard E. Jensen (originally published 1938, republished Lincoln: University of Nebraska Press, 1997), pp. 192-202.
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
As Allen told the story, who was responsible for the fighting at Wounded Knee?
2.	Historical Interpretation
In what ways did Wounded Knee mark the end of an era in American history?
tribes, so the government tried to move them onto as limited an amount of land as possible. At the same time, of course, confining the tribes on reservations would ensure that most of the land of the West could be opened for white development. The plan was not a great success. Tribes like the Sioux, Nez Perce, and Comanches resented the confinement of reservation life and often wandered far beyond their assigned bounds.
When Ulysses S. Grant became president in 1869, he initiated a new Indian Peace Policy that became known as Grant’s Peace Policy. Grant’s thinking was shaped by the terrible bloodshed he had seen in the Civil War and by his identification with the emancipation of slaves. He wanted to end the corruption that he saw in the Indian Bureau, and he wanted to treat the Indians with dignity. His goal was peace. At the same time, Grant wanted room for white settlement and was certainly not planning to keep whites out of the vast tracts of western land that the Indians used for hunting. In his first annual message to Congress in December 1869, Grant said there was no turning back the clock, that the past “cannot be undone, and the question must be met as we now find it.” Meeting the question, he believed, meant assimilating Indians
Grant's Peace Policy
A new effort by President Grant to end the Plains Indian wars by creating a series of reservations on which tribes could maintain their traditional ways.
Chapter 16 Conflict in the West 459
Dawes Act
An 1887 law terminating tribal ownership of most reservation land and allocating some parcels to individual Indians while the remainder was opened for white settlement.
into white society, or as the president asked, cannot the Indian be made a useful and productive member of society by proper teaching and treatment. Since most of the Indians did not want to become “useful and productive members of white society, Grant’s policy may have been doomed from the beginning, but he tried to find a humane solution to the clash of quite different cultures in the American West.
When Grant announced his Peace Policy he said,
Ihe building of rail-roads and the access thereby given to all the agricultural and mineral regions of the country is rapidly bringing civilized settlements into contact with all the tribes of Indians... .1 see no remedy for this except in placing all the Indians on large reservations.. .and giving them absolute protection there.
Grant then appointed a member of the Seneca tribe, Ely S. Parker, as the first Native American Commissioner of Indian Affairs, the first nonwhite to hold a high government position. Grant also turned to Christian missionaries, not the army or the Indian Office, to take the lead in managing reservation affairs. He declared the reservations off limits to the army, even troops who were chasing Indians with whom they had been in battle.
Ihe missionaries, people like the Quaker Lawrie Tatum who was appointed to lead the Comanche and Kiowa reservation, tried to make the peace policy work. But government supplies were slow in coming and often of shoddy workmanship. Many Indians resisted the confinement of reservation life. The army was frustrated by the rule that they could not follow Indians into the reservation asylum even as they were expected to police the non-Indian territories. General Sheridan condemned the Peace Policy saying, “If a white man commits murder or robs, we hang him or send him to the penitentiary; if an Indian does the same, we have been in the habit of giving him more blankets.” The Indians, seeing through the references to peace, considered the whites as thieves who were stealing their land.
Although the Indian Peace Policy remained in force, the army simply ignored it. Sherman’s defeat of the Comanches in 1874-75 was in violation of the policy that army units could not enter reservations, but the general was praised, not reprimanded. Within a year after Custer’s 1876 defeat, the army had subdued nearly all of the Sioux. Crazy Horse, one of the Sioux who was at the Little Big Horn the day Custer died, became an army scout and was killed at an army post in September 1877. Sitting Bull was arrested in 1881 after returning from exile in Canada. He toured briefly with Buffalo Bill Cody’s Wild West Show in the 1880s and then retired to the Standing Rock reservation where, as the Ghost Dance movement grew, he was killed in a standoff with other Sioux sent by the army to arrest him. But the Grant Peace Policy had unofficially died long before the old chief met his end.
Within a decade of the last major Indian wars in the 1870s and the settlement of most western Indians on reservations, the U.S. government again began to change policy. By the 1880s, reformers in and out of government were concluding that the assimilation of Indians into white society—a goal many shared—would not happen as long as they maintained their ancient ways on reservations. If the key to Indian survival was for them to become independent farmers who attended churches and schools just as whites did, then why, reformers asked, should they live on reservations? Why not give them all the benefits of the Homestead Act and allow Indians, like whites, to gain free title to their own 160-acre farm and American citizenship?
In response to these arguments, Congress passed the General Allotment Act, known as the Dawes Act for its prime sponsor Massachusetts Senator Henry L. Dawes, in 1887. Ihe Dawes Act divided the reservations into 160-acre tracts to be assigned to each family. After a 25-year waiting period, Indian families could sell the land like their white neighbors. Indians who took possession of a homestead also became U.S. citizens. At first glance, the Dawes Act might seem like an enlightened piece of legislation and at least some of its sponsors certainly believed that it was.
The Dawes Act had other provisions, however, that led to negative results. Indian culture was tribal and communal, and hunting was a major activity; however, the Dawes Act pushed Indians to be farmers and to join an individualistic culture that many found to be quite alien. Beyond that, the most immediate impact of the act
460 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
was that, after each family on a reservation was allotted its 160 acres, all “surplus” land could then be sold by the government to white families. Later, after the 25-year waiting period, Indian families sometimes sold their land, giving them a profit but alienating them from their tribe. A few tribes, the Navajos and the Senecas, were able to avoid implementation of the Dawes Act and retain communal ownership of their reservations. But for many, the act was an economic and cultural disaster.
In 1881,155 million acres were set aside as reservations belonging to Indian tribes. As a result of the Dawes Act, Indians controlled only 78 million acres by 1900. While the Dawes Act broke up tribal lands, other federal perspectives undercut Indian culture. Few white authorities believed that the First Amendment protections of religious freedom applied to Indian religion, especially because Indian religion and Indian warfare were often linked. It was not until 1978 that Congress declared traditional Indian religions to have First Amendment rights.
Sending Indian young people to special schools was also seen by officials as one of the surest ways of implementing Grant’s promise to “favor any course towards them which tends to their civilization and ultimate citizenship.” In 1875, the army ordered 72 Indian prisoners—among them, Cheyenne, Arapahos, Kiowas, Comanches, and Caddos— moved from Fort Sill in Indian Territory to a new federal prison in St. Augustine, Florida. Lieutenant Richard Henry Pratt, a Civil War veteran who was put in charge of the prisoners, decided to create a model Indian school. He hired Sarah Mather from Mt. Holyoke College, and the two began what they believed was an essential mission to teach the prisoners American-style dress, the English language, and Protestant Christianity. Ihe isolation of the prisoner-students made the process easier. Soaring Eagle, a Cheyenne warrior, said, “It is good to go to church.. ..When I go home, I hope to sit down and sing God’s hymns.” Of course, Soaring Eagle and the other prisoners knew that about the only chance they had to actually go home was to comply with the school’s policies.
Pratt and Mather’s experiment drew widespread praise. They were authorized to expand their efforts and open the Carlisle Indian School in old army barracks in Carlisle, Pennsylvania. Twenty-five Indian boarding schools, eventually both Catholic and Protestant, were built on the Carlisle model between 1879 and 1902. Using federal tax dollars, these schools taught religion, western customs, and values to their Indian students.
Indian students resisted the goal of the boarding schools to transform them, though such resistance was harshly punished. Francis La Flesche, an Omaha who attended a Presbyterian mission school in the 1860s, reported that he and his friends spoke English during the day, but at night when the missionaries were gone, they continued to tell each other the Omaha stories and speak the Omaha language.
Carlisle Indian School
A boarding school for Native American children opened in Carlisle, Pennsylvania to teach white ways and separate Indian children from tribal culture.
M t
16.2
I
Quick Review How did actions after the Civil War—in particular, reassigning U.S. Army units to the West and offering land for white settlement through the Homestead Act—irrevocably change life for Indians in the West?
THE IMPACT OF THE TRANSCONTINENTAL RAILROAD,
1869 16J
Analyze the building of transcontinental railroads and its impact on the nation, especially the West.
When he proposed his Indian Peace Policy in December 1869, Grant said that it was needed because “[t]he building of rail-roads.. .is rapidly bringing civilized settlements into contact with all the tribes of Indians.” Only 7 months earlier at Promontory Point, Utah, Leland Stanford, governor of California and president of the Central Pacific Railroad, and T. C. Durant, vice president of the Union Pacific Railroad, had driven the last spike made of California gold—to connect the first rail line that spanned the North American continent.
The dream of a transcontinental railroad gained widespread support in the 1850s. An army survey in 1853 offered four possible routes across the country variously ending in
Transcontinental railroad
The Union Pacific rail line from California and the Central Pacific line connected with Chicago and other eastern cities, it was the first rail line to allow train travel all across the United States.
Chapter 16 Conflict in the West 46
When crews building the Union Pacific Railroad and the Central Pacific Railroad met at Promontory Summit, Utah, in May 1869, the nation celebrated the completion of the first transcontinental railroad.
Chinese crews, working in the isolated mountains of California, had to blast tunnels and build bridges to complete the rail line.
Portland, San Francisco, Los Angeles, or San Diego, each of which was considered. Even more serious debate focused on where the routes should begin. Illinois Senator Stephen A. Douglas wanted them to start in Chicago, while Mississippi Senator Jefferson Davis wanted them to begin in Memphis or New Orleans. It had been Douglas s dream of a route starting in Chicago that originally led him to propose the Kansas-Nebraska Act. But before the issue of the best transcontinental rail route could be settled, the Civil War had intervened. Once the war began in 1861, the departure of Southerners from Congress meant that a more northerly route became the obvious choice of the remaining members. Ihe Pacific Railroad Act passed easily in 1862. Ihe California-based Central Pacific started building east from San Francisco and Sacramento while the Union Pacific started building west across the Great Plains from various terminals in Kansas, Nebraska, and Missouri, all of which were already connected to the east coast by existing rail lines. Ihe federal government provided a 400-foot right of way, federal loans, and major land grants to the two railroads. Construction moved very slowly during the war, but the coming of peace in 1865 brought a rush to complete the work.
Ihe hard physical labor of actually laying track was done mostly by Irish workers on the Union Pacific and by Chinese laborers on the California-based Central Pacific. Those starting in the east were sometimes able to lay track at the rate of four rails per minute, covering 500 miles and reaching Cheyenne, Wyoming, by November 1867. Those starting in California had the far more difficult task of crossing the Sierra Nevada Mountains. They had to build snow sheds and blast through solid rock to make their way. Finally in the spring of 1869, the lines connected, and the nation was knit together as never before.
Ihe first rail connection across the continent was only the beginning. By the early 1890s four major lines reached across the country, connecting to a large network of midwestern and eastern rail lines. The major cities within California, Oregon, and Washington were connected by their own lines. All of the country’s large cities, and most of the mediumsized ones, were connected by rail. A city without a rail link was doomed to wither.
Technological changes helped extend the railroads. George Westinghouses invention of an air brake system in 1873 made trains safer and the rides smoother as it became possible to stop all of the cars of a train at once rather than needing to coordinate the work of a brakeman on each car. Eli Janney invented a safer system for coupling and decoupling railway cars, saving the lives of innumerable railway workers. Safer construction of tracks and bridges, the replacement of iron rails with steel, and new improved locomotive production all improved speed and safety. Although travel to the California Gold Rush in 1849 took 6 to 8 weeks or more, by the 1870s, a person could travel across the United States in 10 days and, if one could afford it, do so in the comfort of a Pullman sleeping car.
The railroads linked communities with a speed that created a new sense of time. When a traveler moved by horse or wagon, the exact time of day did not matter that much. Trains, however, needed to follow a schedule if passengers and freight were to depart and arrive on time and collisions were to be avoided. Schedules, particularly coordinating trains over great distances, required something no one had considered before—standardized time. Although some objected, like the Cincinnati editor who asked why his city should shift its clocks “so as to harmonize with an imaginary line through Pittsburgh,” the clear majority of the country readily agreed to the plan. On Sunday, November 18, 1883, known as the “Day of Two Noons,” all but the most isolated American communities adjusted their clocks to place them in one of the four time zones into which the nation was being divided—time zones that still regulate daily life today.
What had once been isolated regional economies quickly became part of a national commercial network because of railroads. The cost of moving food and other goods dropped dramatically. People followed the same time schedule. The railroads that crossed the continent
462
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power-Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
ended at docks where ocean-going steamships carried food, lumber, and other materials from the United States to Asia and South America. Within three decades of acquiring the West Coast, the United States was connected to a Pacific market of international trade and commerce that would create work for many—from lumberjacks in Oregon and Washington to miners in Idaho or the Dakotas to wheat farmers across the Midwest—creating wealth for a few and linking the nation’s economy to the rise and fall of world markets. After 1890, a glut of wheat in Argentina could impact the life of a farmer in Nebraska, and a drop in the value of silver in Japan could hurt a miner in Idaho. Even though the United States was not quite yet a major world power, it was connected to the world as never before (see Map 16-2).
Quick Review How did railroads improve transportation and communication in ways that other innovations such as canals and steamboats could not?
THE TRANSFORMATION OF THE WEST
16.3
Analyze how indigenous people, ranchers, farmers, miners, outlaws, politicians, and mythmakers shaped the West and our understanding of its history.
The defeat of the Indian tribes and the Homestead Act, along with extraordinary changes in time, speed, and transportation brought on by the railroads, transformed the American West. Land that had been part of Mexico in the 1840s and that people from the East Coast only wanted to get across in the 1850s became the site of vast new ranches, settled farms, and rapidly expanding towns. By the 1880s and 1890s, a new region was becoming part of the nation’s cultural, economic, and political networks.
Of course, not all of the new settlers in the American West got along with each other. Cattle ranchers depended on vast wide-open spaces to feed and move their herds. Farmers seeking to establish 160-acre homesteads depended on barbed wire to fence off their land, and keep cattle out. Older residents of what had been the northern parts of Mexico had relied on sometimes vague property lines and depended on communal grazing lands while the newly arriving Americans wanted precise lines and built fences across the land that had once been held in common. Settlers seeking to establish farms or build towns depended on law and order while others—outlaws and gunfighters—thought that the best way to make one’s fortune was to take it from others. As these groups battled for control, they soon came to create political organization if not always social order.
Cowboys, Cattle, the Open Range, and Barbed Wire
White families seeking to make their fortune, or at least a living, raising cattle moved into southwest Texas in the 1850s, expanding throughout the West by the 1860s and 1870s. Allowing the cattle to graze the vast open areas enabled herders to manage larger numbers than if they had to confine them to pens with feed. Texas Longhorn cattle, the result of interbreeding cattle of Spanish origin and Anglo-American stock, seemed especially perfect for the region. They could survive on easy-to-find grass on the wide plains, did not need additional feed, and were resistant to Texas fever, the tick-born disease that killed other cattle. Further north in Kansas, Nebraska, and the Dakotas, other cattle ranchers also discovered that cattle thrived on the bunchgrasses of the northern prairies, which dried out by mid-summer but retained its protein and fed cattle well, even when they had to find it through the snow.
By the time the Civil War called most of the cattlemen off to distant battlefields and left the cattle to fend for themselves, there were probably 5 million cattle in west Texas. Although the Comanches took their share of the abandoned cattle, many remained by the end of the war, and some herds grew substantially, having been allowed to breed without being slaughtered for food for several years.
In the summer of 1865, returning veterans reconnected with families and sought to reestablish the herds on which their families depended. Lee Moore remembered helping his veteran father reassemble a herd in southwest Texas, We didn t call it roundup
Chapter 16 Conflict in the West 46:
16,1

C AN\
i
OREGON
(1859)

Promontory Point j
WYOMING f. (V890)/
W

sadwoodSC
^4

MINNESOTA .(W
^$weri0/r
u& —
27 GREAT
*fSima City b Hill
BASIN
NEVADA (1864)
\ Rock Springs I Salt Lake City^ Q
/UTAH*.
(1896)
Los Angeles*
PACIFIC
OCEAN
-----Railroads
_ cattle drives
Gold IB Silver

/SarttaFe . ' Railroad ,

►enV
Rio Grande F Railroad
^MISSOURI
(1821)
AIMSAS (1836)7

ARIZONA .	__
TERRITORY ■'-'%£&' i Santa Fe ’
coBi
iEi Paso
San
Angelo
MEXICO
GULF
OF
MEXICO
%

$ssra
817) \
200	300 Miles
_J__________I
o 100	200	300 Kilometers
MAP 16-2 Connecting the Nation. Rail lines and cattle trails connected far flung parts of the West. Gold and silver mines, cattle ranches, and wheat farmers were suddenly part of a worldwide market.
in those days. We called it cow-hunts and every man on this cow-hunt was a cattle owner just home from the war and went out to see what they had left and to brand up.
Most of those trying to reassemble herds in 1865 could not be called ranchers. They did not own or maintain ranches, as such. Rather they allowed their cattle to graze freely on the open Texas land officially owned by the federal government, though contested by various Indian tribes. They identified their cattle by branding them when they were young. Unbranded cattle—known as mavericks—were free for the taking. The few who did own ranches managed vast operations, like the huge King Ranch where Richard King owned 84,000 acres at the end of the Civil War, eventually expanding to 1,270,000 acres. The King Ranch was one of several huge ranches in Texas and New Mexico, but much of the cattle raising in the 1860s and 1870s was a much more informal affair that depended on respect for cattle brands rather than fenced private lands.
Several developments account for the huge increase in cattle ranching in the decades after the Civil War. Americans started to eat a lot of beef, and in prosperous times, they
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
464
could afford to do so. Cookbooks reported new ways to prepare beef while telling readers that pork, which had fed much of the nation in earlier times, was unwholesome and hard to digest. Hiram Latham, a publicist for the Union Pacific Railroad wrote a pamphlet, Trans-Missouri Stock Raising, in 1871 that declared the only way to support the nation’s manufacturing workers was to ensure they had a large supply of clothing and cheap food, food that needed to include a healthy amount of beef (see Map 16-3).
In spite of the ease of raising cattle, particularly in Texas, Colorado, Wyoming,
Montana, it was a long distance from those areas to the mouths of most Americans, whether on the Pacific Coast or in the Midwest or on the Atlantic Coast. In 1867, Joseph G. McCoy founded Abilene, Kansas, one of the nation’s first cattle towns, to facilitate the loading of cattle onto transcontinental trains that would speed the beef to consumers. Jesse Chisholm began herding cattle along what came to be known as the Chisholm Trail from Texas, across Indian Territory, to Abilene to connect with those railroad lines. In 1867, some 30,000 cattle made their way along the Chisholm Trail, and over the next 20 years, 2 million more followed.
Not surprisingly, Abilene and other towns at the end of the drive became wild places when the cattle drive reached town. Cowboys, young single men who had spent many months following the herds, were ready for a party when they got to town. The infamous Longbranch Saloon and the Dodge House Hotel, both in Dodge City, Kansas, hosted many celebrating cowboys. These environments offered some of the only economic opportunities for women in the cattle industry, and those opportunities were less than reputable. Prostitution was often the only way to survive and sometimes was a route to independence. A Wichita newspaper reported on the “ten bawdy houses” in Newton, Kansas, in 1871: “Here you may see young girls not over sixteen drinking whisky, smoking cigars, cursing and swearing.” Most prostitutes in the cattle towns were very young, between 14 and 23, and from the eastern United States, Europe, and even Indian Territory. Few stayed in the business for very long.
As the demands for beef increased and cowboys brought more cattle into the railroad towns, developments in rail transport made the cattle industry more profitable. In 1882, Gustavus Swift created a new fleet of refrigerated railroad cars. Beef spoiled or took on an odd and unappetizing look in earlier refrigerator cars when it was packed in ice. Swift kept the ice separate and above the beef so the beef stayed cold without touching ice. A few Chicago packinghouses—Swift, Armour, Morris, and Hammond— along with smaller ones in Kansas City, Omaha, and Forth Worth, came to dominate the nation’s meatpacking industry. By 1900,82 percent of the nation’s cattle were killed and packed in such places. The Chicago’s Union Stock Yards, first opened in 1865 to distribute cattle to these facilities, became the hub for feeding the world.
As the beef industry became more centralized in the 1870s and 1880s, it continued to depend on the muscle of cowboys who cared for cattle, kept track of them when they drifted away, and handled the roundups and cattle drives. The greatest era of the cowboys of the American West was between the Civil War and 1900. The cowboys who did the work of the cattle industry were mostly poor, mostly young, and of many different backgrounds.
In spite of the lonely days and only rare occasions to celebrate, cowboys themselves often did all they could to contribute to the romantic legend that surrounded them. Nat Love, for one, was born a slave in Tennessee in 1854. After the Civil War, he moved west and worked as a cowboy. He was good at the work and in 1876 won roping and shooting contests in Deadwood, South Dakota, that gave him a prize of $200. From then on, he was known as Deadwood Dick and his own autobiography as well as the popular dime novels that told Deadwood Dick stories made him a legend, even if some of those who repeated his story left out the crucial fact that Deadwood Dick was an African-American cowboy.
In the 1860s, many of the cowboys in Texas were white Confederate veterans, and those in Kansas or Montana were Union veterans. Still, there were a relatively large number of African-Americans and American Indians among them. Cattle companies, especially in Texas, soon began replacing the Anglo cowboys with those of Mexican descent whom they could pay substantially less. In 1883, white cowboys in Texas
1O
MAP 16-3 Cattle Trails and Rail Lines. Cattle were driven north from Texas and parts of Kansas and Nebraska to rail lines where they could be moved to world markets.
16J
16J
struck for higher wages, but the Panhandle Cattleman’s Association quickly broke the strike and found new sources of labor among poor single men of all races who wanted any job or who thought the work might be glamorous.
As the cattle business came to be controlled by larger ranches and corporations in the 1880s and 1890s, cowboys became less independent and more like hired workers in other industries, liable to be assigned to fence building one day and cattle branding the next. Nevertheless, herding cattle over great distances required skill, especially using a rope to lasso and understanding the behavior of herds. Ihe most successful cattle producers knew that they had to provide for their staff. Cowboys had originally carried their own food, but cattle owners began to supply the food from specially constructed wagons, accompanied by a cook, who provided the meals on the range. The first rancher to carry food and bedding for the roundups and trail drives was Charles Goodnight, and in his honor, the wagons came to be known as “Chuck Wagons.”
Although the cattle industry prospered, it also experienced significant changes and downturns. Branding cattle—using a hot iron to create a scar on the left flank of a calf that was easy to identify—was key to identifying cattle who roamed over very large areas of range, perhaps a hundred miles or more. While branding continued, by the 1880s, cattle owners began using barbed wire fences to set off their ranges. Barbed wire fences kept herds in more contained areas and protected the best grass. Of course, protecting the grass meant identifying who had the rights to certain areas, which brought cattle ranchers into conflict with each other and with the federal government since most of
,	the western ranges were federal lands. The conflict often turned violent, perhaps most
L6 V
Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914 smbIbbksSSI

_	-	*-•-£ -x-jgg?
MUBHMWhhHi
.1001

BWBWiB
IO

i ®«W»WWWSW i
Most of a cowboy's life was hard, lonely work.
dramatically in the Johnson County War of 1892 when the Wyoming Stock Growers Association hired gunfighters to force smaller ranchers out of the state.
Success also depended on the price of beef staying high and a ready supply of cattle, both of which were problematic. Ihe winters of 1880-81, 1884-85, and 1886-87 were all unusually harsh. Cattle died for lack of food, or they drifted in front of a storm until they piled up against a barbed wire fence and died. In addition, economic recessions in the 1870s and again in the late 1880s led Americans to eat less beef. By the mid-1880s, the market for the 20 million cattle in the American West was declining. After a recovery, another depression in the 1890s made it hard to predict what the value of cattle would be in any given year.
By the end of the 1890s, the era of open ranges, roundups, and huge cattle drives was coming to an end. Growing demand for high-quality beef and new knowledge about the best feed enabled the cattle industry to shift to smaller scale ranches where a rancher could maintain a few hundred cattle, ensure that they were well fed and cared for, and bring them to market at the best moment.
The male world of the cowboys was replaced by ranch families. Men still did most of the work with the cattle while wives and daughters tended houses and gardens doing the “inside work.” But in isolated communities, rigid gender lines were hard to maintain. A woman who lived on a Wyoming ranch in 1899 wrote, “The heavy work of the ranch naturally falls to men, but I think most ranch women will bear me out in saying that unless the women... be always ready to do anything that comes along.. .the ranch is not a success.” Cowboys still worked on these ranches and urban Americans still ate beef, but the world of beef production and life on the plains was quite different than it had been only a short time before. Latino Resistance in the Southwest
Mary A. Fulgenzi, a long-time resident of San Miguel County in New Mexico Territory, recalled the time in the late 1880s when tensions in her county exploded:
In the early days of Las Vegas the wealthier people wanted to take possession of most of the lands. They fenced in any land they fancied, whether it belonged to them or not. The poor people also needed land to graze their stock and felt that they should have their share, for, according to the land grant, lands not allocated to individuals were to be used by the community in general.
Throughout much of the West, the battle between those who wanted to fence and control the land and those who wanted free grazing land for their herds was one of the great divides. The emergence of cheap barbed wire changed the face of the West. The specific details about contained and open grazing were different in different places and for
Chapter 16 Conflict in the West
16.1
16 J
Explore the New Economy of the West, 1850-1893 on
16.3
My HistoryLab
WHAT NEW ECONOMIC PATTERNS EMERGED IN THE WEST?
The second half of the 1800s brought quick expansion of the United States into the West. Railroads quickly spread across the region, spurring town development and creating a giant national marketplace that stretched from coast to coast. The federal government established post offices through the West to help further connect the nation. Settlers streamed from the East in search of cheap land on which to raise their crops and livestock. The West became an important agricultural region as farm products then moved along the railroad network linking western towns with eastern and international markets.
This patriotic lithograph, titled "Across the Continent—Westward the Course of Empire Takes Its Way," represents the expansion into the American West made possible by the nation's first transcontinental railway, which was completed in 1869.
GROWING POPULATION IN THE WEST
	1860	1890
Montana	N/A	142,924
Idaho	N/A	88,548
Wyoming	N/A	62,555
Colorado	34,277	413,249
New Mexico	93,516	160,282
Arizona	N/A	88,243
Utah	40,273	210,779
i Nevada	6,857	47,355
Washington	11,594	357,232
Oregon	52,465	317,704
California	379,994	1,213,398
Source: "United States Resident Population by State", http://lwd.dol.state.nj.us/ iabor/lpa/census/1990/poptrdl .htm
KEY QUESTIONS
Use MyHistoryLab Explorer to answer these questions: Cause ►►► How did railroad expansion shape population growth in the West?
Map the growth of the railroad network and the development of western towns and cities.
Analysis ►►► How did western agriculture develop during the late 1800s?
Map the importance of agricultural commodities produced in the West.
Response ►►► How did the federal government's presence manifest itself as settlers moved west?
Trace the spread of post offices.
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
different groups of people, but across the West there were clashes between those who wanted to fence off private property and those who wanted open prairies.
At the heart of the battle in San M^iguel County were two different views of the nature of land ownership. The majority of JMexicanos—as people of Nlexican descent in New Mexico preferred to be called at the time—saw themselves as las masas de los hombres pobres (the masses of the poor). Their assumption was that any land that was not specifically part of the home or the irrigated farmland of one family was held in common—open grazing land that all could use. By the 1880s, however, Anglo-Americans with very different views of land ownership were arriving after the Atchison, Topeka, and Santa Fe Railroad opened a line in 1879. Representatives of investors from the East Coast of the United States and from Britain, who could not imagine any alternative to private ownership of land, began buying up land and fencing off their property to create their own cattle ranches.
For some longtime residents, if the fences were threatening their way of life, the remedy was simple: get rid of the fences. When the ranchers did not comply with requests to take down their fences, a secret organization called the White Caps cut the fences, destroyed the posts, and opened the range again. In response to widespread fence cutting, the territorial governor requested federal troops. In spite of federal troops, most citizens of San Miguel County were sympathetic with the fence cutters. By the summer of 1890, San Miguel County’s dissidents were running for political office and soon controlled the balance of power between Republicans and Democrats in the territorial legislature. What had started as an outlaw movement had become part of the political process.
Latino resistance took different forms across the Southwest. In New Mexico, which retained a Mexicano majority well into the 1900s, it was possible for resistance to move into the political process and prevail. In Texas, where racial tensions were especially sharp and where the white majority grew rapidly, older Latino communities had fewer options. Police power rested with the Texas Rangers, who were seen by the Latino community as simply the force of the Anglo community. While the Rangers saw their opponents as outlaws, many in the Mexican-American community saw them as heroes. Perhaps most famous was the case of Gregorio Cortez (1875-1916) who came to Texas from the Mexican city of Matamoros. Cortez shot the sheriff of Manor, Texas, in 1901 when he tried to arrest Cortez for a crime he did not commit. After a long manhunt by the Texas Rangers, Cortez was arrested and sentenced to life in prison, but eventually pardoned by the governor of Texas. For generations, Latino songs and ballads—known as corridos—celebrated Cortez’s story within the Mexican-American community.
Mexican-American resistance also took other forms. Carlos Velasco immigrated from Sonora to Tucson, Arizona, and in 1878 launched El Fronterizo, one of many Spanish-language newspapers in the southwest. The paper continued to be published until 1914, successfully supporting the election of Mexican-Americans to local office and promoting Mexican customs, pride, and links across the international border. Farmers and Farm Towns
As the cattle industry was transitioning to a more settled ranching industry, farmers were also arriving on the Great Plains in numbers never before thought possible on the arid grasslands. Large numbers of them were responding to massive advertising by the railroads, who also owned much of the western lands. New techniques of farming enabled these farmers to cultivate areas where only buffalo herds had roamed only a short time before.
Those who began creating new homesteads and businesses as well as new lives in these lands of the West came from widely varying backgrounds. They included people of different faiths, Americans from eastern regions of the United States, immigrants from Europe and Mexico, former slaves, and Indians, among others.
Joseph Fish, a Mormon, lived a little upstream from Salt Lake City in the village of Parowan, Utah, where he worked as a miller and a tanner as well as farmed, exchanged work with neighbors, pulled sagebrush, built fences, and harvested wheat and oats to make his living.
Chapter 16 Conflict in the Wesi
IO
-"1
I
uj i
16.3
Gro and Ole Svendsen moved from Norway to Emmet County, Iowa, in 1863. Ole cut and sawed timber, broke ground, and harvested wheat. Gro made and sold butter and taught her children in Norwegian and English. Drops in agricultural prices and grasshoppers undermined their profits, but they carried on. For others, the challenges were too great. In the 1880s, a group of Ukrainian Jews created a utopian community in South Dakota, but the transition to the plains of South Dakota was too difficult and the community failed. Many other settlers and homesteaders also failed, and wagons traveling west to Kansas emblazoned with “Kansas or bust” met other returning wagons that said “Busted by gosh.” But people kept coming.
Thomas Johnson, a former slave from Kentucky, joined over 300 former slaves, known as Exodusters, in settling Nicodemus, Kansas, a town that was attracting people across the post-Reconstruction South with advertisements that said, “All Colored People that want to GO TO KANSAS, on September 5, 1877, Can do so for $5.00.” Initially, there was not much to this town. The wife of the first pastor said that she “began to cry” when she first saw it, but people stayed on, eventually building it up.
Rosie and Henry Ise arrived at a new homestead in Osborne County, Kansas, in 1873 with their team of horses and their small herd of cattle. The Ises were lucky. They were moving to an already established homestead that had a small cabin with a bed, a stove, and boxes for chairs. It also had a sod chicken house and a patch of corn, wheat, and oats already planted.
Mariano G. Samaniego moved north from the Mexican state of Sonora in the 1850s to Tucson, Arizona. He did not establish a homestead but opened a clothing store. Later, he earned a college degree from Saint Louis University and then expanded his business, supplying the Union army during the Civil War. By the 1880s, Samaniego shifted his focus to cattle ranching and was known as a respected leader of the Mexican community in Arizona.
Steven Arrow and Big Eagle took advantage of the Homestead Act and acquired their own homesteads in South Dakota, separate from the reservation land. They were an exception to

THINKING HISTORICALLY
Cutting Fences in New Mexico
As Los Gorras Blancas, or the White Caps, formed a secret militia and cut fences in an effort to retain the traditional communal grazing lands in the face of new development in San Miguel County, New Mexico, they also announced the reasons for their illegal activity. In March 1890, members of the organization rode through the town of Las Vegas, New Mexico, posting Nuestra Platforma, a platform announcing their goals that said:
Not wishing to be misunderstood, we hereby make this our declaration.
Our purpose is to protect the rights and interests of the people in general; especially those of the helpless classes.
We want the Las Vegas Grant settled to the benefit of all concerned, and this we hold is the entire community within the grant.
We want no "land grabbers" or obstructionists of any sort to interfere.
We will watch them.
There is a wide difference between New Mexico's "law" and "justice." And justice is God's law and that we must have at all hazards....Be fair and just and we are with you, do otherwise and take the consequences.
The White Caps, 1,500 Strong and Growing Daily
Source: Robert J. Rosenbaum, Mexicano Resistance in the Southwest (Dallas: Southern Methodist University Press, 1998), p. 166.
Thinking Critically
1.	Compare and Contrast
How do the "rights and interests" described in this platform fit with the "rights and interests" of private property that many new arrivals brought with them to New Mexico?
2.	Historical Interpretation
How does a Mexican-American perspective change or complicate the traditional story of the history of the West in the post-Civil War era?
70 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Many different people filed homestead claims, including Lizzie Chrisman and her three sisters, who established a daim and a sod hut in Nebraska in 1887.

the American Indian experience, but a Sioux Falls merchant said of the Sioux Homesteaders that they “gave more indication of civilization and industry and a show of living like white people than the same number of Norwegian families located a few miles below.”
Fifteen percent of homestead claims were filed by single women. Married women could not file their own claim, being already part of a household. Elinore Pruitt Stewart wrote,
any woman who can stand her own company, can see the beauty of the sunset, love growing things, and is willing to put in as much time at careful labor as she does over washtubs...will have independence, plenty to eat all the time and a home of her own in the end.
The move by farm families into the West was relatively steady. The Homestead Act of 1862 made 160-acre tracts available to those who settled, and Congress later allowed larger homesteads in the more barren lands. The railroads advertised for farmers to settle on their lands. James J. Hill arranged for the settlement of over 200,000 farmers on lands the Great Northern Railroad owned in Montana alone. People who had moved west wrote to friends and families and invited them to join them. Some farm families moved often in search of better prospects. Other families put down deep multigenerational roots, providing stability to their communities.
Farms and homesteads dotted Minnesota, Nebraska, Kansas, and northwestern Iowa in the 1860s as well as California, Oregon, and Washington territory. Stage coach and wagon transport companies maintained links between rail centers and the isolated farms and towns. Throughout the 1870s and 1880s, settlements continued to increase. Between 1881 and 1885, 67,000 new settlers claimed homesteads in North and South Dakota in the “Great Dakota Land Boom.” In 1889, homesteaders rushed in to Oklahoma when the federal government declared a large swath of the former Indian Territory to be separate from any tribal reservation and opened it to white settlement.
As farmers and small town businesses filled the land, Indians felt the pressure on their reservations. Some sold land under the provisions of the Dawes Act, while the government sold off other previously tribal lands. In addition, cattle ranchers were forced to confine herds that had previously roamed freely. Long-standing Mexican communities in west Texas, New Mexico, Arizona, and California lost economic and political power to newcomers who had little respect for the older inhabitants of the region. Even so, the number of new farmers kept growing. In 1850, there were 1.5 million farms in the United States, just 119,000 of them west of the Mississippi River. By 1910, there were 6.4 million farms in the nation, and a very large number of them west of the Mississippi.
Chapter 16 Conflict in the West 471
Successfully growing crops in these new areas required discovering which ones thrived best. While corn grew well in the eastern United States, the hot temperatures and the lack of water made it hard to grow in much of the West. Mennonite settlers brought Russian hard winter wheat with them, and in Kansas and the surrounding “Golden Belt,” this wheat became the staple crop by the 1880s. In other areas, spring wheat did better while, in the high plains, sorghum crops resisted drought well. Experimentation, luck, and watching what worked for the neighbors all were essential to the success of farming in areas never before farmed.
Farming was not for the poorest people. It cost money to start a farm, even the most modest homestead. An 1862 farm publication estimated that the cost of starting a farm was $968. Homesteaders had to cover expenses in getting a family to a new place as well as in breaking the sod, clearing forest, building fences, buying farm implements, purchasing livestock and seed, and building a house. Nevertheless, there were thousands, eventually hundreds of thousands, of American families who saved or borrowed funds and began the farms that fed much of the world and settled much of the North American continent.
Mining and Miners
The Gold Rush to California was the first rush of people to seek wealth in the minerals of the West, but it was far from the only mineral rush. As early as 1859, Henry Comstock found silver along the Carson River in Nevada, and thousands of California miners rushed east into Nevada to seek new opportunities for wealth. Comstock himself sold his claim, but corporate interests made fortunes in Nevada. In 1874, thousands of miners, many fresh from the now played-out California goldfields and the Nevada silver mines, made their way to the Black Hills of South Dakota. The land was part of the Sioux reservation, but neither the U.S. Army nor the Sioux were able to stop many of the more than 15,000 prospectors who had come for gold. Some of them got rich, many of them died in the effort, and all of them helped launch some of the most intense of the Plains Indian Wars.
Mining and the quest for mineral wealth continued to lead to fortunes and to death in the West. In 1882, a poor Irish immigrant, Marcus Daly, persuaded California investors to back his claim to a silver mine near Butte, Montana. Very little silver was ever found at the Anaconda mine, but it turned out to be one of the richest deposits of copper in the world, making millions for Daley, his backers, and the Anaconda Copper Company. Others found mining wealth in gold, silver, copper, and lead mines in Idaho, Montana, Colorado, and as far away as Arizona and Alaska. The mineral wealth of the West seemed endless, and many from around the world sought to find it, though only a very few gained any real wealth.
Seemingly overnight, new towns emerged wherever there was mining for copper, silver, and gold, including Carson City, Nevada; Deadwood, South Dakota; and Anaconda, Montana. Like the cattle towns, these overwhelmingly male mining towns made up of transients could be violent places where the smallest disagreement could erupt into violence. In addition, ethnic rivalries often divided the miners. As in California’s gold fields, Chinese miners were soon driven out of most mining operations, in spite of the fact that Chinese immigrants were 10 percent of Montana’s population and 25 percent of Idaho’s in the 1870s. When not driven out, the Chinese were forced to take low-level jobs working water cannons or doing laundry for other miners. Miners of European origin also drove Mexican-American miners out of the fields.
Mining was male work and typically did not lead to a settled life. In 1860, the mining camps of Virginia City and Gold Hill, Nevada, reported a population of 2,300 men and 30 women. The towns also reflected the transient nature of the population. In 1879 Leadville, Colorado, had four banks, four churches, and 120 saloons, plus a fair share of brothels. While some mining towns later became important commercial centers, many soon became empty ghost towns once the mining played out.
Most prospectors sought wealth from their individual discoveries, but most of the money in mining was made by large corporations like the Anaconda Copper Company that could afford expensive mining equipment to extract deeply buried ore.
Work in the mines dangerous. Jobs were often divided by ethnicity, with Chinese and ^72 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914

Latino miners given the least-skilled and lowest paying jobs and miners from Europe getting the better paying positions. Nevertheless, with little attention to safety, all of the miners faced explosions, floods, cave-ins, and asphyxiation from poisonous gasses. Only the emergence of new unions among the miners began to address the dangers, if not the ethnic divides, in the 1890s (see Chapter 18).
Outlaws, Gunfighters, and Mythmakers—Legends of the Old West
The West of the late 1800s could be a very violent place. Contrary to Hollywood images, cowboys and Indians tended to keep their distance from each other. It was the army that fought the Indian wars, not the cowboys. But there was plenty of violence among whites. Ranch owners and land developers hired professional gunfighters to eliminate people they saw as troublemakers. Angry people on the margins, or those pushed to the margins of society, struck back violently, cutting fences in New Mexico or becoming outlaws and counting on the vast distances and easy anonymity of the West to protect them. Cowboys in town at the end of a long and dull cattle ride shot each other. Much of the violence was local and personal, some was between people wanting very different development in the region, especially between cattle ranchers and farmers, and some was also a carryover from the Civil War.
In Tombstone, Arizona, the local elite hired Wyatt Earp and his brothers, Virgil, Morgan, and Warren, along with Doc Holliday to make the town safe enough to encourage investors from California and the East Coast. The local elite and the Earp brothers all had strong Union Army and Republican Party connections. They were bothered by an outlaw group, ex-Confederate cattle rustlers led by the Clanton brothers and McLaury families. On October 26, 1881, at the O.K. Corral, the two sides met. Both Clanton brothers and one of the McLaurys were killed, and Tombstone became a more respectable place.
Another crime wave took place in Missouri, Kansas, Oklahoma, and Arkansas. During the Civil War, Confederate raiders led by William Quantrill and including Jesse and Frank James terrorized Union supporters in Missouri and Kansas (see Chapter 15). Quantrill was killed before the war ended, but the James brothers continued a long reign as postwar outlaws, starting with a bank robbery at Liberty, Missouri, on February 13, 1866, and continuing in the new and lucrative arena of train robberies well into the 1880s. Many robbers like the James brothers found widespread, though quiet, support by farm families who would never attempt illegal behavior but who hated the railroads and the large commercial ranchers. These families privately cheered when those more powerful forces suffered losses at the hands of these outlaws, however violent and self-serving the particular rebels might be.
In New Mexico, the so-called Lincoln County War of 1878 pitted two groups of ranchers seeking to dominate the county. Both hired outlaws, one of whom was a young teenager named Henry McCarty who changed his name to William Bonney (a famous pirate) and who came to be known as “the Kid.” After the Lincoln County War ended, the hired outlaws drifted away. After trying unsuccessfully to find honest work, and after being promised a pardon but then having it revoked by New Mexico’s governor, “the Kid” turned to cattle rustling and robbery until he was shot by Lincoln County Sheriff Pat Garrett. But Billy the Kid, who was 21 when he died, had killed 10 people in his short and violent life. His legend grew far beyond his life as a whole publishing industry came to thrive on the retelling and expansion of his legend.
Stories of gunfighters like Billy the Kid and Wyatt Earp became legends of the American West, but the person who did the most to create the legend of the Wild West was a former army scout named William Cody who created his highly successful Buffalo Bill’s Wild West Show in the 1880s. According to his autobiography, Cody was born in Iowa in 1846, but his family soon moved to Kansas where his father was killed by the “border ruffians” from Missouri in the battles of “Bleeding Kansas. Cody took a job herding cattle to support his family when he was 11 years old. During the Civil War, he was part of a local militia that protected the territory from attacks by Quantrill and the James brothers. Later, he hunted buffalo and served as a scout. On one occasion, Cody scouted for a party that included James Gorden Bennett of the New York Herald, one of
Chapter 16 Conflict in the West
Creede, Colorado, was a typical western mining town with quickly built buildings and a transient, virtually all-male population.
Annie Oakley (1860-1926) won fame for her shooting ability and often traveled with Buffalo Bill's Wild West show.
the nation’s great publicists. Bennett fictionalized Cody as the hero of one of the popular dime novels of the time, Buffalo Bill: the King of the Border Men, which gave Cody the chance to launch his “Wild West, Rocky Mountain, and Prairie Exhibition.”
Buffalo Bill’s Wild West Show was everything eastern crowds wanted it to be. It included scenes from Indian battles, Indian dancing, stagecoach robberies, and always the shooting prowess of Annie Oakley, who epitomized the “good” frontier woman of wholesome character who could outshoot any man. In the 1880s, Sitting Bull himself traveled with the show, giving it an “authentic” aura for many who were anxious to see the leader who had defeated Custer in 1876.
The Wild West show was a long way from any true representation of the West. Although the Indians performed amazing feats of horseback riding, they nearly always ended up fulfilling stereotypical images in the minds of their white audiences. Similarly, while the true cowboys were an ethnically diverse lot—white, Mexican, Indian, and African-American—all of Cody’s cowboys were white. The U.S. Army units in the show were also white, in spite of the active role of African-American Buffalo soldiers in the West. Annie Oakley, who was an amazing shot with a rifle, lived in Ohio and never traveled further west except on tour with the show. Indians almost never had the battles with the cowboys that Cody portrayed; Indians fought with the army, and cowboys avoided those battles. However, Indians facing desperate poverty on the reservations found work in the shows that brought needed income, and they were allowed to dance traditional dances in the shows that were banned by federal authorities on the reservations.
Cody’s shows were performed all across the United States and in Europe, twice before Queen Victoria, and one of his riders performed in Outer Mongolia. Prince Albert I of Monaco came to Cody, Wyoming, to hunt with Buffalo Bill. When the show declined in popularity, Cody reinvented himself once again as an advisor to the new Hollywood studios—as did Wyatt Earp—on “realistic” ways to portray the old West in the new medium that was sweeping the nation. In the process, an image of the Wild West was formed that still persists.
Becoming States
For much of the 1880s, much of the western United States was organized into territories that were directly controlled by the federal government rather than as states that sent senators and representatives to Congress and voted in presidential elections.
^74 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
California was admitted, in 1850, just after the war with Nlexico and the discovery of gold. Minnesota was admitted in 1858 and Oregon in 1859. Kansas became a state in
1861,	Nevada in 1864, Nebraska in 1867, and Colorado in 1876. More than a decade later, in 1889 and 1890, six new western states were all admitted almost at once—the former territories of North Dakota, South Dakota, Montana, Washington, Idaho, and Wyoming. Utah was admitted in 1896, Oklahoma in 1907, and New Mexico and Arizona in 1912. Several unique issues account for the time lags.
In some cases, local elites found that they could prosper by controlling the federal appointments and federal funds in their territory while bypassing the democratic processes that statehood brought. Many in Congress also liked, and profited from, these arrangements. Ihe federal government owned much of the land in western states, and until the Indian wars came to an end, the U.S. Army was the chief protector of western citizens. Ihe U.S. Geological Survey and the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers mapped and shaped the land of the West. Through the territorial stages and beyond, the federal government was a more important part of life in the West than in the East.
Some of the states posed unique issues. Long before it was admitted as a state, the territorial legislature in Wyoming granted the 1,200 women living in the territory the right to vote. When Wyoming became a state in 1890, it also became the first state to grant women the right to vote, allowing women in Wyoming to vote for president while their sisters elsewhere could not. Three years later, the State of Colorado granted women the right to vote. After that, campaigns for women’s votes stalled. A commitment to women’s rights was not universal in the West, but it was more popular there than elsewhere (see Map 16-4).
A more complicated issue arose in Utah and delayed statehood for years. The area around the Great Salt Lake had been settled by Mormon families in 1846 and 1847 when it was still part of Mexico (see Chapter 10). After the region became part of the United States in 1848, the federal government initially left the Mormons on their own, and Brigham Young served as territorial governor as well as spiritual leader. However, in the late 1850s, President Buchanan forced Young out of office and appointed a non-Mormon governor.
The issue for Buchanan was the Mormon commitment to plural marriage. Mormon men—but not Mormon women—were encouraged to take more than one spouse. The majority of Mormon men had only one wife, but a significant number had two, and Brigham Young himself had 27 wives and 56 children. As with more traditional families, some extended Mormon families succeeded quite well while others were torn. When questioned, the majority of Mormon women, including women whose husbands had other wives, defended their arrangement.
Plural marriage horrified most people in the rest of the United States, however. While Presidents Lincoln and Johnson had been too preoccupied with war and Reconstruction to worry much about the Mormons, Presidents Grant, Hayes, Garfield, and Arthur all promised to deal with the “Mormon Question.” As early as
1862,	Congress passed the Morrill Anti-Bigamy Act, making it a federal crime to take multiple wives, but Utah was far away and Mormon juries were not about to convict anyone accused of that crime.
In spite of all of the controversy and hostility generated by the issue of plural marriage, the Mormon community prospered. By the 1860s, there were enough people living in Utah Territory to qualify for statehood. By 1870, the population stood at 87,000. Unlike other parts of the West, where white men far outnumbered white women, Utah had a balanced gender ratio. Women and men prospered in a community of strict morality and hard work, including work for women outside of the household. Women ran their own industries, cooperative stores, as well as relief societies and charities.
The rest of the United States remained dissatisfied with Utah’s practices, however, and eventually, the Mormon leadership decided that statehood was more important than maintaining plural marriage. In 1890, the Mormon Church announced the end of plural marriage, and although there were those who continued to practice it, the majority of members went along with the decision. With that key issue resolved, Utah
16.1
IO
163
Chapter 16 Conflict in the We:
was admitted as a state in 1896. One of the first moves by the new state legislature was to, again, give women the right to vote and hold office, making Utah the third state, after Wyoming and Colorado, to do so.
Issues of race delayed the admission of the last three western states. Oklahoma had been established as Indian Territory when Andrew Jackson’s Indian removal policies forced some northern tribes and the five southeastern tribes to move there. By the late 1800s, the tribes had put down roots, developed new communities, and were thriving. Other western tribes had also been forced to settle in Indian Territory. Nevertheless, the Dawes Act and other federal policies opened much of the western part of the territory to white settlement. In 1905, representatives of the tribes proposed establishing two separate states—Sequoyah in the eastern portion would be made up of the Indian Reservations. Oklahoma in the west would be made up of the white areas. Indiana Senator Albert J. Beveridge, Chair of the Senate Committee on Territories wanted to have just one territory dominated by “Americans,” by which he did not mean Indians, and President Theodore Roosevelt agreed. Oklahoma was admitted in 1907 as a single state.
The Territory of New Mexico initially included all of Arizona and New Mexico. The population quickly reached the level required for statehood but, unlike the other areas acquired from Mexico, especially Texas and California, the majority of the people living
NUMBER OF CHILDREN
(per woman) MAP 16-4 Early States Granting Women Suffrage. Before 1920, a number of states, especially in the West, granted women the right to vote as indicated on this map.
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
in New Mexico Territory were of Mexican descent. In spite of the fact that they were now U.S. citizens, Congress was not prepared to admit a self-governing state with a Mexican-American majority. In 1902, Senator Beveridge proposed uniting them again and admitting them as a single state since that would ensure a larger “American” (or non-Mexican) population, but that proposal failed. President William Howard Taft signed legislation in 1912 admitting New Mexico and Arizona as the 47th and 48th states of the Union.
Well before New Mexico and Arizona became states, the political, economic, and cultural shape of the vast region known as the West was settled. The original inhabitants who had fought with each other and with whites and had hunted buffalo across the plains or lived comfortably on the rich resources of the Pacific Coast were moved to distant reservations where they were alternatively ignored and challenged by federal authorities while building new cultures for themselves and the surrounding communities. By 1900, much of the West was divided into settled communities of farms, large and small, and growing towns connected by railroads. There was still plenty of desolate empty country to be found, but the West of the 1800s was a receding memory.
Quick Review What were the major concerns involved in admitting new states in the West? How were these issues similar to or different from those involved in admitting states in the East?
CONCLUSION
Ihe American West changed dramatically between 1865 and 1890. In the midst of the Civil War, Abraham Lincoln had urged tribal leaders to adopt the “peaceful ways of the white people,” without noticing the irony of such a plea in the midst of the Civil War. Ihe end of the Civil War brought two of the most violent decades in the West as units of the U.S. Army fought with various tribes trying to force the Native Americans to give up their traditional hunting and nomadic ways to settle on reservations. By the 1890s, conflict between whites and Indian tribes was over as tribes were defeated and moved into ever-shrinking reservations. While the impacts of white settlement and the Civil War on American Indians varied from tribe to tribe, in the long run, they were a disaster.
After the Civil War, white ranchers, farmers, and miners built new settlements across the West. What began as great cattle ranches were replaced by smaller farms producing beef and wheat for national and world markets. Ihe agricultural developments of the post-Civil War era depended on new technologies—most importantly, railroads that brought supplies to isolated farmers and shipped their products to world markets. What had once been isolated regional economies quickly became part of a national and international commercial network because of railroads, and the United States was connected to the world as never before. As more and more people settled the West, access to vast regions for grazing cattle became limited and tensions began to mount. Still, the West was largely rural, and disputes were often settled by hiring outlaws rather than by more traditional means. Farmers came to the West for many reasons, including the desire for land, the search for better economic opportunities than were available in the East, and a longing for adventure. Although most farmers established homesteads in hopes of establishing permanent roots, mining towns sprang up around impermanent mines, and they were often violent places.
Once a distant frontier, by 1890, the American West was becoming part of the nation’s cultural, economic, and political networks and by 1912 the last of the western territories had become a state. The large areas that had been governed as territories were not settled and populated enough to be considered as states, but some of these areas posed unique issues. However, despite debates over economic issues, voting rights of women, concern about the plural marriage of Mormon communities, and the racial diversity of parts of the Southwest, all of the once isolated territory of the American West had been divided into new states that were admitted to the Union by 1912.
CHAPTER
How do the typical depictions of the American West in the late 1800s differ from
the realities of life in the region?
Chapter 16 Conflict in the West
Chapter 16 Chapter Review
16.1
!

THE TRIBES OF THE WEST AND THE U.S. GOVERNMENT
Explain western development from an Indian perspective and the way Indian and white cultures shaped each other.
Review Questions
1.	Cause and Effect
What new opportunities did the Civil War create for the Comanche people?
2.	Contextualization
What does the Ghost Dance phenomenon tell us about how the Sioux of the 1890s saw their recent history?
3.	Historical Interpretation
Why did the U.S. government come to believe that it needed new approaches to Indian policy in the 1870s and 1880s? Whose interests did the new policies serve?
THE IMPACT OF THE TRANSCONTINENTAL RAILROAD,
1869 Analyze the building of transcontinental railroads and its impact on the nation, especially the West.
16.2
16.3
5.	Craft an Argument
What factors might explain the widespread support for a transcontinental railroad in the 1850s and 1860s?
THE TRANSFORMATION OF THE WEST__________________________
Analyze how indigenous people, ranchers, farmers, miners, outlaws, politicians, and mythmakers shaped the West and our understanding of its history.
Review Questions
6.	Cause and Effect
What factors contributed to the boom in cattle ranching in the second half of the 1800s?
7.	Contextualization
What motives brought white farmers to the West in the decades following the Civil War?
8.	Historical Interpretation
How did issues of race and gender impact the admission of western states into the Union?
Review Questions
4.	Historical Interpretation
How did railroads contribute to the growth of a national economy?
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
If anything symbolized the new industrial might that began to characterize the United States in the Gilded Age, it was the production of steel at one of Andrew Carnegie's plants.
On May 10, 1876, Ulysses S. Grant, then in his 8th year as president, traveled to Philadelphia to open the Centennial International Exhibition of Industry. The event celebrated the 100th anniversary of the signing of the Declaration of Independence with a massive show of the nation’s progress in science, technology, and industry. The exhibition covered 285 acres on the banks of Philadelphia’s Schuylkill River and included pavilions from each state and from many foreign countries. Among them, Colorado and Kansas displayed corn 20 feet high, and Germany displayed a giant artillery piece from the Krupp works. Between the pavilions were refreshment stands selling popcorn, waffles, soda water, root beer, and German lager bier as well as a fountain built by the Sons of Temperance, which was serving ice water. The focus was on the great mechanical achievements of the United States, symbolized by the giant Corliss steam engine that provided power for all the exhibits in Machinery Hall and that seemed to be without vibration or noise (because its boiler was outside the building) as well as by the many mowers, reapers, sewing machines, typewriters, fans for ventilating mines, and the Pullman sleeping cars. Most of all, the fair told the world that the United States had arrived as a manufacturing and technological giant.
The event represented a cross-section of the nation in 1876, both as it was and as it wanted to be, filled with new inventions, including Alexander Graham Bell’s new telephone, which Bell demonstrated to
CHAPTER OBJECTIVE
Understand how the United States became an industrial giant, at what cost, and with what impact on its diverse peoples and cultures.
LEARNING OBJECTIVES
TECHNOLOGY CHANGES THE NATION
Explain the inventions of the late 1800s and their impact.
CORPORATIONS AND MONOPOLIES
Analyze the role of the new giant corporations in American life.
LIVES OF THE MIDDLE CLASS IN THE GILDED AGE
Analyze daily life, popular ideas, and political direction for the middle class during the Gilded Age.
IMMIGRATION
Explain the reasons immigrants came to the United States in such large numbers during the Gilded Age and what their experience was.
Chanter 17 The Gilded Aqe: Building a Technological and Industrial Giant and a New Social Order
17.1
17 J
173
17.4
Significant Dates
1859 Edwin Drake discovers oil in Titusville, Pennsylvania
1870	Standard Oil Company launched by John D. Rockefeller and Henry M. Flagler
1871	Thomas Edison demonstrates Universal Stock Printer
Treaty of Washington settles U.S.-Canadian border and claims between United States and Britain
1873	Panic of 1873—Economic panic and
depression
Senate rejects United States acquisition of Dominican Republic
1875	Dwight L. Moody launches religious revivals
1876	Alexander Graham Bell patents the telephone
Thomas Edison establishes research laboratory in Menlo Park, New Jersey
President Grant opens Philadelphia Centennial Exhibition
1877	Cornelius Vanderbilt, richest man in America, dies in New York City
1878	Edison demonstrates new phonograph
1879	Edison's first successful incandescent lamp burns for 16 hours on November 17
1882	Edison Illuminating Company lights
southern Manhattan Chinese Exclusion Act
1886/1888 George Westinghouse and Nikola Tesla discover alternating current to transmit electricity
1887	First Electronic Trolley cars built
1890	Greatly increased immigration from
Eastern Europe and Asia begins
1892	Ellis Island immigration station opens in New York Harbor
1893	Panic of 1893—Major U.S. depression 1896 Edison demonstrates first moving pictures
U.S.
Steel becomes the largest corporation in history 1902	Victor Talking Machine Company begins mass producing recording disks
1903	Wright Brothers make first flight at Kitty Hawk, North Carolina
1913 Henry Ford's moving assembly line begins operation at Highland Park, Michigan
an appreciative audience that included the Emperor of Brazil. It was a fitting opening to an era in which business, manufacturing, and technology would dominate the nation’s political, economic, and cultural life, bringing prosperity and power that was previously unimagined. It would also hring clashes between those who benefited and those who did not, which frightened many and nearly tore the nation apart. This chapter explores how the nation came to be that giant, at what cost to its people and the world, and with what results in the culture—or, rather, the many different cultures—of the country.
TECHNOLOGY CHANGES THE NATION
17.1
Explain the inventions of the late 1800s and their impact.
Alexander Graham Bell saw himself as a teacher more than an inventor. While teaching deaf students at Boston University, Bell sought new ways to help deaf people hear. In July 1874, he discovered that if a person were to speak into a vibrating set of reeds, it created a fluctuating current that could, at the other end of an electronic wire, be turned back into the same sound through another set of tuned reeds. He patented his new invention in March 1876 and demonstrated it first by calling his assistant Thomas Watson from the next room. Later, he showed it at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology and then at the World’s Fair. While Bell returned to teaching, others organized the Bell Telephone Company. By 1880, there were 30,000 telephone subscribers. By 1900, the number had grown to 1.3 million, and by 1920, to 13 million. In four decades, Bells experiment had become a necessity of modern life. For most Americans, the telephone replaced the telegraph, developed by Samuel F. B. Morse from earlier inventions in 1835. By the 1840s, telegraphs were relaying messages and news in Morse code, consisting of dot and dash signals, over miles of telegraph wires—215,000 miles of wires by 1900. But the telephone quickly made the telegraph outdated.
Before Bell gained fame for his telephone, Thomas Edison was already on his way to being known as the greatest inventor of the era. Edison was born in Milan, Ohio, in 1847, the same year as Bell. At 16, with little formal schooling, he became a telegraph transmitter. Several people in the telegraph industry were trying to design what they called a “diplex,” a way to send two messages—one in each direction—on the same telegraph wire at the same time. In 1873, Edison produced both a diplex and a quadruplex that could send two messages simultaneously each way on a single wire, greatly increasing the value of every telegraph line in the nation and securing Edison’s fame and fortune. While he was toying with that invention, Edison had also invented the Edison Universal Stock Printer in 1871, a greatly improved version of the stock ticker tape machine.
In 1876, Edison established an independent research laboratory at Menlo Park, New Jersey. The many employees there were made to understand that they worked only at Edison’s direction and he got all of the credit. Eventually, he had 1,000 patents to his name, thus becoming the most productive American inventor of all time. He tinkered with ways to record a human voice and music. On April 18, 1878, he demonstrated his new phonograph at the National Academy of Sciences in Washington, DC and, later that night, at a midnight show at the White House.
Edison’s most important invention was the electric light bulb. In the 1870s, large meeting halls were lit by arc lamps, and gas lights were popular in many places. The rest of the nation—city as well as country—depended on kerosene lamps or candles when the sun went down. The electric light bulb changed things across the country. Given Edison’s fame, he was able to assemble a consortium of financiers, led by J. Pierpont Morgan, to support his research. After toying with different options, the Edison labs created a bulb that lit a room for 16 hours on November 17,1879. Almost immediately, everyone wanted electric lights, and Edison wanted everyone to have Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
ki
80
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World
them. He made London, Paris, and New York the priority cities because he knew that what happened in those places would quickly be reported elsewhere. Within 2 years, all three cities had buildings lit by electric lights. On September 4, 1882, Edison pulled the switch that lit a number of buildings in southern Manhattan, including the House of Morgan, the New York Stock Exchange, and the headquarters of the New York Times and New York Herald.
The inventions just kept coming. George Westinghouse and Nikola Tesla found that alternating current was a much more efficient way to transmit electricity than the direct current that Edison used. Edison was initially skeptical, but by the 1890s, alternating current produced at generating plants from New York to California was powering much of the nation. Frank J. Sprague introduced the first electric streetcars in Richmond, Virginia, in 1888, and these cars, which were cheaper and cleaner and safer than horse-drawn or steam cars, caught on quickly.
In 1892, the General Edison Electric Company merged with a rival to create General Electric, the company that not only produced light bulbs but also all things electric. By 1896, using film developed by George Eastman of Rochester, New York,
Edison moved from small-scale to large-screen moving pictures, and in 1902, the Victor Talking Machine Company began mass-producing recording disks and players. The country was radically different because of Edison’s work and that of other prolific inventors who gave the country elevators invented by Elisha G. Otis, machine tools from Pratt and Whitney, steam boilers from Babcock and Wilcox, newspaper linotype compositors, and typewriters. A total of 440,000 patents issued between 1860 and 1890 transformed modern life.
In the 1890s, a number of independent manufacturers began experimenting with gasoline-powered vehicles, putting a gasoline engine on bicycles or carriages, which led to automobiles. Although by 1899 only 2,500 automobiles were produced per year, many were predicting that the new vehicles would replace horse-drawn carriages.
They were right. By 1916, 1 million automobiles were produced in the United States, which created massive change as work with horses declined and a new set of jobs in the automobile industry began as more and more Americans experienced the freedom that an automobile gave them.
The key to the vastly expanded production of automobiles was the vehicle itself, which was relatively simple, given other inventions that existed. Rather, expanded production was possible only after inventing a way to produce large numbers of cars at low cost. The genius who revolutionized the production of automobiles was Henry Ford. Ford, a former machinist, built his first automobile in 1896 after many others had done so, but it was his invention of the assembly line that made possible the mass-production of cars at reasonable costs. Ford took the idea of interchangeable parts, first developed for guns by Eli Whitney, and applied it to cars. Then he created a process whereby those parts could be assembled in a routinized fashion that greatly speeded production, thus lowering cost, even if it made the role of most workers extremely boring.
Ford opened a plant for the production of the Model T Ford in Highland Park,
Michigan, in 1910 and added a moving assembly line in 1913. Each worker was assigned one small task to be repeated over and over. As Ford described it, “Every piece of work in the shop moves. There is no lifting or trucking of anything other than materials.” Worker after worker did his assigned task over and over again. At the end of the process, a fully assembled Model T emerged from the assembly line. Ford paid his workers well. He had to. They found the work mind numbing, but valued the pay—high enough that they, too, could afford their own Model T. He transformed an industry, bringing the cost of an automobile to within the reach of many Americans and spawning a whole set of new industries from highway construction to automobile repairs. The success of the automobile dramatically expanded the nation s need for oil, now refined into gasoline to power the rapidly growing numbers of vehicles (see Table 17-1).
Chapter 17 The Gilded Age: Building a Technological and Industrial Giant and a New Social Order
Gilded Age
Term applied to America in the late 1800s that refers to the shallow display and worship of wealth characteristic of the period.
TABLE 17-1 Factory Sales of Passenger Cars per Year
Year	Numbers of Vehicles Sold
1900	j	4,100
1905	24,200
1910	181,100
1915	895,000
1920	1,905,500
I
J
While Ford, Walter Chrysler, and the founders of General Motors were creating the automobile industry in Detroit, Michigan, other inventors were tinkering with additional ways to advance transportation. Wilbur and Orville Wright, two bicycle makers from Dayton, Ohio, were determined to develop a flying machine. On December 17,1903, on a deserted beach at Kitty Hawk, North Carolina, their machine took off. By 1908, Orville Wright had a contract with the Army Signal Corps to conduct test flights at Fort Myer, Virginia. The Wright brothers conducted test flights around the country, including Los Angeles and Chicago. Air travel did not transform the lives of most Americans as quickly as the automobile because it remained inefficient and dangerous for some time. Nevertheless, watching people actually leave the ground on machines confirmed for many that, in the realm of technology, anything was possible.
17.1
Quick Review How did the inventions of the late 1800s and early 1900s better connect the nation?
CORPORATIONS AND MONOPOLIES
Analyze the role of the new giant corporations in American life.
The kinds of inventions that were appearing in the 1880s and 1890s, like the earlier railroads and telegraph systems, could not be produced by a family business. Railroads crossed the continent. Electric generation required huge investments. Telephones were useful primarily if they connected large numbers of people. Most of the country’s earliest corporations had been for public benefit—building universities and hospitals—or for temporary partnerships for specific ventures. New corporate structures emerged during the Jacksonian era in response to larger, more expensive ventures to process cotton and manufacture other materials. After the Civil War, those corporate structures achieved a level of size and power undreamed of by earlier generations of manufacturers. Managing the investments involved in the great new industries also required a new kind of financing. In the absence of a federal bank—nothing had replaced the Bank of the United States that Jackson had abolished in the 1830s (see Chapter 10)-private bankers played an increasingly important role. Post-Civil War corporations and banks were of a size and a level of power the nation had not seen before. They made a few Americans extremely wealthy—richer than any American ever had been before—and they made other Americans very nervous about the new concentrations of wealth and the accompanying power. The outsized wealth of the era, sometimes lavishly spent, inspired the humorist Mark Twain to name this post-Civil War era the “Gilded Age,” a reference to coating items with gold. For some, the Gilded Age produced an excess of money, taste, and power; for others, it created poverty.
482 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Financing and Controlling the Railroads—Jay Cooke, Cornelius Vanderbilt, and Others
At the end of the Civil War, the most powerful banker in the United States was Jay Cooke, who saved the Union’s finances during the war (see Chapter 14). In the early 1870s, however, he almost wrecked the nations economy.
Cooke financed the Northern Pacific Railroad (see Chapter 16), telling European investors that a rail line from Duluth, Minnesota, to the Pacific coast would connect the world’s breadbasket to shipping across the Pacific and across the Atlantic. He insisted, “There is nothing on the American continent equal to it....There is no end to the possibilities of wealth here.” The promise of wealth was enticing, and investment poured in. However, there were too many railroads, and few were making profits. At the same time, the end of the seemingly faraway Franco-Prussian War (1870-1871) caused world grain prices to drop precipitously as European countries produced more of their own wheat. The result was further reduced profit on the rail lines that hauled American wheat. A government investigation into the Union Pacific Railroad’s shaky finances during this period undermined public confidence in rail investments. As a result, Cooke could neither sell new railroad bonds nor meet obligations on the old ones. On September 18, 1873, Jay Cooke and Company declared bankruptcy and closed its doors.
The news that the nation’s most prestigious banker could not meet his obligations undermined financial confidence, launching what was known as the Panic of 1873. The Nation magazine described Wall Street: “Great crowds of men rushed to and fro trying to get rid of their property, almost begging people to take it from them at any price.” The Stock Exchange closed for 10 days. Banks collapsed. Railroad construction stopped. By 1874,500,000 people had lost their jobs, and breadlines were seen not only in New York but also wherever railroad construction and the demand for steel rails, wooden ties, or products that moved by rail had been boosting the economy. The depression of 1873 demonstrated the boom-and-bust cycle of the new economy and the degree to which railroads and banking connected all parts of the nation’s financial structure.
As the economy recovered after 1873, the man who profited more than any other was already very rich Cornelius Vanderbilt. After Robert Fulton invented the steamboat in 1807, Vanderbilt created a steamboat empire, first in New York Harbor, and then around the world. After 1815, Vanderbilt’s steamers began to travel to Boston, New Orleans, and—during the California gold rush—to Nicaragua to meet other steamers that took gold seekers up the coast to California. Controlling the transit to California was far more profitable than seeking gold there. His style of doing business was illustrated on one occasion when, in an argument with competitors he said, “Gentlemen: You have undertaken to cheat me. I won’t sue you, for the law takes too long. I will ruin you.” During the Civil War, Vanderbilt kept his ships moving between New York and Union-held New Orleans and beyond to South America in spite of Confederate efforts to stop them.
After the Civil War,.Vanderbilt shifted from steamships to railroads. Vanderbilt did not build railroads; he bought them. In addition, he created new and much more profitable ways to manage them. Vanderbilt created corporations of a size not previously known in the United States and launched a managerial revolution. The corporations that Vanderbilt led involved levels of managers reporting to powerful central offices. The new bureaucracies could ensure safety: trains that ran on schedule were less likely to collide, and trains that ran on well-laid tracks were less likely to derail. They also created great new wealth even as they reduced the role of any one individual manager or boss. Vanderbilt was hardly alone in fostering either of these developments, but he was certainly an innovative leader.
In 1863, Vanderbilt bought a major interest in the New York & Harlem Railroad, a small line that ran to the heart of Manhattan. Vanderbilt improved its tracks, cars, and service and purchased the connecting Hudson River Railroad. Then in 1867, he forced
17.2
Panic of 1873
A major economic downturn, launched when the country's leading financier, Jay Cooke, went bankrupt during which thousands lost their jobs and from which the country took years to recover.
Chapter 17 The Gilded Age: Building a Technological and Industrial Giant and a New Social Order 41
the directors of the state’s largest railroad, the New York Central, to sell to him or be shut out of New York City. His New York Central Railroad empire made Cornelius Vanderbilt the richest man in America when he died in 1877.
Others also became major speculators in the United States in the 1860s and 1870s. Daniel Drew, along with Jay Gould and Jim Fisk, came to be known as corporate pirates. They simply extracted wealth from a company. As a young man, Drew herded cattle from farms to slaughterhouses. He once claimed to have perfected a technique of feeding salt to his cattle and then, just before reaching the slaughterhouses, giving them all the water they wanted so they would arrive looking plump and, thus, fetch a good price. In later life, he certainly did the same thing with stocks: buying companies, issuing stock far beyond the company’s value—called watering the stock in honor of his experience with cattle—and then leaving the company almost bankrupt while he walked away with the profit from the stock sales.
Later, in 1869 Drew, Gould, and Fisk teamed up to corner the nation’s gold supply (see Chapter 15). First, they convinced President Grant to appoint Daniel Butterfield to the key treasury post overseeing the nation’s gold supply. They then bribed Butterfield to join in their conspiracy. As they kept buying and hoarding gold, the price kept going up and up because of the demand they were creating. Grant discovered, or at least guessed, what Butterfield and the trio were up to, and he ordered the government to sell up to $4 million in gold, bringing the price back down. The trio sold their gold just before Grant issued his order. Although they no longer controlled the gold supply, they emerged very well-off. Many others who had invested in gold were ruined, and what became known as “Black Friday” created a significant drag on the nation’s economy. Henry Adams, grandson and great-grandson of presidents, who was just beginning his own career as one of the nation’s major intellectuals, wrote:
For the first time since the creation of these enormous corporate bodies, one of them has shown its power for mischief, and has proved itself able to override and trample on law, custom, decency, and every restraint known to society, without scruple, and as yet without check.
It would be another 30 years before there were effective checks on the corporate gamblers.
The fortunes that the Vanderbilts, Drews, and others like them made in the 1870s and 1880s allowed them to spend lavishly, creating the public image of gilding a lily— a flower that when cut would be thrown away in a few days—with gold, a lot of gold. In grand parties in New York and at summer “cottages” or mansions in Newport, Rhode Island, or elsewhere, they showed off their wealth to the delight of some and the disgust of others.
New Industries: Rockefeller's Oil, Carnegie's Steel, and Morgan's Banking
Before the 1800s were over, however, a new generation of corporate leaders exceeded the most optimistic hopes of the Vanderbilts and their generation. Among them was John D. Rockefeller, who, though he did not discover any oil nor invent new ways to refine oil into kerosene or gasoline, did discover new ways to make money from oil, amassing more money from the fuel than anyone had previously imagined possible. Mark Hanna, a childhood friend who later became President McKinley’s closest advisor, remembered saying of John D. that he was “sane in every respect save one—he was money mad!”
When Rockefeller was 20 years old, he heard news that got as much national attention as John Brown’s raid on Harper’s Ferry that same year. On August 28,1859, Edwin Drake struck oil while drilling a well near Titusville, Pennsylvania. “Rock oil” as the oil that came from the ground was called (as opposed to whale oil and oil refined from coal), was in great demand. Before the invention of electric lights in 1879, kerosene lights were the brightest and most popular form of illumination. They were significantly
84 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
U ' *'
■a


■■■
*Fji
John D. Rockefeller (1839-1937) created the Standard Oil Company which came to have monopoly control of the sales of oil in the United States making Rockefeller an extraordinarily rich man as he drove competitors out of business.
brighter than candles and safer than gas lights. With kerosene lights, families could read in the evening, and the mills could start earlier and operate later. In addition, the machinery that the country was using, from railway engines to factory presses and looms, needed to be lubricated with oil to avoid seizing up. However, the oil had been scarce and expensive. Drake’s oil well significantly changed the potential supply of oil.
A rush ensued to sink oil wells in western Pennsylvania. Rockefeller, however, did not like the dirt or the risk of drilling in which some struck it rich while others with a dry well or two went bankrupt. (He also did not like the risk of fighting as a soldier and quickly paid the $300 for a substitute to fight for him in the Union army.) He focused instead on refining the oil that others produced. With two partners, Rockefeller built a refinery in Cleveland where he could take advantage of nearby supplies of crude oil and get his products to market by using Great Lakes shipping and the rail lines between the East Coast and Chicago that ran through Cleveland.
Rockefeller was determined to dominate the Cleveland refining market. He kept his products better and his prices lower than any of the competition. He quickly bought out his partners, one of whom later commented, “John had abiding faith in two things: the Baptist creed and oil.” He might have added that Rockefeller also had great faith in his own ability to strike a good bargain and manage his business, which meant cutting costs in every possible way. He brought in a new partner, Henry M. Flagler, who was as religious and as cost-conscious as himself. Rockefeller’s Cleveland refinery was soon shipping more oil than any other in the region, which gave him great influence with the railroads. Jay Gould offered a rebate to Rockefeller if he would ship on the Erie system, and Rockefeller accepted but then convinced the Erie’s primary competition, the Lake Shore Railroad, to give an even better one. When word of the secret rebates leaked out, other oil producers complained, but Rockefeller and Flagler had already made enough money to buy several of the competitors.
Chapter 17 The Gilded Age: Building a Technological and Industrial Giant and a New Social Order^

17.2
Horizontal integration
The merger of competitors in the same industry.
In 1870, the Rockefeller-Flagler partnership became the Standard Oil Company, and the two set out to gain control of the nation’s oil business. They bargained with oil producers to keep costs low. They bought up every rival refining company they could, leaving producers with little option but to sell their oil to Standard Oil at whatever price Standard Oil was willing to pay. When a company would not sell to them, they went into direct competition, cutting prices, until the competitor either sold to Standard Oil or went out of business. They created the Standard Oil Trust, a separate corporation, to buy up virtually every other refinery in the nation. While competition kept prices low, Rockefeller thought competition was a terrible waste of effort and a drain on his profits, and he meant to end it. By the 1880s, companies under the control of Standard Oil refined nine out of 10 barrels of oil produced in the United States. This control over oil production came to be known as horizontal integration or, in cases like Standard Oil where nearly all of the industry was integrated, a horizontal monopoly. Standard Oil kept growing. Rockefeller produced his own tank cars and leased them to the railroads, making it difficult for competitors to transport oil. When pipelines started replacing oil tank cars, Standard Oil bought the pipelines. In the 1890s, tired of haggling with oil producers, Standard Oil simply started buying oil wells and became the largest producer and refiner of oil in the nation. In the 1890s, the United States had no meaningful antimonopoly laws in force, and Rockefeller’s tireless work had made him the master of oil from its production to its refining to its sales.
Just as Edison’s light bulb was starting to reduce demand for kerosene, Henry Ford’s automobiles created a demand for gasoline, refined from the same crude oil as kerosene. Automobiles would dwarf all previous markets for Standard Oil’s products. In addition, the world’s navies were also turning from sail to oil-powered steamships. After 1900, everyone knew that with the development of these gas- and oil-powered vehicles, Standard Oil’s greatest days were still ahead (see Map 17-1).
Andrew Carnegie was only a little older than Rockefeller. In 1848, when he was 12 years old, his family came to the United States from his native Scotland after his father, a successful linen weaver, was thrown out of work by the mechanization of the industry. Andrew Carnegie’s first job was in a textile mill in Allegheny, Pennsylvania, where he earned $1.20 per week. He soon moved to higher paying jobs and eventually became the personal assistant to the division superintendent of the Pennsylvania Railroad, a position in which he quickly learned the inner workings of American industry.
Like Rockefeller, Carnegie paid someone to serve as his substitute in the Union army—a practice that was entirely legal, though ethically questionable, during the Civil War. In 1863, he decided to leave salaried work because he was confident he could make more money by investing, and he valued his independence. He advised others that the key to success was “Put all your eggs in one basket and then watch that basket.” Carnegie’s basket was steel, which he quickly realized was coming to dominate American commerce.
In the early 1870s, Carnegie persuaded several investors to join him in opening a new state-of-the-art steel mill just outside Pittsburgh. Pittsburgh was near the coal fields, and steel mills used a lot of coal. The location was also near rivers and competing railroad lines, so no one rail line could squeeze Carnegie’s profits. Having established himself as the head of a giant corporation, Carnegie, like Rockefeller, set out to dominate the field. He found ways to track and cut costs. Seeing him around the plant looking at inventories, one foreman said, “There goes that damned bookkeeper.” He replaced wood buildings, which could burn, with iron ones; he developed an assembly line approach to steel production; and he constantly updated and replaced equipment.
Carnegie built or bought everything needed for the steel business, from the coal mines to the coke ovens that prepared fuel to the iron mines that produced iron ore. He purchased railroads and steamships to transport the coal and ore to Pittsburgh. In addition, he did whatever was needed to keep workers’ salaries as low as possible. He once said, “Show me your cost sheets. It is more interesting to know how well and how cheaply you have done this thing than how much money you have made.” Other steel mill owners who worried only about profits were defeated by Carnegie’s constant focus on costs.
Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
486
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World
Superior
CANADA
MAINE
Type of Plants:	'""v
A
Blast furnace 0 Rolling mill, steel work □ Bridge building plant Companies: Hi The Carnegie Co.
Hi Federal Steel Co.
HI
National Steel Co. HI
National Tube Co. _ American Steel and Wire
Co. of New Jersey □ American Tin Plate Co. Hi American Steel Hoop Co.' 6SB American Sheet Steel Co. ' IH American Bridge Co.
HI
Lake Superior Iron Mines Independent Firms: O
Blast furnace 0 Rolling mill Companies:
Republic Iron and “ Steel Co.
H
Bethlehem Steel Co. ■■■■ Lackawana Iron and
Steel Co.
Pennsylvania Steel Co. “ of New Jersey Hi Cambria Steel Co.
Crucible Steel Co. of
America
Tennessee Coal, Iron, and Railroad Company
Hi Jones and Laughlins Ltd
O. MICHIGAN I
? *♦
INDIANA!
0'®
veland«
• ♦/
i
OHIO
KENTUCKY
TENNESSEE
ALABAMA
LOUISIANA
VERMC
L
. Ontario
yiAss.'
-NEW YORK"
PENNSYLVANIA/
•t
WEST > VIRGINIA
;NJ.
o
\
W\ DELAWARE
VIRGINIA
NORTH
CAROLINA
SOUTH
CAROLINA
GEORGIA
Gulf of
Mexico
Pittsburgh
ATLANTIC
OCEAN
FLORIDA,
Lake Erie		
		
	k ' J X	
Cleveland
v.;
MAP 17-1 The Nations's Industrial Heartland. The giant corporations of the Gilded Age tended to concentrate in the northwest of the United States. The factories of the region attracted immigrants from around the world and within the United States while also concentrating wealth and increasing the country's transportation networks.
By the late 1890s, Carnegie Steel was the largest single company in the steel business. In contrast to the Standard Oil Trust, which was the model of horizontal monopoly, controlling all of the nation’s oil refining, Carnegie Steel was the model of vertical integration, controlling all means of steel production from raw materials through sales. For Carnegie, those means included the materials of coal and iron in the ground, the mining and transport of the materials, and the production and sales of the steel that came from these materials. Like Rockefeller, Carnegie became a very rich man.
Chapter 17 The Gilded Age: Building a Technological and Industrial Giant and a New Social Orde
Vertical integration
The consolidation of numerous production functions, from the extraction of the raw materials to the distribution and marketing of the finished products, under the directigjj of one firm.

More important than enjoying a lavish lifestyle and sometimes supporting various charities, emerging corporate leaders used their money to ensure their political influence and power. While Rockefeller and Carnegie were the best known, and probably the most successful, builders of monopoly trusts, other leaders built monopolies and grew almost as rich. In 1892, the New York World listed 3,045 millionaires in the United States. Gustavus Swift dominated meat, Charles Pillsbury grain, Henry Havemeyer sugar, Frederick Weyerhaeuser lumber, and James B. Duke tobacco. In addition, companies in other fields established trusts as they replaced competition with easier and more profitable coordination—the cottonseed oil trust, the linseed oil trust, the lead mining trust, the whiskey distilling trust, and the cord (rope) manufacturing trust. Free enterprise, as previous generations had known it, was quickly being replaced by a single corporation or trust that had many employees who simply took orders while the trust dominated the market for its product, ending competition and setting prices that consumers large and small had no choice but to pay or do without the product. The owners of these trusts had enough political power to make sure that no government intervened.
While Rockefeller and Carnegie were amassing their fortunes, another American was amassing the greatest economic power that the country had ever seen. Although never as personally wealthy as Rockefeller or Carnegie, John Pierpont Morgan was the banker that everyone else, including the richest industrialists and often the U.S. government, looked to. Like Rockefeller and Carnegie, Morgan was born in the 1830s, and like them, he paid for a substitute rather than let the Civil War divert him from banking. In the financial chaos of the Civil War, Morgan launched J.P. Morgan & Company. During the war, Morgan made great profits. He once sold reconditioned army rifles back to the federal government at a considerable profit. Working with European banks,
Morgan helped finance the transcontinental railroad in the United States and the Suez Canal in the Middle East (both of which were completed in 1869). Using his skill and formidable resources, Morgan helped pick up the pieces of the American economy after the collapse of Jay Cooke & Company had launched the Panic of 1873.
In 1877, after Cornelius Vanderbilt died, Morgan helped Vanderbilt’s son, William, sell off some shares of the New York Central Railroad. In return Morgan got a $3 million fee but, more valuable to him, a seat on the board of directors of the New York Central. He helped others with similar sales and gained seats for himself on other equally powerful boards. As a result, Morgan knew more about American industries than any other banker. In particular, he knew that the railroads were overbuilt and he was determined to reduce the competition among them.
In the late 1880s, two of the largest railroads, the New York Central and the Pennsylvania Railroad, ran competing lines from Philadelphia to Pittsburgh and from New York to Chicago. Morgan decided to be a very forceful peacemaker. He invited— or summoned—the principal directors of each railroad to his yacht, the Corsair, and then ordered the captain to sail up and down the Hudson until finally, in exhaustion, they agreed to a settlement. Ihe result of the agreement—some called it collusion—was better organization and higher profits for both lines, especially for stockholders and directors like Morgan himself, who also always collected a hefty fee for his services, but at considerable cost to shippers who had benefitted from the cutthroat competition.
The Panic of 1893 showed Morgan’s power as much as prosperity did. In May 1893, the National Cordage Company, known as the rope trust, which was producing far more rope than the market demanded and issuing far too many promissory notes, went bankrupt, launching a major drop in stock prices among related businesses. In an economy as deeply interconnected as the U.S. economy had become, a drop in one area meant a drop in many others. In the course of the ensuing depression, the Philadelphia and Reading, Northern Pacific, Union Pacific, and Santa Fe Railroads as well as a host of other businesses all followed into bankruptcy.
People much lower on the economic scale also felt the depression, sometimes more so. In the fall of 1893, a Methodist minister from Lincoln, Nebraska, told the
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
American Voices
Andrew Carnegie, Wealth, 1889
17.2
In this article, known as "The Gospel of Wealth," Carnegie ff justified his vast fortune (he would be the richest person in America by 1901) and laid the foundation for his late-in-life generosity that built Carnegie libraries and created the Carnegie Corporation of New York in 1911.
The price which society pays for the law of competition, like the price it pays for cheap comforts and luxuries, is also great; but the advantage of this law are also greater still, for it is to this law that we owe our wonderful material development, which brings improved conditions in its train....We accept and welcome therefore, as conditions to which we must accommodate ourselves, great inequality of environment, the concentration of business, industrial and commercial, in the hands of a few, and the law of competition between these, as being not only beneficial, but essential for the future progress of the race... .The question then arises.. .What is the proper mode of administering wealth after the laws upon which civilization is founded have thrown it into the hands of the few?...
There are but three modes in which surplus wealth can be disposed of. It can be left to the families of the decedents; or it can be bequeathed for public purposes; or, finally, it can be administered during their lives by its possessors....Why should men leave great fortunes to their children? If this is done from affection, is it not misguided affection? Observation teaches that, generally speaking, it is not well for the children that they should be so burdened. Neither is it well for the state....
As to the second mode, that of leaving wealth at death for public uses, it may be said that this is only a means for the disposal of wealth, provided a man is content to wait until he is dead before it becomes of much good in the world... .Besides this, it may fairly be said that no man is to be extolled for doing what he cannot help doing...
There remains, then, only one mode of using great fortunes... Under its sway we shall have an ideal state, in which the surplus
wealth of the few will become, in the best sense the property of the many, because administered for the common good, and this wealth, passing through the hands of the few, can be made a much more potent force for the elevation of our race than if it had been distributed in small sums to the people themselves....
This, then, is held to be the duty of the man of Wealth: First, to set an example of modest, unostentatious living, shunning display or extravagance; to provide moderately for the legitimate wants of those dependent upon him; and after doing so to consider all surplus revenues which come to him simply as trust funds, which he is called upon to administer, and strictly bound as a matter of duty to administer in the manner which, in his judgment, is best calculated to produce the most beneficial results for the community—the man of wealth thus becoming the mere agent and trustee for his poorer brethren, bringing to their service his superior wisdom, experience and ability to administer, doing for them better than they would or could do for themselves....
Such, in my opinion, is the true Gospel concerning Wealth, obedience to which is destined some day to solve the problem of the Rich and the Poor, and to bring "Peace on earth, among men of Good-Will"
Source: Andrew Carnegie, "Wealth," North American Review, Vo\. 148, No. 391 (June, 1889).
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
In Carnegie's view, what importance should be attached to economic inequality? How did he believe the wealthy should use their fortunes?
2.	Crafting an Argument
Defend or refute the following statement. "Andrew Carnegie's views on wealth were nothing more than a thinly veiled effort to justify exploitation and social injustice."
story of “an honest Methodist farmer” who sold his year’s harvest for $31 and “with
this he paid his taxes and half his grocery bill, and went home without dinner because
there was not a nickel left in his pocket.” A lot of honest Methodist, Baptist, and
Presbyterian farmers were in the same boat, as well as factory workers and members
of the rising middle class who lost their jobs and their hopes in the 1893 depression.
As European investors watched the collapse of the U.S. economy, they started
withdrawing gold held in U.S. banks. The European run on the U.S. gold supply
almost bankrupted the U.S. government. At the beginning of 1895, the federal gov-
ernment’s gold supply, kept in vaults in New York City, was $100 million. By the end
of January, it was down to $50 million and falling quickly as investors withdrew their
gold. In early February, Morgan traveled from New York to Washington, DC, in his
private rail car to offer help. President Grover Cleveland, a Democrat, did not want
the political embarrassment of being rescued by—or being seen under the control
Chapter 17 The Gilded Age: Building a Technological and Industrial Giant and a New Social Ordei
112
173

of—J. P. Morgan. However, by the time the two met, Morgan informed Cleveland (since Morgan always had the most up-to-date financial information) that there was but $9 million in gold still available and that a $10 million draft was on its way. The banker told the president, “You can’t meet it. It will be over before three o’clock.”
Morgan also had a solution to offer. He reminded the president and the treasury secretary of a long-forgotten piece of Civil War legislation that said, The Secretary of the Treasury may purchase coin with any of the bonds or notes of the United States, authorized by law, at such rates and upon such terms as he may deem most advantageous to the public interest.” He then offered $65 million in gold in return for 30-year government bonds. The president asked Morgan whether he could promise that the deal—which not only provided gold but put the full faith and credit of the House of Morgan behind the credit of the United States—would end the rush on the treasury and Morgan said, “Yes sir, I will guarantee it.”
The deal worked. European bankers who had lost faith in the United States had faith in Morgan. They bought the bonds and stopped demanding payments in gold. The government had been protected from going the way of National Cordage and the Reading Railroad. The publisher Joseph Pulitzer called the deal an “excellent arrangement for the bankers,” but “[f]or the nation it means a scandalous surrender of credit and a shameful waste of substance.” Morgan made a fortune on the deal but also saved the U.S. economy. In the absence of any federal bank, the House of Morgan essentially served that role until the Federal Reserve Bank was created in 1916.
No project of J.P. Morgan’s was as great, however, as the one he launched in 1900. It began with the kind of competition that Morgan always hated. Illinois Steel, which Morgan had helped finance, was making a direct run at Carnegie Steel for control of the market. Charles Schwab, one of Carnegie’s partners, organized a holiday dinner with Morgan to see whether they could work out a deal to end the competition. Carnegie had talked of retiring, and his wife was anxious for him to enjoy life and devote himself full time to his charities. Carnegie was asked his price and, after a night’s sleep, offered to sell Carnegie Steel for $480 million. Morgan agreed and later shook Carnegie’s hand saying, “Mr. Carnegie, I want to congratulate you on being the richest man in the world.” Morgan, Schwab, and Elbert Gary, the head of Illinois Steel, then negotiated with Rockefeller, whom Morgan disliked personally, to buy out Rockefeller’s ownership of iron deposits in the Mesabi Range and the ore boats that went with them. In March 1901, Morgan announced the creation of the U.S. Steel Corporation, bringing together Carnegie’s formidable assets, Illinois Steel, the Rockefeller iron mines, and other assets worth a total of $1.4 billion, the largest corporation ever seen at the time. The giant monopoly corporation was now the dominating fixture of the U.S. economy.
Quick Review How did the businessmen of the Gilded Age and their tactics revolutionize American industry? Whom do you think had the greatest impact?
LIVES OF THE MIDDLE CLASS IN THE GILDED AGE_____________________________
Analyze daily life, popular ideas, and political direction for the middle class during the Gilded Age.
173
During the Gilded Age, what came to be known as middle-class values emerged in the United States. More Americans than ever before achieved a level of comfort and social respectability that, while it was a long way from the wealth of the Rockefellers, Carnegies, and Morgans, was also a long way from the poverty of most of rural America or those who worked on the railroads or in the refineries. As Americans moved from farms to towns, some of the urban residents became comfortable professionals and managers and, in the process, created a set of norms for “middle-class respectability” that had not been known before.

Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Middle-Class Life and Expectations
John Lewis came to the United States from Great Britain before the Civil War and got a job in the wholesale grocery business in New York City By the 1870s, Lewis was the proprietor of his own store and a solid member of Americas emerging urban middle class. While achieving a middle-class life for himself and his family, Lewis wrote letters to his brother in England describing his life. For the Christmas of 1875, Lewis took the train to visit relatives in Philadelphia. In addition to the feasting, which greatly impressed Lewis, he also noted the Christmas tree decorations:
As large and fine a tree as can be accommodated being procured and set up, it is covered with every conceivable shape into which coloured and gilt paper and card can be cut and...little pictures, glass balls, chains, garlands &c, anything to make a gay and imposing display.
Lewis also noted that the enjoyment of the trees seemed to be a prime adult occupation while the children wanted candy. He noted, “The candy stores are among the gayest and most prosperous, and the consumption of their wares by women and children all the year round is enormous and is often spoken of by writers as a great national failing.”
In maintaining his own store, traveling easily from city to city, celebrating holidays with feasts, decorations, and parties, Lewis was participating in the emerging middle-class culture of the late 1800s. Before the Civil War, Christmas celebrations among American Protestants were limited affairs, but after the war, the fondness for that holiday, and the economic resources to celebrate more grandly than ever before, grew rapidly. A larger group of people had the resources to own homes, decorate them, and travel to visit relatives than in any previous generation in the United States.
Those in the rising urban middle class were redesigning not only their private homes but also their expectations, particularly for city buildings and services that supported their emerging tastes and desires. Huge new department stores offered the opportunity to shop for the things that middle-class people, like John Lewis, wanted in their lives. The architect Daniel Burnham, the leading voice of what came to be known as the City Beautiful movement, designed public buildings in a classical style that showed a permanence and beauty that this emerging class expected. City Beautiful planned major revitalization efforts in Washington, DC, Cleveland, San Francisco, and Chicago, designing buildings such as the grand new Boston Public Library, based on the model of a Renaissance palazzo; the new building for the Library of Congress, which was completed in 1897; and the new New York Stock Exchange that opened in 1903.
classical style that characterized the movement.
Chapter 17 The Gilded Age: Building a Technological and Industrial Giant and a New Social Or
173
The architect Louis Sullivan, Burnham’s professional rival, sought a much simpler and, he said, more American style of architecture that reflected the energy of a culture that constructed buildings soaring to heights previously unimagined. Sullivan hated classical Renaissance style and preferred more simple lines. Frederick Law Olmsted designed major new park systems, including Central Park in New York, Boston’s chain of connected parks around the city known as the Emerald Necklace, and the Mall in Washington, DC, all of which spoke to the commitment to beauty and permanence for a new and growing class of people who had the time and inclination to use such public spaces for leisure and uplifting pastimes.
While architects designed new buildings and park systems designed to show permanence and prosperity, other urban planners found ways to make cities more livable for the growing middle class or to help the middle class to escape what they found difficult to live with. These planners found new ways to bring pure water into city neighborhoods, perhaps most important to the life—and health—of city dwellers. Cholera and other waterborne diseases had long been a fact of city life. Once a cholera epidemic began to spread, wealth and class did little to protect people from it. Cities, like small towns, tended to depend on well water and on small, individual cisterns that collected rain water for their water supply. However, in growing urban areas, stagnant cisterns were a breeding ground for disease, and wells easily became contaminated. Beginning in 1842, New York started building a reservoir for water to be piped into the city from rural areas to provide a healthier water supply. As New York grew, a large new plan—the New Croton Aqueduct—was built from 1885 to 1893 to bring water to all of the city’s neighborhoods. Other cities followed the same pattern. Water, which had been a source of disease, became one of the healthiest aspects of urban life.
Even as city life improved, many in the middle class wanted to put some distance between themselves and the cities. Railroads, which had initially connected cities over long distances, began to build shorter lines that would allow people who worked in cities to live in suburbs—a new development in American life during the Gilded Age. They commuted between their homes in semirural settings and their work in the commercial centers of urban America. Cities also quickly took to adding electric lights that kept cities alive at night, electric elevators that allowed much taller buildings to be built, and electric trolleys that made it easier to get from one part of a city to another. The cities of the Gilded Age were cleaner, brighter, and faster paced than anything known in the United States before that time.
Gilded Age Religion
The Gilded Age saw new levels of religious activity among white middle-class Protestants. Most of the middle class were, indeed, both white and Protestant, and they viewed themselves as living in a “Christian America,” by which they meant a Protestant Christian culture. Between 1860 and 1900, the major Protestant denominations—the Methodists, Baptists, Presbyterians, Congregationalists, and Episcopalians—tripled their membership from 5 million to 16 million. Americans not only joined Protestant churches but also participated in nondenominational religious organizations, including the YMCA as well as Bible, mission, and social reform societies. The theology that was being preached changed with the times, becoming more individualistic and more optimistic. And no one represented the changes in white American Protestantism as much as the great revivalist of the era, Dwight L. Moody.
Like many Americans of his generation—the same generation as Rockefeller, Carnegie, and Morgan—Moody grew up on a farm but moved to a city. When the Civil War began, Moody gave up his shoe business to work full time for the YMCA. He led a Sunday school for poor immigrant children and supported the YMCAs social service missions. By 1875, Moody had an international reputation. He launched the Northfield and Mount Hermon schools as well as a new Bible training school in Chicago in 1886 that eventually became the Moody Bible Institute.
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Electric lights, electronic trolleys, and fast-moving trains not only speeded transportation but also created a new kind of energized night life in cities like New York.
W.
Louis Sonntag, Jr., The Bowery at Night, watercolor, 1895. Copyright Museum of the City of New York. 32.275.2. Another prominent minister, Lyman Abbott, described Moody’s preaching in 1899 saying, “As he stood on the platform, he looked like a business man; he dressed like a business man; he took the meeting in hand as a business man would.”
If other business men were dominating the culture and the economy, a preacher who acted like a business man could be a success. Moody did not shout. He gave a simple message focused on the need for conversion and the love of God. The preacher was deeply critical of both sides in the growing debates that pitted liberal biblical scholarship against those who insisted the Bible was the literal truth. He did not see any fresh views on either side of the argument and wondered whether both could not just “let us get on with the practical work of the kingdom.”
The sins Moody denounced were attending the theater, disregarding the Sabbath, and believing atheistic teachings. Coming home to Jesus was the key for Moody, and home and Jesus often represented the same thing. He preached a gospel perfectly fitted to the growing sense of individualism in the United States. In describing his mission, he said, “I look upon this world as a wrecked vessel. God has given me a lifeboat and said to me, ‘Moody, save all you can.’”
Ira D. Sankey’s music was as important as the preaching at Moody’s revivals.
Some of the most popular hymns that Sankey led people in singing were written by Fanny J. Crosby, who wrote over 8,000 of them. The hymns, like the popular Pass Me Not, 0 Gentle Saviour, reflect an individualistic faith in which the focus is on divine comfort and love far more than on sin, divine judgment, or great social change.
Protestant Americans sang these hymns during Sunday morning services and at home around a piano—which those of the emerging middle class could now afford.
Electoral Politics
Between 1876 and 1896, electoral politics reflected the dominant middle-class inter-
ests of the era. While groups within the major parties and new political parties like the
Populists (see Chapter 18) protested against the poverty and corruption that was part
Chapter 17 The Gilded Age: Building a Technological and Industrial Giant and a New Social Order
17.3
Stalwarts
A faction of the Republican Party in the 1870s and 1880s who wanted the party to stay true to its earlier support for Reconstruction in the South and who were less connected to the emerging big-business interests than others.
Mugwumps
A reform faction of the Republican party who supported Cleveland, the Democratic nominee over the Republican Blaine in the 1884 election.
of the backdrop of the Gilded Age, the major parties, Republicans and Democrats alike, reflected the ideas and aspirations of the middle and upper classes. In a nation where a few were growing exorbitantly wealthy and a larger number were moving into new comforts, the leaders of the political parties had no interest in challenging the status quo.
In the 1870s and 1880s, the Republican Party was the political voice of most corporate leaders and most Protestants outside of the South. But the party was split between the heirs of the antislavery wing of the party—Stalwarts they called them-selves_and others who believed that it was time to forget about slavery and the goals of Reconstruction and simply embrace the nation’s growing prosperity. The party was also split along lines of personal animosity, none deeper than the hatred between Roscoe Conkling, Stalwart leader of the New York delegation in the Congress, and James G. Blaine, a Congressman from Maine since 1862 who had quickly risen over many more senior members to be Speaker of House. Blaine was among those ready to focus on the future; embrace the economy that Rockefeller, Carnegie, and Morgan were creating for the nation; and forget about reform efforts, whether in the form of the now-fading Reconstruction goals or the needs of the urban poor. Blaine was a man of great charm and eloquence but often seen as being too smooth and probably a participant in some of the worse corruption of the Grant administration.
After the tensions of the 1876 Hayes-Tilden election (see Chapter 15), the Republicans did not want to renominate President Hayes and turned instead to another Civil War veteran and compromise candidate from Ohio, James A. Garfield, who defeated the Democrats’ Union war hero Winfield Scott Hancock in the November 1880 election. Unlike many in either political party, Garfield was committed to civil service reform—ending the use of government jobs to reward political favorites—and to uniting Stalwarts and their opponents. His running mate was the New York customs collector Chester A. Arthur, better known for his ability to find government jobs for friends than for any reform agenda. Three months after the inauguration, Garfield was shot by a disgruntled office seeker, and although he seemed to be healing from his wounds, he died on September 19, 1881. Arthur became the president and, as some said, served a less undistinguished term than expected.
In 1884, Blaine was determined to stop Arthur’s renomination. He tried hard to convince yet another war hero, William T. Sherman, to run for president, but Sherman’s unequivocal response was, “If nominated I will not run, if elected I will not serve.” Eventually, the Republicans gave Blaine his turn as their candidate.
Governor Grover Cleveland was the Democratic nominee. Cleveland had fought corruption when he was mayor of Buffalo, New York, a reputation that propelled him to the governor’s office in 1882 and only 2 years later to the White House. Given Cleveland’s reputation for honesty and Blaine’s for corruption, a number of long-time Republicans campaigned for the Democrats. These party crossovers became known as Mugwumps, a word they claimed came from an Indian word for “big chief’ but that their opponents said meant someone whose mug was on one side of a fence while their “wump” was on the other.
In the midst of the 1884 campaign, a preacher from Buffalo revealed that Cleveland had fathered a child with a young widow, Maria Halpin, and then paid child support. Cleveland supporters said that Halpin had many boyfriends and that Cleveland was only protecting the others, some of whom were married. The nominee ordered his campaign to “Tell the truth.” While the nation faced serious economic choices, the campaigns fell to chanting “Blaine, Blaine, James G. Blaine, continental liar from the state of Maine,” against “Ma, ma, where’s my pa?” Just before the election, another preacher who supported Blaine castigated the Democrats as the “party of rum, Romanism, and rebellion,” a phrase that may have cost the Republicans key Catholic votes in New York state where Cleveland won by only 1,100 votes, which gave him a majority in the Electoral College.
^94 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Cleveland was not significantly different than the Republicans who served before him, though he did take a strong stand against the annexation of Hawaii and other expansionist efforts that Republicans had been pursuing. But as African-Americans in the South suffered from ever-increasing segregation and inequality, white and black farmers faced poverty, and workers began efforts to organize unions to end starvation wages, Cleveland, like the Republicans, tended to ignore their needs or, when pushed, sided with the corporations and their owners (see Chapter 18).
In a close race, Cleveland was defeated for reelection in 1888 by the Republican nominee, Civil War general and presidential grandson Benjamin Harrison, whose main campaign issues were Cleveland’s veto of a pension bill for all Civil War veterans and Cleveland’s return of Civil War banners to Southern states. A tactic called “waving the bloody shirt”—reminding everyone in the North that Republicans had won the Civil War while Democrats represented the states of the Confederacy—seemed to win elections for Republicans. Yet 4 years later, Cleveland, in a return match, defeated Harrison and served a second term from 1893 to 1897—the only president in history to serve nonconsecutive terms. It was Cleveland’s bad luck to begin his second term just as the Panic of 1893 began, and while his negotiations with J. P. Morgan may have avoided even worse disaster, the economic crisis of 1893 hurt many Americans. Ihe political stability of the 1870s and 1880s seemed to be coming to an end in the 1890s. Global Connections
American influence around the world grew dramatically during the Gilded Age. Americans had been sending missionaries to foreign countries since the early 1800s, but far greater numbers went abroad in the 1880s and 1890s. Dwight L. Moody called on young converts to consider careers as foreign missionaries, and some of them launched the China Inland Mission to convert China. Another Moody convert, John R. Mott, organized the Student Volunteer Movement that eventually sent over 5,000 missionaries to India, Africa, China, Japan, and the Middle East (the Movement later became the World Student Christian Federation). Individual churches and religious bodies sent their own preachers, teachers, and medical missionaries to all parts of the globe. Missionaries brought western values, a respect for human rights—especially women’s rights. However, they also brought American commercialism interests,
1
k.
While political leaders like Hayes, Garfield, and Cleveland vied for the presidency, many reformers were coming to the conclusion that the business trusts led by people like Rockefeller, Carnegie, and Morgan really controlled the country. This political cartoon from 1889 showed who many thought actually ran the Senate and the country.
Chapter 17 The Gilded Age: Building a Technological and Industrial Giant and a New Social Order
perhaps unwittingly, to cultures that may or may not have wanted them. The missionaries were Quickly followed by merchants and industrialists, though missionaries sometimes led the protests against the commercialization of international relations. Returning missionaries became the voice of the world in many American communities, describing people and cultures unfamiliar to American audiences.
Missionaries were far from the only Americans to visit other parts of the globe during the Gilded Age. As the United States grew in population and industrial production, it became a player of growing importance in world markets, second only to Great Britain. After the Panic of 1873, many worried that the rapid growth in U.S. industrial productivity could become a problem rather than a boon. If the country produced more and more and depended only on domestic markets, then prices and income were doomed to keep falling. The only solution, some argued, was to find foreign markets, lots of foreign markets, to be sure that American products were sold all over the world, bringing new income to American producers. Exporting goods was nothing new to the United States, but after 1870, many U.S. business leaders intensified exporting efforts to sustain the nation’s economy. The total value of U.S. exports jumped from $234 million in 1865 to $1.5 billion in 1900, and the country was transformed from a debtor to a creditor nation.
In terms of commercial efforts, the United States had long been interested in Cuba. Southern Senators regularly suggested making the island a slave state before the Civil War, and in 1854, the American ambassadors to Europe’s leading powers issued the so-called Ostend Manifesto, demanding that Spain sell Cuba to the United States. After the Civil War, Cuba was no longer of value as a slave state, but interest in the island never disappeared from American politics. When a rebellion against Spanish rule broke out in Cuba in 1868, perhaps 100,000 Cubans died as a result while the island’s economy was devastated. U.S. merchants took advantage of the situation and bought sugar plantations, mines, and ranches in Cuba while U.S. diplomats forged an agreement with Spain for free and open trade between the island and the United States. By 1890, the United States was the dominant economic force on the island, and trade with Cuba was important for the U.S. economy.
The United States also had longstanding interests in Mexico. During the Civil War, Napoleon III had sent French troops to Mexico, installing Austrian Archduke Maximilian and his wife Carlotta as rulers of the country. Secretary of State Seward warned the French that their meddling was an “act of hostility,” and U.S. General Philip Sheridan informed Mexican revolutionaries that he had placed a substantial supply of weapons at the border and would look the other way if they disappeared. The supply vanished, and Maximilian was overthrown by a new government led by reform-minded Benito Juarez. Maximilian was executed by a revolutionary firing squad in June 1867. Later, Porfirio Diaz, who did not share Juarez’s reform agenda, claimed dictatorial power in Mexico. Diaz was anxious to expand U.S. investment in Mexico, and Americans bought railroads, mines, and oil exploration companies. By 1900, Americans had some $500 million invested in Mexico, enough to make the country a major trading partner and, indeed, to give American businesses significant influence in the Mexican economy and political life. Some feared Mexico was becoming almost an economic satellite of the United States.
U.S. commercial interests extended far beyond the Americas. In the 1870s, Belgium s King Leopold II created a private colony around the Congo River in Africa. It was a brutal affair. Residents of the Congo were pressed into slave labor on the vast rubber plantations that were meeting growing demands for rubber, and they were making Leopold very rich. Anxious to gain a new market, some businessmen persuaded President Arthur to recognize King Leopold’s.rule as the legitimate government of the Congo in 1884; however, Arthur’s successor, Grover Cleveland reduced U.S. involvement in light of the violent conditions.
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
In Europe, the growth of U.S. exports almost provoked a trade war between the United States and Europe s leading economic powers, including Britain, Germany, and France. Bad harvests in Europe starting in 1879 led to significant demand for American food, lifting the U.S. economy out of the last vestiges of the Panic of 1873. But European governments became nervous about their growing dependence on U.S. food and claimed that U.S. pork and beef was not safe, leading to a huge fall off in exports. The New York Herald urged “avenging the American hog” with a boycott of French wine and German sugar, but an eventual compromise led meat exports to be doubled.
In Asia, a U.S. Navy squadron sailed to Korea in 1867 but was sent away. But the U.S. Navy kept trying, as it had with Japan and China, and in 1882, Korea agreed to open itself to U.S. markets. The two governments signed the Treaty of Chemulpo after which Korean officers studied at the U.S. Military Academy at West Point and the Brooklyn Navy Yard. While Korea remained a relatively small trading partner, the determination to open a country known as the “Hermit Kingdom” was typical of the era. From Korea to Latin America, the Congo, and Europe, the United States emerged from the Gilded Age as a trading partner of some importance not only in familiar countries but also in parts of the world previous generations had barely heard about.
B
Quick Review How did the expansion of industry contribute to changes in noneconomic arenas during the Gilded Age? IMMIGRATION
17.4
Explain the reasons immigrants came to the United States in such large numbers during the Gilded Age and what their experience was.
In the 75 years between 1815 and 1890, 15 million people immigrated to the United States, the great majority from northern Europe—Britain, Ireland, Germany, Scandinavia, Switzerland, and Holland. In the next 25 years, from 1890 until the start of World War I in 1914, 15 million additional immigrants came to the United States, and those immigrants came from new places—80 percent of them from Italy, Greece, Russia, the Empire of Austria-Hungary, Romania, and Turkey, and others from Japan, China, and Korea, as well as Mexico and other parts of Latin America. With their arrival, they changed the complexion of the nation. What all these immigrants had in common was a “push-pull” experience in which various factors pushed them to leave their home countries and, at the same time, other factors pulled them to try a new life in the United States.
The Push from Around the World
When Sadie Frowne described the desperate poverty of Poland or when the Lithuanian, Antanas Kaztauskis, expressed his family’s fear that he was about to be drafted into the Russian army, they were relating reasons that pushed hundreds of thousands of people to move not only from southern and eastern Europe—Italy, Greece, Poland, Russia, and so on—but also from China, Japan, and Korea to start new lives in the United States. Most of those who emigrated to the United States between 1890 and World War I did so in large part because something, often grinding poverty and fear of persecution, pushed them to get out of the places where they and their families had lived for many generations, and the pull of hoped-for new lives and new prosperity attracted them to the United States (see Map 17-2).
Nowhere was the push to leave greater than in Russia and Russian-dominated parts of eastern Europe including the Ukraine, Lithuania, and Poland. Abraham Cahan, who came to the United States from Russia as a young man, explained what
Chapter 17 The Gilded Age: Building a Technological and
OCEAN
AUSTRALIA
Main groups Chinese 370,000 Japanese 275,000
From Canada	2,200,000
From Europe	30,000,000
Main groups
5,000,000 4,500,000 4,500,000 2,600,000 2,600,000 2,000,000
From Latin America 900,000
Germans
Irish
Italians
Poles
English
Jews
SOUTH / AMERICA \
0	1,500	3,000 Miles
0	1,500	3,000 Kilometers

MAP 17-2 Immigration to the United States. Between 1820 and 1914, but especially between 1880 and 1914, immigrants transformed the United States.This map shows where they came from and how many arrived.
Pogroms
Government-directed attacks against Jewish citizens, property, and villages in tsarist Russia beginning in the 1880s; a primary reason for Russian Jewish migration to the United States.
drove him: “The government itself had set off the pogroms in order to save the throne from a revolutionary upheaval. By making the Jews the scapegoats, it had confused the common people so that in the end the peasants were certain that the Jews and not the Czar were the cause of their troubles.” Golda Meir, who became a school teacher in Milwaukee and one day would be Prime Minister of Israel, remembered,
I can still recall distinctly hearing about a pogrom that was to descend on us... with the rabble that used to surge through town, brandishing knives and huge sticks, screaming ‘Christ killers’ as they looked for the Jews.
Pogroms—anti-Jewish attacks —became increasingly common in Russia at the end of the 1800s. They were not only tolerated but also often actively encouraged by the Russian government and the Russian Orthodox Church.
After the assassination of Czar Alexander II in 1881, the government ordered that all Jews in Russia must move to the Pale of Settlement, a region that stretched from the Baltic in the north to the Black Sea in the south. Jews were not allowed to travel into the rest of Russia. Within the Pale, though there was a thriving Jewish community and culture, there was desperate poverty. Jews were not allowed to own land. Another immigrant remembered, “There were ten times as many stores as there should have been, ten times as many tailors, cobblers, barbers, tinsmiths.” Leaving Russia seemed the only solution to such conditions.
For Italian peasants there were no pogroms, but there was plenty of violence and poverty. When Italy was united as a nation in 1871—following a movement known as the Risorgimento—wealth and industry were concentrated in the north and the Mezzogiorno, as southern Italy was known, was a land of poverty where massive soil erosion made farming almost impossible. In 1906, Mount Vesuvius erupted, destroying towns and some of the rich grape-growing farmland that remained. Facing
498 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
American Voices
Sadie Frowne, A Polish Sweatshop Girl, 1906
17.1
Sadie Frowne's account of her move from a small village in Russia to become a garment worker New York City's Lower East Side is representative of the life experience of thousands of immigrants.
My mother...kept a little grocer's shop in the little village where we lived at first. That was in Poland, somewhere on the frontier...She had a wagon in which she used to drive about the country, selling her groceries, and sometimes she worked in the fields with my father.
When I was a little more than 10 years of age my father died. He was a good man and a steady worker, and we never knew what it was to be hungry while he lived. After he died troubles began, for the rent of our shop was about $6 a month, and then there were food and clothes to provide. We needed little, it is true, but even soup, black bread, and onions we could not always get....
Mother wrote to Aunt Fanny, who lived in New York, and told her how hard it was to live in Poland, and Aunt Fanny advised her to come and bring me... .She said we should both come at once, and she went around among our relatives in New York and took up a subscription for our passage.
We came by steerage on a steamship in a very dark place that smelt dreadfully. There were hundreds of other people packed in with us, men, women and children, and almost all of them were sick. It took us 12 days to cross the sea, and we thought we should die, but at last the voyage was over and we came up and saw the beautiful bay and the big woman with the spikes on her head and the lamp that is lighted at night in her hand (Goddess of Liberty)....
So I went to work in Allen Street (Manhattan) in what they call a sweatshop, making skirts by machine. I was new at the work and the foreman scolded me a great deal....
In Poland I and my father and mother used to go to the synagogue on the Sabbath, but here the women don't go to the synagogue much, though the men do. They are shut up working hard all week long, and when the Sabbath comes they like to sleep long in bed and afterward they must go out where they can breathe the air....
Some of the women blame me very much because I spend so much money on clothes. They say that instead of a dollar a week I ought not to spend more than 25c a week on clothes, and that I should save the rest. But a gir, must have clothes if she is to go into good society at Ulmer Park or Coney Island or the theater. Those who blame me are the old country people who have old-fashioned notions, but the people who have been here a long time know better. A girl who does not dress well is stuck in a corner, even if she is pretty, and Aunt Fanny says that I do just right to put on plenty of style.
Source: Sadie Frowne, "A Polish Sweatshop Girl," in Hamilton Holt, editor The Life Stories of Undistinguished Americans as Told by Themselves (originally 1906, republished New York: Routledge, 2000), pp. 21-28.
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
According to the author, what led to her mother's decision to move to America?
2.	Synthesis
What elements of the author's story make it typical of immigrant stories of the period?
poverty, criminal gangs, and chaos, some 4 million Italians, almost all from the south, left Italy between 1880 and 1914. Unlike the Jews coming from Russia, many of the Italian immigrants hoped one day to return home after making some money, and perhaps one in four did return. Those who came, whether temporarily or permanently, settled in major American cities and took on some of the hardest work at the bottom ranks of the American economy.
Russian Jews and southern Italian Catholics were far from alone. All across Europe, the population was growing faster than the land could support. Immigration provided a way out. Political upheaval in many places led to violence. Turkish violence against the Christian minority, especially the massacres of 1894, 1895, and 1896, led many Armenians to leave for America. Roman Catholics in Orthodox areas like Lithuania and Orthodox believers facing persecution in Catholic or Muslim countries wanted to move.
Chinese immigrants had been coming to the West Coast since the Gold Rush of 1849, but poverty and continued political turmoil kept them coming, though the numbers were slowed significantly after 1882 when Congress passed the Chinese Exclusion Act. Until 1882, immigration had been a relatively easy matter for the Chinese. If one could afford the passage, one simply booked it and then walked off the ship in San Francisco.
Chinese Exclusion Act
Federal legislation that suspended Chinese immigration, limited the civil rights of resident Chinese, and forbade their naturalization.
Chapter 17 The Gilded Age: Building a Technological and Industrial Giant and a New Social
Ordfl
II
Part VI
This Italian woman with her children at Ellis Island, the main Atlantic coast port of entry for immigrants, represented the way many families came to the United States. A father would come first and, later, after making some money, send for his wife and children, who followed on their own.
However, many in California and other parts of the West were threatened by the Chinese who by their sheer numbers increased the competition for jobs or mining claims. After a string of anti-immigrant petitions led Congress to change the law—the first time an entire nationality was barred from the country—only Chinese who could prove to the satisfaction of new immigration agents that they were either returning citizens or that they brought with them educational, economic, or diplomatic skills were allowed into the United States. Japanese immigrants, however, began to arrive, especially after 1885 when the emperor ended a ban on emigration and increased taxes to build up the government, causing many farmers to lose their fields.
In addition, about 300,000 French-Canadians moved from Quebec into the United States between 1860 and 1900, especially into New England and New York. Remote villages in Mexico experienced almost constant revolutionary violence in the late 1800s and early 1900s as regime followed regime. As a result, many Mexicans moved across the Rio Grande into the United States to find jobs on farms, mines, or fields in Texas and California, greatly expanding an earlier Mexican-American community that had been in the United States since the changing border made them Americans in the 1840s. Eventually some 4 million Italians, 2 million Russian Jews (one-third of all of the Jews in Russia), and 9 million other immigrants from almost every other part of the planet came to the United States in the 30-year period before 1920.
The Pull from an Industrializing United States
While there was good reason to leave Russia or Italy or Japan or Mexico, among other places, in the late 1800s, there were also reasons to want to come to the United States. The pull of opportunity was as important as the push of poverty and oppression. Although stories of the wealth to be found in the United States often led to terrible disappointment, the conditions in the United States were often still significantly better than what immigrants had left behind.
Prospective immigrants learned about jobs and opportunities from many sources. In a small village in Lithuania, Antanas Kaztauskis heard a man who lived in his village talk about the success of his son who was working in the stockyards in Chicago and who had sent his father a Lithuanian language newspaper from Chicago where the old man read of the rights of “life, liberty, and the getting of happiness.”
American employers, often short of workers during economic boom times, advertised for help, even publishing a guidebook, Where to Emigrate and Why, in 1869. Steamship companies advertised for passengers, who could now, they claimed, take advantage of quicker travel times—14 days in 1867 and perhaps 6 days by 1900—all in safer and healthier conditions.
In Japan, farmers heard that a plantation laborer in the Kingdom of Hawaii could earn six times more than in Japan. It might be possible in a few years of working in Hawaii or the United States to save enough to return home, buy new land and make a fresh start in Japan. Many Japanese women saw the opportunity to start a new life as a “picture bride” for a Japanese immigrant who was already in Hawaii or the United States. In a culture in which arranged marriages were the norm and in which women were encouraged to become educated and make their own way in the world, the idea of women, traveling to a new land, starting a new life with a new husband, did not seem so strange. Riyo Orite, said of her experience, “I was engaged at the age of 16 and didn t meet Orite until I was almost 18.1 had seen him only in a picture at first.... Being young, I was unromantic. I just believed that girls should get married....[P] eople around me praised the match.”
Mexicans who returned after spending time in the United States came back to families and friends with shoes and good suits of clothes.” Others who moved north

wrote to family and friends, “Come! Come! Come over, it is good here!” Jesus Garza remembered, As I had heard a lot about the United States it was my dream to come here.” And many did come.
Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914

The Reality—Jobs, Cities, and Americanization
When immigrants arrived in the United States, they did not always find what they had
been expecting or hoping for. Italian immigrants often summed up their experience:
Back in the old country, the young and naive immigrants had been told that the streets of America were paved with gold. But when they got here, they discovered three important things: First, the streets weren’t paved in gold; second, they weren’t paved at all; and third, they were expected to pave them.
Few immigrants were quite as naive as the story implies, but the popularity of the story in Italian immigrant communities says a lot about the reality of the immigration experience.
When arriving immigrants from Europe first landed, the authorities were not always welcoming. New York was the prime point of entry. In 1892, the federal government built a new immigration center on Ellis Island in the harbor, which replaced the old one at Castle Garden at the tip of Manhattan. Ellis Island combined quarantine, customs, and reception. Twelve million people came through Ellis Island before it closed in 1954. It could be an intimidating experience as clerks asked a battery of questions, trying to be sure that no physically or mentally ill people or troublemakers were allowed into the country. They did not make life easy for anyone. Nevertheless, only about two percent of those who arrived at Ellis Island were actually turned away.
Those who were not permitted to enter typically either carried disease or came across in some way as unlikely to be able to support themselves.
During this process at Ellis Island, the clerks often gave immigrants a new anglicized name. A Russian named Cooperstein became Cooper, a Finn named Huttama became Hanson, or a Greek named Kiriacopoulis became Campbell. In one case, a German Jew became so confused with all the questions he was being asked that he forgot his own name. When he responded to the clerk’s question about his name with “Ich vergesse” (“I forget”), the clerk registered him as Ferguson.
Steamships from Europe also docked in Boston or Philadelphia where the government established similar centers. Immigrants from Canada and Mexico were sometimes processed at border crossing points, while at other times, they simply walked or rode across the long borders between the countries. In the Southwest, people had long traveled back and forth across the Rio Grande, and they did not stop doing so.
On the Pacific coast, most immigrants came through the Port of San Francisco. In 1910, the federal government created a processing center on Angel Island in San Francisco Bay that was designed to be a kind of West Coast Ellis Island. Over the next 30 years 175,000 immigrants entered the United States through Angel Island, the vast majority of them Chinese. Similar but smaller stations were created in other ports, especially Seattle.
Although Angel Island might have been designed as a counterpart to Ellis Island, it was a very different place. At both islands, immigrants faced frightening medical inspections and batteries of questions from federal immigration agents. But while most of those coming through Ellis Island left within a day, many on Angel Island were kept for weeks or months, occasionally for years. From the time of the passage of the Chinese Exclusion Act in 1882 until changes in U.S. policy in 1943, only Chinese immigrants who could prove that they were returning U.S. citizens or the children of U.S. citizens were allowed into the country. The Chinese immigrant population was essentially frozen at its 1882 levels.
However, the destruction of all federal records in the earthquake and fire in San Francisco in April 1906 meant that if someone claimed to be a U.S. citizen, it was hard to disprove the claim. So-called “paper sons,” came to the United States with high hopes that they could answer the required questions and gain admission to a country where they could make some money and avoid the wars and famine in China. Some succeeded. Others were deported back to China. As a result, Angel Island became a place of constant tension. Paul Chow, whose parents had come through Angel Island, remembered the fear the place evoked in his family. “Whenever my mother would mention it, she’d say, ‘Angel Island, shhh,”’ he said. “I thought it was all one word ‘Angelislandshh.’”
Chapter 17 The Gilded Age: Building a Technological and Industrial Giant and a New Social Order



Arrival at Angel Island in San Francisco might mean long waits in confining conditions for Asian immigrants like these Japanese women.
Melting pot
An often popular idea that somehow immigrants from other countries should quickly lose their culture and language and "melt" into being just like other Americans.
Although the phrase “melting pot” became a popular way to describe the influx of immigrants during the height of the immigration boom, the reality in United States was not quite what the popular phrase indicated. The term melting pot came from a play by Israel Zangwill, produced in New York in 1908, in which the hero wants to forget the pain of his life as a Jew in czarist Russia and announces that he is happy to be in America “Gods Crucible,” where he can be part of “the great Melting-Pot where all the races of Europe are melting and reforming.” In fact, many of those who arrived had no interest in “melting” into a common American culture but were, instead, creating a richly diverse nation of far more ethnic and cultural variety than had ever been seen before.
For Jews arriving in New York, the next step after leaving Castle Garden or Ellis Island was often to make their way to the Lower East Side of Manhattan, the heart of the Jewish community. To be in the Lower East Side in the 1880s and 1890s was, as Rose Cohen said, as though “we were still in our village in Russia.” There was little actual cultural melting going on, though people slowly took on more and more American ways. While one found friends there, living conditions were hard in some of those most crowded blocks in the country. The American Magazine described Lower East Side tenement housing in 1888:
They are great prison-like structures of brick, with narrow doors and windows, cramped passages and steep rickety stairs....The narrow court-yard... in the middle is a damp foul-smelling place, supposed to do duty as an airshaft....In the hot summer months...these fire-escape balconies are used as sleeping-rooms by the poor wretches who are fortunate enough to have windows opening upon them.
Bathrooms were at the end of the hall and were shared by multiple apartments.
Most apartments were packed with people as families crowded into tiny rooms and
took in borders who would help pay the rent. One 1908 survey found that 50 percent of families slept three or four persons to a room and another 25 percent had five or more persons per room.
Jewish immigrants found work where they could. Jewish peddlers sold nearly everything—fruit, vegetables, fish, clothing, kitchen utensils—filling streets like
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914


P'WI

W

CIGARETTES
-■<

> -i

M

f js.1
-X
17 J


'J-n

•&

L*
"AV^v *< >’W
Hester Street in New York's Lower East Side was the heart of the city's immigrant community.
Delancey Street with pushcart after pushcart, all selling something different and trying to convince passers-by to purchase. Even more Jewish immigrants found work in the garment industry. Many Russian Jews had survived as tailors (the Singer sewing machine was a major export from the United States to Russia). In America, skill with a needle meant a job. The demand for uniforms for the Union army led to the establishment of standard sizes for clothing, first for men and later for women, and this change allowed the development of mass-produced rather than individualized clothing. Because of the development of standard sizes, the garment trade was able to shift from made-to-order work for the elite to mass production of clothing for everyone. Men’s suits and pants, women’s dresses and shirtwaists, as blouses were called, were produced in the thousands, making the clothing business a major industry.
At first, garment work was done at home as families or small groups took in piece work and returned the finished products. Later, larger factories, known as sweatshops, brought together sometimes hundreds of workers who were expected to sew at a fast pace for long hours to ensure that they kept their jobs and the owners made a decent profit. One could walk for blocks in southern Manhattan and see nothing but such
Sweatshops
Small, poorly ventilated shops or apartments crammed with workers, often family members, who pieced together garments.
Garment workers sewing by hand in a small New York City sweatshop in1908. Photograph by Lewis Hine.
Chapter 17 The Gilded Age: Building a Technological and Industrial Giant and a New Social Order
work going on from early morning to late evening. In spite or perhaps because—of the harsh living and working conditions, New York s Jewish community grew strong. Russian Jews had no intention of returning to Russia where pogroms and poverty reigned. They established synagogues, foreign language newspapers provided news, and some 300 Hebrew schools maintained their language and culture.
Italian immigrants also created their own neighborhoods. In Chicago, Taylor Street became the heart of Little Italy. In Milwaukee, the Third Ward on the east side was the heart of the Italian community where some 20 Italian grocery stores existed on Brady Street alone. In Boston, the North End and East Boston housed Italian communities. And in New York, many Italian immigrants, like Russian Jewish immigrants, moved to the Lower East Side of Manhattan.
THINKING HISTORICALLY
The Pull of Nostalgia, the Push to Continue
In 1906, the Jewish Daily Forward, a Yiddish-language newspaper serving Jewish immigrants, began carrying an advice column in which the editor, Abraham Cahan responded to letters. One writer, a recent immigrant from Russia, said:
Oh, my poor dear parents, how saddened they were at my leaving. The leave-taking, their seeing me on my way, was like a silent funeral....I came to America and became a painter. My great love for Hebrew, for Russian, all my other knowledge was smeared with paint. During the year that I have been here I have had some good periods, but I am not happy because I have no interest in anything. My homesickness and loneliness darken my life....I want to run back...and I beg you to be my counsel as to how to act.
The editor was blunt noting that "almost all immigrants yearn deeply for dear ones and home at first," but that the young man "must not consider going home, but try to take root here. He should try to overcome all these emotions and strive to make something of himself so that in time he will be able to bring his parents here."
That same year, Hamilton Holt, editor of the New York Independent, published The Life Stories of Undistinguished Americans As Told by Themselves, 27 accounts of the immigrant experience including several by those who considered a return to their homeland but who had decided against it. An Italian immigrant who shined shoes in New York City who wrote:
We had said that when we saved $1,000 each we would go back to Italy and buy a farm, but now that the time is coming we are so busy and making so much money that we think we will stay.
A
Swedish immigrant who prospered as a farmer in Minnesota wrote: Father and mother kept writing to the children in America that now they had made their fortunes they should come home and live, but they put it off...., am going over to
Sweden soon to keep Christmas there....but will come back again, and maybe bring other people with us. Some Swedes go to the old country every Christmas.
A modern researcher, Erika Lee, found that her great-great-great-grandfather, Moy Dong Kee, had come to California in 1854, before the Chinese Exclusion Act limited Chinese mobility. Though he stayed in the United States for 52 years, he was able to make at least three trips to visit his family who remained in China. He finally retired to China in 1906 at the age of 72.
Some immigrants indeed traveled back and forth often. Others made their fortunes in America and then returned to their homelands. Perhaps a quarter or more of all Italian immigrants eventually returned to Italy, an unusually high percentage among immigrant communities, but a little money earned in America could translate into land ownership in Italy. In other immigrant communities—especially among Russian Jews facing pogroms and conscription into the czarist army—very few ever returned. The pull of nostalgia and the usually stronger push to continue to make a life in their new adopted home was part of the life of almost every immigrant.
Source: Isaac Metzker, A Bintel Brief: Sixty Years of Letters from the Lower East Side to the Jewish Daily Forward (New York: Doubleday, 1971), pp. 117-118. cited in Robert D. Marcus, et al, America Firsthand: Volume Two, Readings from Reconstruction to the Present (Boston: Bedford/St. Martins, 2004), pp. 121-122.
Thinking Critically
1.	Crafting an Argument
What do the reasons immigrants gave for wanting to leave or wanting to stay tel, you about their reasons for immigrating in the first place?
2.	Contextualization
Why might some immigrants have found it easier than others to return to their home country? Why was such a trip almost impossible for others?
”‘^81
04 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Since most Italian immigrants came from the rural poverty of southern Italy, they had few marketable skills when they got to the United States. Like Russian Jews, some became pushcart owners, selling fruits and vegetables. Others opened restaurants. More than a few became the laborers who built the cities where they lived: New York, Chicago, Milwaukee, and Boston all have water and sewer lines dug by Italian laborers. Gender roles were, perhaps, more rigidly defined in the Italian immigrant communities than elsewhere. Italian families tried every way they could to encourage married women to stay at home and to depend on the men to earn a living for the family.
For the 900,000 French Canadians who emigrated to the United States between 1840 and 1930, the move south meant escape from rural poverty and a chance for a new start, especially in the mills of New England. More than most immigrant groups, those coming from Quebec tended to bring their priests (nearly all French Canadians were Catholic), doctors, lawyers, and grocers with them, all of whom were sure that life might be better—or at least marginally more prosperous—in rapidly industrializing New York and New England than in the isolated farms of Quebec.
Like the Italians and the French Canadians, Mexican immigrants often moved back and forth between the United States and home communities, but in their case, that move meant crossing only a river rather than an ocean. Nevertheless, more and more immigrants from Mexico eventually made permanent homes in the United States, creating the barrios, which were often extensions of Mexican communities that had long stretched along the border from Texas to California.
Mexican-American communities, like those of European immigrants, often reflected quite different home regions. One immigrant remembered, “We came to know families from Chihuahua, Sonora, Jalisco, and Durango. Some had come to the United States even before the revolution, living in Texas before migrating to California.” The barrio was also home in other ways. Immigrants from Mexico could find familiar food, including tamales, frijoles, tortillas, and menudo. They could see traditional clothing, enjoy traditional holidays and festivals, and feel much less like strangers in someone else’s land.
For all Catholic immigrants, the Catholic Church was an essential link with their faith and their past. At the end of the U.S. Civil War, there were 42 dioceses and 3,000 Catholic churches in the United States. By 1900, there were 70 dioceses and 10,000 churches, many serving specific ethnic communities. The Italian parish, the Polish parish, the Mexican parish, and the German parish might be in very close proximity, but they served their own group, often offering parochial schools and classes in a home language that was important to parents coping with children growing up in an English-speaking society.
Those who entered the United States from Asia found different kinds of work in their own ethnic communities. Chinese immigrants such as Lee Chew found work when they could:
When I got to San Francisco... [a] man got me work as a house servant in an American family, and my start was the same as that of almost all the Chinese in this country. The Chinese laundryman does not learn his trade in China; there are no laundries in China... .All Chinese laundrymen here were taught in the first place by American women just as I was taught.
For the Japanese in Hawaii (an independent country until 1898), housing and work
were found on the sugar plantations, which were new to them. Hawaiian companies
encouraged whole families to immigrate, believing that “dependable married men
made better workers, though both women and men were given jobs in the fields.
Japanese communities were able to establish themselves with their own traditions,
religious practices including Buddhist temples, Japanese-language schools for chil-
dren, and festivals including the Emperor s Birthday when work ceased in spite of
the frustration of the plantation owners. In time, Japanese, Portuguese, Chinese, and
Chapter 17 The Gilded Age: Building a Technological and Industrial Giant and a New Social Orden
'M 1
native Hawaiian workers got to know one another other, exchanged food, and developed real if tenuous friendships.
17.4
Quick Review Which were more important in bringing immigrants to the United States in the late 1800s and early 1900s—the push factors or the pull factors? Give at least three reasons to justify your answer.
CONCLUSION
Ihe well-named Gilded Age was a time of great extremes. In the decades after the Civil War, Americans built bigger corporations, cities, and buildings than ever before. Some made huge fortunes and lived a life of lavish spending. Other Americans created a new middle class. Still others, especially immigrants living in tightly packed urban communities, lived on the edge of poverty while also creating new cultures with their own values and norms. All of them created a vastly different nation than any previous generation had known.
During the Gilded Age, America emerged as an industrial giant. Technological innovation and vast reserves of coal, oil, steel, and timber, along with well-established but expanding railroad networks, fueled a growing economy. New forms of corporate ownership developed to direct and manage large-scale industrial operations, and private investment banks grew immensely rich and influential along with the industrialists whose ventures they helped to finance. The few who managed to generate great wealth often spent lavishly on homes and possessions as a reflection of their power and position, sealing the reputation of the period as one of shameless excess gotten by ruthless economic exploitation.
While a few grew enormously wealthy, a new middle class also emerged in the Gilded Age. Made up mostly of the families of men who worked at the middle levels and managed the large new corporations, the middle class created its own new lifestyle. City services—from a healthy supply of water to new high-rise buildings with elevators to giant department stores catered to the needs of this growing middle class. Many in the middle class also sought some distance from the cities, and the rail and trolley lines facilitated the growth of suburbs in which large private homes replaced apartments and people enjoyed a mix of urban and rural amenities. From religion to sports to politics, the United States catered to the new middle class.
The rapidly expanding new industries needed workers, and the call for workers exerted a pull on people living in far distant places, including Russia, Italy, China, and Japan. At the same time, developments in these and other countries were creating a push that led many to want to leave. Whether it was the anti-Jewish pogroms in Russia or the grinding poverty of Italy or the civil wars that wracked China, the chance to leave for a better life was so appealing that the United States experienced a massive era of immigration between 1880 and 1914. Once in the United States, immigrants were not always welcomed. Many native-born Americans distrusted what they saw as foreign cultures. Many immigrants resisted giving up old ways. But the jobs—though low level and low pay—were there and immigrants began working in agriculture and in the booming urban sweatshops that were clothing the country and the world.
As a result of all of these changes, by 1900, the United States was a very different place than it had been only a few short decades earlier.
CHAPTER
REVIEW
What were the three biggest differences in the United States in 1900 as a result of the events, trends, and innovations of the Gilded Age?
>06 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Chapter 17 Chapter Review
TECHNOLOGY CHANGES THE NATION
LIVES OF THE MIDDLE CLASS IN THE GILDED AGE
17.1
Explain the inventions of the late 1800s and their impact
Review Questions
1.	Crafting an Argument
In your opinion, what was the most important technological innovation of the late 1800s? Why?
2.	Historical Interpretation
How does the rise of the automobile industry illustrate the connection between technological innovation and industrial growth and consolidation in the late 1800s and early 1900s?
173
Analyze daily life, popular ideas, and political direction for the middle class during the Gilded Age.
Review Questions
6.	Contextualization
How did architecture and urban design of the late 1800s reflect middle-class values and aspirations?
7.	Synthesis
What connections can you make between the growth of American business and changes in American religious life in the late 1800s?
CORPORATIONS AND MONOPOLIES
17.2
Analyze the role of the new giant corporations in American life.
Review Questions
3.	Historical Interpretation
What does the Panic of 1873 tell us about the role of speculation in the American economy of the late 1800s?
4.	Comparison
Compare and contrast American manufacturing in the early 1900s and the late 1900s. What had changed? Why?
5.	Historical Interpretation
What does J. P. Morgan’s involvement in the Panic of 1893 and in its resolution tell us about the nature of American industry at the turn of the century?
17.4
IMMIGRATION_____________________________________________
Explain the reasons immigrants came to the United States in such large numbers during the Gilded Age and what their experience was.
Review Questions
8.	Cause and Effect
What factors explain the migration of large numbers of eastern European Jews to the United States at the turn of the century?
9.	Comparison
What did immigrants hope to find in America? How did their expectations compare with reality?
10.	Historical Interpretation
What might explain the formation of ethnic neighborhoods in the late 1800s? What advantages did such neighborhoods provide to new immigrants?
Chapter 17
The Gilded Age:
Building a Technological and Industrial Giant and a
New Social Order
184
18.2
183
CHAPTER OBJECTIVE
Demonstrate an understanding of how the rapid industrialization after the Civil War impacted the lives of diverse people and the rise of distinct resistance movements.
LEARNING OBJECTIVES
CONFLICT IN THE NEW SOUTH_____________________
Analyze how the combined impact of industrialism and the end of Reconstruction created the unique character of the New South.
THE POLITICS OF CONFLICT—FROM POPULIST MOVEMENT TO POPULIST PARTY
Analyze how agrarian unrest and protest came to have a significant impact on American politics.
WORKER PROTEST AND THE RISE OF ORGANIZED LABOR_____________________________
Explain the tensions in industrial America that led to major labor strife between the 1870s and 1914.

Drivers and mules with young laborers in a West Virginia coal mine in a 1908 photo by Lewis Hine.
When he accepted the nomination of the newly growing Socialist Party for president in the 1912 presidential elections, Eugene V. Debs said:
The world’s workers have always been and still are the world’s slaves. They have...produced all the world’s wealth and supported all the world’s governments. They have conquered all things but their own freedom.
It was the goal of the Socialist Party, Debs said, to win that freedom. Debs had an expansive goal for his political organization—a party for women and men, blacks and whites, struggling farmers as well as factory and railroad workers. When the presidential election was held in November, Debs won some 900,000 votes, or 6 percent of the total. Although that percentage was small, it reflected nonetheless unusual support for a nontraditional candidate.
In a nation in the midst of rapid social change, Debs sought to speak for those being hurt by the changes. Although he failed to rally as many as he hoped to his political banner, his campaign reflected the deep tensions in the United States in the late 1800s and early 1900s. In the face of extraordinary
►8 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
v
18.1
Significant Dates
technological and industrial change, many were angry. This chapter traces the reasons so many Americans were angry in the years between 1877 and 1914 and the results of that anger in reshaping the political and cultural life of the nation. Chapter 19 traces the ways that yet other Americans began to tackle the problems of this era.
CONFLICT IN THE NEW SOUTH_____________________
Analyze how the combined impact of industrialism and the end of Reconstruction created the unique character of the New South.
In 1886, the young editor of the Atlanta Constitution, Henry Grady, was invited to New York City to speak at the prestigious New England Society of New York, one of the city’s most elite groups. Coming 20 years after the end of the Civil War, the invitation was quite an honor for a Southern newspaper editor. The society, like Grady, was ready for a fresh start regarding the nations regional differences. Grady was in New York to tell his audience that a New South had been born. The New South was not like the old version. It had been born, Grady said, out of the defeat of the Souths “brave armies” in the late war and the ending of slavery. A new day had begun. But it had begun under leaders who, though moving in new ways, were proud of their past and wanted to be clear, “The South has nothing for which to apologize... .The South has nothing to take back.”
The New South meant several things to Grady. First, Grady was saying that that the South was done apologizing for the Civil War, for slavery, and for the increasingly rigid social, political, and economic segregation that was developing in place of slavery. On race relations, the South, Grady said, wanted to be left alone. Grady was also announcing that the South had come of age economically. It was building railroads and industrializing at an impressive pace, and Southerners wanted to be fully integrated into the economic prosperity of the rest of the nation. On the economic front, the New South that Grady was discussing was indeed different from the Old South.
Economic Development and Economic Optimism
1877	Great Railroad Strike
1882	Agricultural Wheel farmers' organization
launched
1886	Haymarket bombing
Henry Grady announces the"New South"
Charles W. Macune elected president of the Farmers'Alliance beginning its rapid growth
1890	New Mississippi state constitution effectively excludes blacks from voting
Farmers'Alliance establishes headquarters in Washington, DC
United Mine Workers of America founded in Columbus, Ohio
1891	The People's Party (Populists) launched
1892	Homestead strike
1893	American Railway Union organized
1894	Coxey's Army marches on Washington, DC Pullman strike
U.S.
Supreme Court's Plessy v. Ferguson decision William Jennings Bryan runs for president on Democratic and Populist Party tickets
1905 Industrial Workers of the World organized Niagara Movement organized
1909 National Association for the Advancement of Colored People launched
i
i
The pre-Civil War South had been dominated by agriculture. In the New South, sawmills, factories, mines, and railroads were being built, and old wooden buildings were being replaced with new brick ones in many towns. Optimism was growing, though not everyone was celebrating. The decline in the price of cotton was devastating farmers, and for most African-Americans, segregation and exclusion made life almost unbearable. Nevertheless, for a fortunate subset of white Southerners, the years between 1875 and 1900 were a time for optimism.
Before the Civil War, the South had far fewer miles of railroad track than the North. Catching up on railroad construction was a key element in defining the New South. The new railroads brought all sorts of change. The investment in building railroads— much of it Northern or European money—brought work to many Southerners, not only those who did the actual work of laying track but also those supporting them. As one Mississippi resident noted, “The women and children were busy producing vegetable crops, chickens, eggs, milk and butter, and the men were butchering and delivering fresh meat and other supplies to the men working on the railroad.” Once the new lines were in place, there were also jobs working on the railroads. The work was dangerous and injuries were common, but the pay was better than anything many Southerners had seen.
The rail lines provided Southerners with important new connections to the outside world (see Maps 18-1A and 18-IB). A generation earlier, rail lines had connected many parts of the North, but when the rail lines finally reached an isolated town like Harrison, Arkansas, in February 1900, the local newspaper announced, “Harrison is a Rail-road Town At Last.” Henry Hammond, an astute observer of Southern life, pointed out that country people “who formerly were satisfied with their weekly paper, who went to town annually or semiannually, in some instances not more than two
1911	Triangle Shirtwaist Fire
1912	Bread and Roses strike in Lawrence, Massachusetts
1914 Colorado miner's strike
New South
An ideology developed by some elite Southerners that declared an end to the nostalgia for slavery and plantation life and a beginning for the economic development of the South while protecting the growing racial segregation of the region from any Northern interference.
fe
Chapter 18 Responses to Industrialism, Responses to Change
182
182
iWhdelii
i
i
MAP 18-1A
and MAP 18-1B Expanding Southern Railroads, 1859-1899. Map 1A at top illustrates the extent of railroad lines in 1859 on the eve of the Civil War. Map 1B illustrates the expansion of rail lines by 1899. Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
or three times during a long life, can now go quickly, safely, pleasantly and cheaply several times a day. Farms were connected to towns, and towns to cities beyond the imaginings of people’s parents and grandparents.
The railroads that brought people to town also brought goods from around the world while shipping goods that the South produced to world markets. Country stores sold manufactured goods that made life easier and fertilizer that made the land more productive.
In many small towns, stores also sold goods on credit, making them virtually banks. In this capacity, stores also accepted fields planted in cotton as collateral for loans, as cotton remained the prime cash crop of the South.
In addition to cotton, new industries were growing in the South in the 1880s. Sawmills and turpentine camps produced lumber and turpentine that was shipped around the world. Phosphate mining expanded but was then eclipsed by coal mining as new markets demanded coal. Tobacco, which the South had shipped to the world since the 1600s, became a growth industry. Using effective advertising and marketing skills, Julian Carr shipped his Bull Durham tobacco bags worldwide, and Washington Duke and his son James shipped prerolled cigarettes that quickly became the most popular way to enjoy “clean, quick, and potent” tobacco. Iron and steel were produced at the South’s fastest growing city of Birmingham. The South’s textile production, which had involved 10,000 people in 1870 (as it had in 1850), employed almost 100,000 by 1900. Finally, a new product, Coca-Cola, developed by Asa G. Candler in 1889, became highly popular and, eventually, a drink of choice for many on every continent.
Nostalgia and Celebration of the "Lost Cause"
The rapid changes in the South made some uneasy. The movement of Southerners—white and black—in search of jobs and economic opportunities created a sense of dislocation. C. L. Pettigrew of North Carolina, like many others, remembered a slower pace and complained about “that striving, rough and eager crowd.” Others mourned to see “the white-columned porticos of the favorite colonial architecture now maundering in decay,” as ambitious young people moved to opportunities elsewhere.
Simmering in the South were deep generational tensions between Confederate veterans and those who had been born too late to remember the war. A Texas veteran wrote to the legislature, asking them to be sure that “the sons of Confederates and the public generally” remember the Lost Cause. Another ex-Confederate, Wade Hampton, insisted, “I believe now, as always, that the South was right.” For veterans like Hampton and others and for Southern widows of those who had died in the war, the memory of the “Lost Cause” as a glorious time and a righteous fight made the pain of a sometimes lonely and often economically challenging present more bearable.
Southern writers produced romantic stories of the “Lost Cause ’ of the Civil War and the days of slavery that preceded it. Thomas Nelson Page, of a prominent Virginia family, created the “plantation school of writing, recounting tales of a chivalrous past. Page also started the tradition of the wise and loyal slave, who, Page told his white read-
ers, longed for the days before the war when everyone had a secure place in a well-ordered society. The most famous author of the plantation school, Joel Chandler Harris, created the fictional elderly black man, Uncle Remus, and his animal alter-ego, Brer Rabbit. The Uncle Remus stories first published in the Atlanta Constitution in 1879 and then as a popular book, portrayed the Old South as a romantic and happy place.
5 nt?
WJ


This ad from the 1890s introduces the new drink, Coca Cola, which was one of the many new industries that emerged in the South.
Chapter 18 Responses to Industrialism, Responses to Chang<
Religion in the New South
Religion also played a crucial role in the post-Reconstruction South. Southerners did not actually attend church in greater numbers than their Northern counterparts, but religious imagery and biblical language were a strong part of the Souths culture. With the coming of freedom, Southern blacks quickly joined or established their own churches. By 1890, there were 1.3 million black Baptists in the South. Northern black churches, especially the African Methodist Episcopal and African Methodist Episcopal Zion denominations, also built churches for Southern blacks. Ihe black church became the place in the segregated South where former slaves could meet with a measure of safety, share and build and new communal identity, and control the intellectual and cultural life of their own institution.
White Southerners also gravitated to churches in the 1880s and 1890s. Baptist bodies were the largest group of white churches in the South, but the Methodists claimed almost as many members. Also strong were the Disciples of Christ, the Presbyterians, and in certain areas of the South, Episcopalians and Roman Catholics. In white and black churches, nearly all of the clergy were male, but women could play a large role in the churches, particularly through women’s associations and mission groups, which provided necessary support to these churches and through which women could exercise a level of autonomy.
A conductor evicts a well-dressed black man from a first-class coach. Enforcing segregation on the railroad coach was seen by many white southerners as somehow essential to protecting white women.
Creating the Segregated South
The railroads that knit the New South together quickly became the focus of the Souths great unresolved issue—race. Even though the political rights of African-Americans had been declining in the South since the defeat of Reconstruction in the 1870s, the South of the 1880s and early 1890s was not the rigidly segregated place it would become by 1900. Churches were segregated by custom and choice. Schools, hospitals, and hotels were generally segregated by law. Blacks were confined to the balcony in most theaters, and the races did not mix in restaurants. However, in many places of work, at many political gatherings, and in travel, blacks and whites could be found together in the South of the late 1800s. Ihe railroads were certainly not going to build separate lines or even run separate trains, and most railroads saw all talk of racial segregation as potentially troublesome and expensive. Nevertheless, trouble was brewing.
As passenger railroads developed in the South between 1865 and 1880, they generally offered two classes of service—a first-class car for women and men who did not smoke or chew tobacco, and a second-class car—often a section of the baggage car—for men who used tobacco or people too poor to buy a first-class ticket. In some cases, blacks were assumed to belong in the second-class car with the tobacco-using white men; however, in many cases, blacks rode first class without incident. In any case, a trip that might start without incident could quickly turn ugly. In the early 1880s, a black man was asked by the conductor to leave the first-class car after the train crossed the state line from Tennessee to Georgia. When he refused, he was badly beaten by other passengers. In 1889, a delegation from the first African Baptist Church of Savannah, Georgia, started their journey to a church convention in Indianapolis, Indiana, on the East Tennessee, Virginia and Georgia Railroad. The well-dressed delegates started out comfortably in first class, but they were met at a subsequent train stop by a mob of 50 white men with pistols and clubs who attacked them and threatened to “blow your G-d-d brains out.”
While the railroads did not want to take action, state legislatures did. In railroad cars, people of different races—and equally important,
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
genders might mix in especially close contact given the close seating. During the late 1800s, whites were developing an especially great fear of any contact between black men and white women. As one person wrote, a man “would be horrified at the idea of his wife or daughter seated by the side of a burly negro.” Tennessee was the first state to respond, enacting a law saying, “All railroad companies shall furnish separate cars, or portions of cars cut off by partition wall, which all colored passengers who pay first-class rates of fare may have the privilege to enter and occupy. The law seemed to imply that it was up to blacks whether they wanted to be segregated or not, but clearly that idea was not the way the arrangement worked. Across the South, trains were rigidly segregated a decade before the 1896 U.S. Supreme Court s 7-to-l decision in Plessy v. Ferguson declared that “separate but equal” transportation—and, by implication, other matters—did not violate the equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution.

The Politics of Exclusion
The end of the racially integrated governments of the Reconstruction era and the almost complete exclusion of African-Americans from the political life of the South took place in two distinct stages between the 1870s and 1900. These stages are often merged in the popular mind as if they happened all at once, though they did not.
The first step in ending Reconstruction took place in the 1860s and 1870s (see Chapter 14). Black legislators and white legislators who supported them (all of whom were Republicans) were defeated by white Democratic segregationists at different times in different states, nearly always in elections marked by violence and voter intimidation. Virginia was the first to shift from a Republican to a Democratic legislature in 1869. Conservative Democrats soon also won large majorities in other states—North Carolina in 1870, Georgia in 1871, Texas in 1873, Alabama and Arkansas in 1874, and South Carolina and Mississippi in 1876. Finally, contested elections in Louisiana and Florida were awarded to the Democrats in 1877 as part of the same compromise that put Hayes in the White House. The withdrawal of most federal troops that the newly inaugurated Hayes ordered in 1877 was thus the culmination, not the cause of the end of Reconstruction.
However, the defeat of Reconstruction was not the end of the story. While every Southern state had a conservative Democratic legislature and governor after 1877, quite a few blacks still voted and some were still elected and appointed to public offices in the South for another decade. Black voters could provide the margin of victory in close contests. Most state legislatures had at least a few African-American representatives, and many federally appointed officials from postmasters to census officials were black. In 1891, as the Arkansas legislature was debating railroad segregation, it was a black legislator, John Gray Lucas, who objected. It was also a black delegate to Mississippi’s 1895 state constitutional convention, Thomas E. Miller, who told the majority that they needed to remember, “It was your love of power and your arrogance which brought Reconstruction on you.”
In most cases, the few black office holders remaining were too few in number to have an impact. Nevertheless, some whites objected to the close interactions that challenged racial and gender conventions in certain offices such as when a white woman visited the post office to be helped by a black male postmaster. When the Republicans won the White House and Congress in 1888, some white Southerners feared a repeat of Reconstruction, perhaps even the appointment of federal election officials who would monitor Southern election procedures. At the same time, a new generation of Southern whites were tired of the Klan-style violence that
Chapter 18 Responses to Industrialism, Responses to Chan'
18.1
18.2
183
accompanied elections. An 1889 article in the Jackson, Mississippi, Clarion-Ledger said, “The old men of the present generation can’t afford to die and leave the election to their children and grandchildren, with shot guns in their hands, a lie in their mouths and perjury on their lips in order to defeat the negroes. The solution to the election violence that the newspaper wanted was not to hold fair and race-neutral elections but, rather, to establish legal means to exclude all blacks from all political participation.
Fears of black political involvement grew in the 1890s when the Populist move-ment disrupted Southern politics. It was one thing for a handful of blacks in the state legislature to raise questions about a bill before the white majority voted for whatever it wanted. It was a different matter if the white Democratic majority was split between Populist and traditional factions and the black representatives had the tie-breaking votes or if, as happened in North Carolina, a Populist-Republican ticket, with black support, could actually win the majority of seats in a state legislature. In 1896, South Carolina’s arch-segregationist Governor Ben Tillman warned of an “unholy alliance between the independents and the negroes.”
For many Southern whites, the solution was a new set of laws that would ensure “white supremacy” forever. Political leaders called new state constitutional conventions to ensure that they secured absolute power. Blacks and their white allies had been marginalized by the violence and the voting that ended Reconstruction, but the new state constitutions of the 1890s moved from marginalization to complete exclusion. When the work of these new constitutional conventions was done, extremely few black voters and no black office holders remained anywhere in what came to be known as the “solid South,” which meant solidly white and Democratic.
Mississippi rewrote its state constitution in 1890, creating what looked like colorblind obstacles that would, in practice, stop all blacks from voting. The most obvious restrictions—a literacy test or a poll tax or a property qualification for voters—would also exclude many poor whites who were themselves illiterate and who could not meet a property qualification or pay a poll tax. So Mississippi’s delegates created a complex set of limitations on voting and office. To be able to vote, the new constitution said, a person had to have lived in the state for at least 2 years and in the election district for at least 1; a sharecropper who moved for a better chance at life thus lost the right to participate in elections at least for a time. Other states instituted “grandfather clauses” that said anyone whose grandfather had been a voter was exempt from other restrictions, a privilege no descendent of slaves could claim. Those intending to vote in Mississippi and elsewhere could not do so if they had been convicted of petty crimes such as arson, bigamy, or petty theft, crimes that blacks were routinely charged with. Ironically, conviction for murder, rape, or grand larceny did not exclude one from voting. The Mississippi convention did require a modest poll tax. Finally, the convention adopted a requirement that every voter be able to understand and interpret the state constitution. White state-appointed registrars would decide whose interpretation was “reasonable.” An editorial in the Jackson, Mississippi, Clarion-Ledger described the new system: “ [I] f every negro in Mississippi was a graduate of Harvard.. .he would not be as well fitted to exercise the right of suffrage as the Anglo-Saxon farm laborer.” Once the new Mississippi Constitution took effect, it had its intended impact. Once other Southern states observed what was happening in Mississippi, they too adopted the approach.
After the U.S. Supreme Court declared poll taxes and literacy tests to be constitutional in their 1898 ruling in Williams v. Mississippi, there was little chance that any Southern state would fail to enact such Mississippi-style voting tests. In 1908, Texas became the last state of the former Confederacy to add a poll tax, and across the region, that tax was usually one of several mechanisms that ended black voting.
Then, as though all of the new laws were not enough, a new form of violence toward African-Americans emerged in the late 1800s. Where the Kian and other groups had terrorized black communities during Reconstruction, the spectacle of
Part VI Becoming an industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
public lynching became widespread in the following years. Individual African-Americans, often young men, were singled out, often accused with little or no evidence of raping a white woman, and hung in a public spectacle. The issue was rarely an actual rape but, more often, a young black man’s failure to observe the customs of stepping out of the way for a white person to pass or a black man’s challenging the payment of a landowner at the sharecroppers settle, or a black man asserting his political rights. Most of all, lynching was a way to strike terror into the black community while asserting and celebrating white dominance. In 1900, the New South was fast becoming a region governed exclusively by white voters and white elected officials and would remain so until the black Civil Rights movement of the 1950s, 1960s, and 1970s transformed the region and the nation.

I M2
Ml
African-American Responses
As the rigid segregation of “separate but equal,” which everyone knew meant separate and very unequal, settled on the South and, indeed, much of the country, especially after 1896, African-Americans debated how to respond to a legal system that excluded them from voting. In addition, they considered their response to being barred from access to quality schooling and to any but the most menial jobs as well as to being restricted from entering rail cars, hotels, or theaters that served whites. They also argued responses to cultural expectations that they “give way,” allowing whites to pass in front of them in stores and on sidewalks, that they call all whites by their last names while they were called by their first names by whites, and that they live with the oppressive knowledge that even the slightest challenge to segregation could be met with not only ostracism but also unimaginable violence.
Ida B. Wells (1862-1931) was one of the African-Americans who challenged the lynchings that were a key part of the violence used to maintain segregation. Between 1889 and 1918, 386 lynchings took place in Georgia, 373 in Mississippi, and similar numbers in several other states. Wells argued that the rape charge, which was often the excuse for lynching a black man, was a “thread-bare lie” and a cover for punishing any black man who challenged the rules of segregation. In response to her writing, a white mob destroyed her printing press at her Memphis Free Press, but throughout her life, she continued to write, publish, and organize legal challenges to segregation and especially its maintenance through the violence of lynchings.
In the face of the harsh reality of segregation and exclusion, Booker T. Washington (1856-1915), perhaps the nation’s best-known African-American leader, argued that it was time to adjust to segregation rather than challenge the laws and customs excluding blacks. Washington urged blacks to create an economic foundation for themselves. In the midst of the harsh realities of the 1890s, Washington’s course of action seemed the only realistic option.
Not all African-Americans agreed with Washington, and a young African-American scholar, W.E.B. Du Bois (1868-1963), became his harshest critic. Du Bois criticized compromises and wrote that “the problem of the twentieth century is the problem of the color line.” He described the kind of “double consciousness” or “twon-ess” that African-Americans were forced to develop in a country that proclaimed liberty but excluded them by law and custom.
In 1905, Du Bois joined other African-American leaders meeting at Niagara Falls-in a hotel on the Canadian side because no hotel on the American side would give them rooms—to begin a campaign for “every single right that belongs to a free-born American, political, civil, and social” without compromise. The Niagara Movement that emerged from the conference fought for an end to segregation and for full equality for African-Americans. Four years later, in February 1909, Du Bois, others from

hr


Ida B. Wells-Barnett became the most effective national spokesperson for the antilynching crusade.
Niagara Movement
African-American group organized in 1905 to promote racial integration, civil and political rights, and equal access to economic opportunity; the movement later helped organize the NAACP.
Chapter 18 Responses to Industrialism, Responses to Change
18.1
THINKING HISTORICALLY
Debating Booker T. Washington's "Cast Down Your Buckets Where You Are" Speech
On September 18, 1895, Booker T. Washington gave a speech to a mostly white audience at the Cotton States and International Exposition in Atlanta, Georgia. Washington came to the exposition at the height of his career to offer what came to be known as the Atlanta Compromise—that African-Americans would accept segregation in return for being able to develop economically. So Washington said:
To those of my race...l would say: "Cast down your bucket where you are"—cast it down in making friends in every manly way with the people of all races with whom we are surrounded. Cast it down in agriculture, mechanics, in commerce, in domestic service, and in the professions....
In all things that are purely social we can be as separate as the fingers, yet one as the hand in all things essential to mutual progress... .The wisest among my race understand that the agitation of questions of social equality is the extremist folly, and that progress in the enjoyment of all the privileges that will come to us must be the result of severe and constant struggle rather than of artificial forcing. No race that has anything to contribute to the markets of the world is long in any degree ostracized. It is important and right that all privileges of the law be ours, but it is vastly more important that we be prepared for the exercise of these privileges. The opportunity to earn a dollar in a factory just now is worth infinitely more than the opportunity to spend a dollar in an opera-house.
At the time, the speech was greeted with great applause, most of all, on the part of Northern white philanthropists who poured money into Tuskegee and other ventures supported by Washington.
Eight years later in 1903, W.E. B. Du Bois published The Souls of
Black Folk. Du Bois was unsparing in his judgment, writing:
Mr. Washington represents in Negro thought the old
attitude of adjustment and submission......In answer
to this, it has been claimed that the Negro can survive only through submission. Mr. Washington distinctly asks that black people give up, at least for the present, three things—
First, political power,
Second, insistence on civil rights,
Third, higher education of Negro youth—
And concentrate all their energies on industrial education, the accumulation of wealth, and the conciliation of the South. This policy has been courageously and insistently advocated for over fifteen years, and has been triumphant for perhaps ten years. As a result of this tender of the palm-branch, what has been the return? In these years there have occurred:
1.	The disfranchisement of the Negro.
2.	The legal creation of a distinct status of civil inferiority for the Negro.
3.	The steady withdrawal of aid from institutions for the higher training of the Negro.
These movements are not, to be sure, direct results of Mr. Washington's teachings; but his propaganda has, without a shadow of doubt, helped their speedier accomplishment. The question then comes: Is it possible, and probable, that nine millions of men can make effective progress in economic lines if they are deprived of political rights, made a servile caste, and allowed only the most meager chance for developing their exceptional men?
Considering these quotes, the lines between Du Bois and Washington could not have been starker. In reality, they were not as stark as the two documents imply. Privately, Washington provided funds for court challenges of segregation and challenged lynchings, but unlike Du Bois, he had been born in slavery and lived and worked in Alabama in the heart of a segregated world. Du Bois, a generation younger, was raised in the North, and had much less patience with any form of accommodation. Nevertheless, between them, the two leaders outlined differences that remained in the African-American community for decades.
Source: Booker T. Washington, Up From Slavery: An Autobiography (New York: Doubleday-Page, 1901); W.E.B. Du Bois, The Souls of Black Folk (Chicago: A.C. McClurg, 1903).
Thinking Critically
1.	Comparison
What do you see as the starkest differences between Washington and Du Bois?
2.	Contextualization
Why did Du Bois believe that economic and political progress for African-Americans were inextricably linked? Why did Washington think they could be separated?

in
516 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
the Niagara Movement, and additional African-American leaders, including Ida B. Wells, Mary McLeod Bethune, and Mary Church Terrell, joined with white reformers, including Jane Addams, John Dewey, Clarence Darrow, and Lincoln Steffens. They created the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People (the NAACP) to fight for full enforcement of the Fourteenth and Fifteenth Amendments; bring public exposure and legal challenges to the mostly unpunished wave of lynchings that were happening in all parts of the country; and begin what would be a long, slow legal process of court challenges to the “separate but equal” laws that provided the legal foundation for black exclusion.
Atlanta Compromise
An 1895 proposal from BookerT. Washington that African-Americans remain separate from whites while focusing on economic self-help.
18.2
National Association for the Advancement of Colored People (NAACP)
An interracial organization founded in 1910 dedicated to restoring African-American political and social rights.
Quick Review Is "New South" an appropriate name for the society that emerged after Reconstruction? Consider the economics, politics, and social aspects of the region in formulating your answer.
THE POLITICS OF CONFLICT—FROM POPULIST MOVEMENT TO POPULIST PARTY
18.2
Analyze how agrarian unrest and protest came to have a significant impact on American politics.
In the 1870s and 1880s, American farmers were living very difficult lives. The work was backbreaking. They had no time for much of an education and far too little time for family or community life. The economic cycles seemed structured against them. Whenever farmers started to get ahead financially, they faced a downturn because of a glut of wheat in Russia or overproduction of cotton in Egypt or some other issue, leaving them in a pattern of debt. Even in good times, it seemed that the railroads and middlemen in New York or New Orleans or London or Paris took the profits that they produced. Perhaps most galling to many farmers was the sense that the rapid changes happening in the rest of the country seemed to be leaving them behind. It is not accidental that the derogatory word “hayseed,” entered the nations vocabulary at this time. Urban America saw itself as up to date and modern but saw farmers, living in isolated rural areas, as backward and out of date. Moreover, the new technologies that enabled rapid communication let these farmers know just what others in the country thought of them. Jefferson’s agrarian ideal seemed like part of a very dim past.
The Farmers7 Alliance and Other Farm Groups
By the beginning of the 1880s, many farmers were deeply in debt to the banks on which they depended for their mortgages and for loans to obtain equipment and supplies for the planting year. Railroads, that might give a break to John D. Rockefeller’s Standard Oil, kept raising the rates to haul farm products to market. By the time farmers paid off their loans and paid to get the wheat, corn, and other farm products to market, they had little, if any, money left. Eventually, farmers started to do something to change their circumstances. Nelson Dunning of the Farmers’ Alliance, wrote, “Nothing could withstand their power, if the farmers of America would organize,” particularly, as he believed, in ways the Standard Oil Company had done. In the Farmers’ Alliance and eventually in their own political party, farmers, who had indeed been observing what the Rockefellers and Carnegies of the nation were doing, tried to create their own power base.
The earliest nationwide farmer organization was the Patrons of Husbandry, also known as “the Grange.” Farmers gathered in Grange Halls to celebrate their work and foster a sense of community, but they also organized to deal with the chronic debt and the sense that the nation’s financial arrangements were stacked against them. Especially in the South, local Grange chapters organized cooperative buying and selling through their own cotton gins and warehouses, knowing that they would get better prices for their crops
The Grange
The National Grange, or the Patrons of Husbandry, a national organization of farmers formed after the Civil War to promote the rights and dignity of farmers.
Chapter 18 Responses to Industrialism, Responses to Change
5
The Grange, the first national farmers'organization, painted an idealized picture of farming. Later, farmers' organizations were less idealistic and more militant.
Agricultural Wheel
An organization of farmers, begun in Arkansas in 1882. More militant than the Grange, it sought to advance farmer's economic status.
Farmers'Alliance
A broad mass movement in the rural South and West during the late 1800s, encompassing several organizations and demanding economic and political reforms; it helped create the Populist Party.
and better rates from the railroads if they banded together. The national leadership of the Grange focused on lobbying for agricultural colleges, attracting more people to farming, encouraging crop diversity, and promoting a richer home life for farm families.
Farmers also started additional organizations. In 1882, Arkansas farmers launched the Agricultural Wheel. By 1885, the Agricultural Wheel had 1,105 local chapters in four states. Ihe Wheel became a tough organization that excluded any but working farmers. The organization used its size to negotiate price reductions with manufacturers of farm implements and got up to 50 percent reductions on the prices of wagons, buggies, reapers, and mowers, while organizing its own warehouses to hold crops until prices met expectations.
A number of similar organizations coordinated similar efforts, but the largest by far was the Farmers’ Alliance, which began as the Texas Alliance in Lampasas County, Texas, in the 1870s by ranchers who were dealing with issues of communal and private grazing lands. After Charles W. Macune was elected president of the Texas organization in 1886, the Alliance grew rapidly. Macune had trained as a pharmacist and a physician before he settled in Milam County Texas in 1879 where he practiced medicine while farming on the side. But his rural medical practice gave him a sense of the problems the ranchers and the farmers faced, particularly, the isolation and the lack of economic clout.
518 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Under Macune s leadership the Farmers’ Alliance became a business organization—organizing the farmers (including ranchers) of Texas, and eventually the nation, to use the best of corporate practices to fight with the organizations they saw oppressing them. The Alliance sought to get a better financial deal for farmers through the negotiating power of a large organization demanding lower prices for the things they bought and higher prices for the products they sold.
Ihe Texas Farmers’ Alliance grew from 38,000 members in 1886 to 225,000 members in 1889—almost half of all of the eligible farmers in Texas. In 1887, the Alliance merged with the Arkansas-based Agricultural Wheel and continued to grow with local units stretching from North Carolina to California and from Texas to the Dakotas. In 1890, Macune moved to a national headquarters in Washington, DC, and the Alliance had over 1 million members.
Under Macune’s leadership, the Farmers’ Alliance steered clear of direct political involvement. The goal of the Alliance was simple: farmers would combine their power to equal the power of other businesses. They were not opposed to monopolies; they wanted to be one. The Washington office published the National Economist, mailed to farmers across the country, while sponsoring lecturers, organizers, and corresponding secretaries to spread Alliance ideas. The organization sought to overcome rural isolation and lack of educational opportunities through lending libraries, schools, conferences, and social occasions for farm families. Most of all, the Alliance sought to open a “new era” of prosperity for farmers through tough negotiations on their behalf.
Macune believed that whites and blacks had different economic interests and insisted that the Farmers’ Alliance should include only white farmers. When the Agricultural Wheel joined the Alliance, it dropped its black members. In response to Macune’s segregationist policy, African-American farmers created their own Colored Farmers’ National Alliance and Cooperative Union that had 1.2 million members by 1890. Given the political and social disenfranchisement that black farmers faced, they organized primarily through black churches. In many communities, the black Baptist Church and the Colored Farmers’ Alliance had virtually the same membership. Lacking the resources to publish their own materials or hire lecturers or organizers, the black organization never had the clout of the white alliance, even though it had more members.
While the Farmers’ Alliance was racially segregated, it welcomed women as members and leaders, as did the Colored Farmers’ Alliance. Fully a quarter of the members of the Colored Farmers’ Alliance were women. In contrast to the Grange, which had special positions for women, the Farmers’ Alliance opened all positions to both women and men. Annie L. Diggs of Kansas was one of the senior editors of the National Reform Press Association, the white Alliance’s publishing house. Mary E. Lease of Kansas was the most famous of the Alliance’s many speakers, while Marion Todd of Illinois was considered to be the most effective theoretician for the movement. Bettie Munn Gay, who had turned a highly mortgaged Texas farm into a successful cotton growing operation, became one of the leaders in the Texas Alliance. Women and men within the Alliance debated women’s suffrage and occasionally argued over the prohibition of alcohol. But they were united in a commitment to improve the life of farm families, economically as well as intellectually and culturally, ending the terrible isolation that farm families experienced.
Defining a National Agenda
While Macune focused the Farmers’ Alliance on cooperative economic efforts and stayed out of electoral politics, other leaders wanted more direct political involvement. In California, the president of the state Farmers Alliance, Marion Cannon, became convinced after long battles with the Southern Pacific Railroad that only public ownership of the railroads would allow farmers to get a fair deal. Alliance lecturer Marion Todd published Railways of Europe and America in 1893 in which she argued for
I8J
IO
Colored Farmers' National Alliance and Cooperative Union
An organization of Southern black farmers formed in Texas in 1886 in response to the Southern Farmers'Alliance, which did not accept black people as members. It helped launch the Populist Party.
Chapter 18 Responses to Industrialism, Responses to Change
			
			18.2
		1	
American Voices
Mary E. Lease, Women in the Farmers’ Alliance, 1891
E-
Lease, a well-known speaker for the Farmers' Alliance, twt rose to national fame telling Kansas farmers to "raise less corn and more hell" and then traveling the nation to recruit members and build support for the organization. In 1891, she gave a speech to the National Council of Women of the United States, part of which is presented here. Madam President, Friends, and Fellow-Citizens,—I use that term with somewhat pardonable pride when I remember that the Alliance League of Kansas has given to the women of my sunflower, humanity-loving, temperance-loving State of Kansas the right of political suffrage.
The subject assigned to me to-day, Women in the Farmers' Alliance, cannot be intelligently discussed nor fully understood until the necessity for the formation of the Farmers' Alliance is first shown, and its aims and purposes briefly stated. It must be evident to every intelligent man and woman to-day that there is something radically wrong in the affairs of this Nation....
My friends, the lash of the slave-driver's whip is no longer heard in this country, but the lash of necessity is driving thousands to unrequited toil. Conscienceless capital is robbing manhood of its prime, mothers of their motherhood, and sorrowful children of sunshine and of joy. Look around you! What do you behold to-day? A land which less than four hundred years ago we received fresh from the hands of God, a continent of unparalleled fertility... and yet, in this land of plenty and unlimited resources, the cry of humanity is going up from every corner of this Nation. The plaint of motherhood, the moans of starving children! Capital buys and sells to-day the very heart-beats of humanity....
Oh, yes; we can point to the rivers bridged, to the transcontinental railway connecting ocean with ocean, to wonderful churches and cathedrals; he can point to the most wonderful system of agriculture that ever brought joy to a hungry world; he can jostle his rags against the silken garments his toil has secured; he can walk shelterless and sad by the side of the home he has helped to build; he can wipe the sweat from his weary face, and reflect that the twenty thousand of American millionaires who own one billion five hundred million dollars, gathered from the toils and tears of sixty-four millions of American people, have it in their power to name their Governors and our legislators and representatives and Congressmen — and they do name them, and they have named them for the last quarter of a century, and they have it in their power to fix the price of labor, to fix the price for every ton of coal.
Source: Mary E. Lease, Speech to the National Council of Women of the United States, Assembled in Washington, DC, Feb 24, 1891
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
According to Mary Lease, why was there a "necessity for the formation of the Farmers'Alliance," and what should be its political agenda?
2.	Historical Interpretation
What importance should we attach to the fact that a number of women, Mary Lease among them, played prominent roles in farmers'movements and the People's Party?
subtreasury system
A proposal fora unit of the U.S. Treasury Department (or "subtreasury") to own warehouses that would store farmer's crops until prices rose.
managing railways in ways similar to how the government managed post offices. Some in the Alliance wanted a federal commission to limit the power of the railroads, but Cannon and Todd were convinced that the railroads were too big to be tamed and that a government takeover was the only answer.
Even Macune came to advocate for what he called the subtreasury system, a unit he wanted to have created within the U.S. Department of the Treasury that would provide low-interest loans to farmers. These loans would be secured by cotton, wheat, and other staple crops. The subtreasury would protect its investment and support farmers through a federal system of warehouses and grain elevators in 1,000 counties across the country where the government would ensure minimum prices for crops and hold them until they sold at that price. If speculators could use the telegraph to make money buying and selling crop futures, why couldn’t farmers, with the right government support, use the same technical arrangements to ensure their own profits?
Although Alliance leaders took up the subtreasury idea and some politicians, like Tom Watson of Georgia, became advocates, the leadership of the Democratic Party resisted, as did virtually all Republicans. In the end, the subtreasury was never created. As a result, many within the Alliance began to question the value of staying out of politics.
520 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
More than public ownership of railroads or the subtreasury idea, the political issue	r
that engaged U.S. farmers was federal fiscal policy. When the government limited	j
the supply of currency, farmers had a very difficult time paying their debts, getting	j
loans, or getting the price they wanted for their crops. When the government made	i
more funds available, the resulting inflation made it easier to pay debts (because the	I
debt amounted to less in current dollars) and made it easier to sell the products of the	I
farms. Although easing the supply of money improved the situation of farmers, one
policy made it difficult to do: the nation s adherence to the gold standard, requiring	:
that every dollar in circulation be backed by a dollar’s worth of gold in a bank vault.
During the Civil War, the federal government had temporarily dropped the gold standard. Instead, it created federal bank notes, known as “greenbacks” because of their color, essentially printing dollars based not on gold but on the “full faith and credit” of the government’s promise to pay. Ihe government also allowed the additional use of silver as backing for currency during the war. Both of these policies eased the supply of money significantly, but they also fueled inflation since, with more dollars available, any dollar was worth less. Farmers liked inflation, but investors and bankers hated it. After the Civil War, the nation’s bankers demanded a return to the gold standard by gradually withdrawing greenbacks from circulation as the government paid down its Civil War debt and then in 1873 “demonetizing” silver so only gold, and not silver, could be used for coins or backing for dollars in circulation. These policies were effective in curbing inflation, but they led to an extremely tight money supply, tight credit, and challenging times for farmers. Ihe tight money of the 1880s was thus a direct result of federal policy, and the Farmers’ Alliance as well as the other farmer organizations were determined to change the policy. Some advocated expanding the number of greenbacks, others supported the coinage of more silver and some called for both, but all agreed that something needed to be done.
Populism Becomes a Political Party
18.2
i
Ihe rapid growth of the Farmers’ Alliance in the 1880s brought into the organization many state leaders who advocated direct political involvement. Leonidas L. Polk of North Carolina was the strongest of all these leaders. A Confederate hero, Polk made his fortune in real estate development when the Carolina Central Railroad crossed his old family plantation in 1873. He was active in the Methodist Church and in the Grange. He also helped ensure the end of Reconstruction in his state while helping recreate the Democratic Party there. Polk lobbied for the creation of a state Department of Agriculture, became its first commissioner in 1877, and in 1886, published his own newspaper, Progressive Farmer. In 1888, he brought the state organization he led into the Farmers’ Alliance, and within the year, 42,000 North Carolina farmers were members of the national organization.
Other states had similar leaders. South Carolina’s Benjamin R. Tillman had served in a militia that kept blacks and Republicans out of politics. He became active in the state Grange in the 1880s and became convinced that “the yoke of the credit system” was keeping farmers down. He convened a large meeting of white farmers in 1886, lobbied for a state agricultural college, and created a 20,000 member South Carolina Alliance that remained independent of the national organization. Georgia s Tom Watson was a lawyer and “friend and follower” of the Farmers Alliance, though as a nonfarmer he could not join. Nevertheless, he was elected to Congress as a Farmers Alliance candidate in 1890, expanding the movement of the Alliance into politics.
As the price of cotton fell to the lowest level in 30 years in 1891 and the farm economy continued to worsen throughout the 1890s—Watson, Tillman, Polk, and others rallied for a change. The nation’s largest labor unions, the Knights of Labor and the Women’s Christian Temperance Union, had recently launched a new political organization, the People’s Party, also known as the Populist Party, at a convention in Cincinnati in 1891 that was advocating for many of the reforms to currency
People's Party
Usually known as the Populist Party, a major third party of the 1890s formed to fight for the rights of working people.
Chapter 18 Responses to Industrialism, Responses to Change 5:
and regulation of railroads that the Alliance wanted. If the Farmers’ Alliance were to merge with the People’s Party, they could win elections and have their voices heard in state capitals, in Congress, perhaps even the White House.
Macune continued to oppose such political involvement, preferring farmer-controlled cooperative economic development. Polk became the leader of those who said yes to political involvement and specifically to joining the People s Party. Everyone knew that the 1892 convention of the Farmers’ Alliance would decide the issue. Polk won. Macune retired from the Alliance and spent the next 30 years practicing medicine and law while preaching in Methodist churches in rural Texas.
The People’s (or Populist) Party grew dramatically. The Colored Farmers’ Alliance and smaller groups like the Farmers’ Mutual Benefit Association also joined. The widespread assumption was that when the People’s Party, now a multiracial coalition of farmers, labor, and women’s groups, held their national convention in Omaha, Nebraska, in July 1892, they would nominate Leonidas Polk for president. A month before the convention, however, Polk suddenly died. The People’s Party nominated James B. Weaver of Iowa, a former Union general, and James G. Field, a former Confederate from Virginia, as his running mate. Polk’s charisma did not adhere to the new nominees. Nevertheless, Weaver won over a million votes in the 1892 presidential election that ultimately returned Cleveland to the White House. Not since the late 1850s, when the Republican Party had come out of nowhere, had the nation witnessed anything like the phenomenal growth of the Populists, as the members of the People’s Party quickly came to be known. Populist candidates won the governor’s office in Colorado and Kansas in the 1892 elections. Populists elected Marion Cannon to Congress from southern California as well as Congressmen from Colorado, Kansas, Nebraska, and North Carolina. They elected eight representatives to the California state legislature, a group that held the balance between the Democrats and Republicans and almost succeeded in electing California’s U.S. Senator.
Two years later, Populist candidates won over 1.5 million votes, electing seven to the U.S. House, six to the U.S. Senate, and many to state legislatures. In a partnership with Republicans, Populists won control of the North Carolina legislature—the only time since Reconstruction when the Democrats had lost control of a state—and sent Marion Butler to the U.S. Senate. In 1894, Populist candidates won 41 percent of the vote for statewide offices in Colorado, 39 percent in Washington State, 39 percent in Kansas and 36 percent in Texas. Populists were elected to Congress from Alabama, Kansas, Nebraska, and North Carolina. The Populists, it seemed, were gaining power.
As the Populists approached the 1896 presidential elections, the Republican and Democratic Parties were keeping a worried eye on them and, at the same time, borrowing parts of their message. No one borrowed more from the Populists than the young former congressman from Nebraska, William Jennings Bryan. Bryan was a Democrat, not a Populist, but his views on many issues, most of all his advocacy for the unlimited coinage of silver, were the same as those of the Populists and anathema to leaders of the Democratic Party, including President Cleveland, who was not seeking reelection but who wanted a successor more like himself. Nevertheless, Bryan worked tirelessly for the Democratic nomination, courting as many “silver” delegates to the party’s 1896 convention in Chicago as possible.
When the Democrats finally met in early July, the debate on the platform was intense, pitting those who wanted to hold to the gold standard against the “free silver” Democrats who agreed with the Populists. Bryan spoke to the convention, electrifying the gathering as he concluded:
If they dare to come out in the open field and defend the gold standard as a good thing, we shall fight them to the uttermost, having behind us the producing masses of the nation and the world. Having behind us the commercial interests and the laboring interests and all the toiling masses, we shall answer their demands for a gold standard by saying to them, you shall not press down upon the brow of labor this crown of thorns. You shall not crucify mankind upon a cross of gold.
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
522
After the cheering stopped, the Democrats not only adopted a silver platform but also nominated Bryan for president. The Populists were torn about what to do since Bryan s views seemed so close to their own, and with him, they might actually win the White House. Although divided between those who wanted to maintain their independence and those who were willing to compromise, the Populist Convention that met in July nominated Bryan as their candidate for president. By joining forces with the Democrats, they were confident of victory.
The Republicans nominated William McKinley, a genial Congressman from Ohio, and the last Civil War veteran to run for president. In the fall campaign, managed by Marcus Alonzo Hanna, a wealthy supporter who was emerging as something close to a modern professional political advisor, the Republicans equated a vote for Bryan with a rebellion against the nation. They linked the Republican ticket with the flag, patriotism, and economic caution.
They called McKinley the “advance agent of prosperity” and some, like a young Theodore Roosevelt, described the Democrats and Populists as “plotting a social revolution and the subversion of the American Republic.” In the contest, the notions of patriotism, economic caution, and northeast regional distrust of the South and West won. A comfortable majority elected McKinley, though the results show how deeply divided the country had become (see Map 18-2).
The Populists never recovered from their loss in 1896. Those who had supported Bryan and the alliance with the Democratic Party blamed those who did not. Populists who had not wanted to compromise blamed those who had “sold out” and supported a Democrat. African-Americans whose votes had been essential to Populist victories in many close contests, were deeply disillusioned at how quickly Populist leaders like Tom Watson turned into arch segregationists after 1897.
The Populist Party continued for a short time, but the enthusiasm and confidence were destroyed by the divisions over the 1896 election. In 1900 and 1904, the party nominated Tom Watson who, having courted black voters in the 1890s, now campaigned on a platform of white supremacy even while he maintained the Populist economic program. The Democrats renominated Bryan in 1900, but he did poorly without Populist support and in the face of prosperity and McKinley’s considerable popularity. The new Socialist Party, emerging from Northern labor unions, began to contest presidential elections, taking many of the Populists labor union supporters. A moment and a movement had passed, although its efforts did, in the end, lead to the adoption of the silver standard. In the early 1900s, national interest turned elsewhere, although many elements of the Populist platform were adopted and became the basis for a later progressive movement championed by both Republicans and Democrats after 1900. The farmers of the South and West, who had organizing themselves so successfully and had bridged heretofore uncrossed gender barriers, were never able to resolve their racial divisions. Never again would they have the same level of political power.
Quick Review Was politics the best way for the farmers to address their grievances?
Why or why not? What might have been a more effective strategy?
ARIZ. NEW TERR. MEXICO TERR.
3
4
8
10
OKLA.
TERR.

13
17
Si
23
6 12 XV
INDIAN
TERR,
15

Electoral Vote by State
REPUBLICAN
William McKinley
DEMOCRATIC
William J. Bryan
271
176
MINOR PARTIES
447
24 15
1f
■ 12
12
11 / 9/
11 13 f
A V)
Popular Vote
7,104,779
6,502,925
265,155
13,872,859
I ‘Ip
MAP 18-2 The Election of 1896. This map of the electoral votes in the 1896 presidential election shows how deeply divided the country was. States where farming was dominant voted over-
\a/HpIminnl\/ fnr Rr\/an
WORKER PROTEST AND THE RISE OF ORGANIZED LABOR__________________________
Explain the tensions in industrial America that led to major labor strife between the 1870s and 1914.
The Great Railroad Strike of 1877 began spontaneously in Baltimore, Maryland, and Martinsburg, West Virginia, on July 16 and 17, 1877, after the management of several railroads announced a wage cut. At Camden Junction, 2 miles from Baltimore, a fireman simply refused to keep the train moving. Soon others joined, and before long, all
rhanfor ift Rp<;nnnsps to Industrialism. Responses to Change
u.
traffic on the Baltimore 8c Ohio Railroad had come to a halt. The management then fired the strikers. In response, others joined the strike, and by July 19, rail workers prevented all freight from leaving Pittsburgh. Now mostly forgotten, the strike inspired some Americans, frightened others, and for decades shaped peoples responses to the country’s rapid growth and industrialization.
The strike was marked by widespread violence. A large crowd of strikers and their supporters in Baltimore attacked state militia troops who then fired on the crowd, killing 11 people. In Pittsburgh, a huge crowd hurled insults and rocks at a militia unit who then started shooting, killing 20. The crowd vented its fury on the Pennsylvania Railroad, burning everything in sight. By July 22, some 39 Pennsylvania Railroad buildings, 104 engines, and more than 1,200 freight cars had been destroyed. As news of the violence spread, strikes took place all along the major rail lines from New York and New Jersey to Indiana and Illinois. Black and white workers went out on strike together. In St. Louis, Missouri, a week-long general strike led workers to take control of the city. Workers went on strike as far away as Kansas City and San Francisco.
Women played a crucial role, and the Baltimore Sun reported about the “very active part taken by the women, who are the wives and mothers of the firemen. They look famished and wild, and declare for starvation rather than have their people work for the reduced wages.”
In response to a plea from the railroad management, President Hayes declared that a state of insurrection existed and called out federal troops who, armed with rapid-fire Gatling guns, put an end to the strike. Former President Grant criticized his successor, noting the irony that he himself had been criticized for sending the army to protect black voting rights but, “Now, however, there is no hesitation about exhausting the whole power of the government to suppress a strike on the slightest intimation that danger threatens.” But in the eyes of the new president, attacks on black voters and attacks on the property of the railroad companies were two different things.
Others drew their own lessons from the 1877 uprising. E. L. Godkin, editor of The Nation, called for doubling the size of the U.S. Army, but instead something new was created, the National Guard, made up of part-time soldiers who could be called out when needed. After 1877, states created National Guard units and built massive National Guard armories, stern stone buildings where arms might be stored in case of a new insurrection. These National Guard armories can still be seen in many cities—a monument to the 1877 rail strike.
Twisted track and the wheels of burned out rail cars show some of the $ 10 million damage caused by the 1877 railroad strike.
524 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914

The strikes also inspired the rise of labor unions that sought to help workers organize to demand new rights rather than just vent their fury. These unions sometimes led to additional uprisings, but in addition, they brought about changes in how corporations did business.
The Knights of Labor
Founded by tailors in Philadelphia in 1869, the Knights of Labor, Quickly emerged to become the country’s largest and most powerful labor union after the 1877 strike. The Knights welcomed white and black workers, immigrants as well as the native-born, and skilled and unskilled workers. Terence V. Powderly was the head, or Grand Master Workman, of the Knights of Labor in the 1870s and 1880s. Powderly believed that isolated workers and small local unions were doomed to defeat when facing railroads and other large corporations, and he wanted his union to have the same organizational power as the largest corporations.
Under Powderly’s leadership, the Knights tried to avoid violence. The Knights believed that workers and owners had more in common than their differences and hoped that eventually many workers could become independent owners rather than a permanent labor force. The union campaigned for government support of agricultural cooperatives, an 8-hour work day, equal pay for women, and government ownership of railroads and banks. Powderly took the commitment to racial integration seriously. At their October 1886 convention in Richmond, Virginia, Powderly caused quite a stir in the local community by inviting an African-American delegate, Francis Ferrell, to introduce him to the meeting. In 1883, they organized a successful strike against the Western Union Telegraph Company and, in 1885, were strong enough to win a strike against several railroads that agreed to restore lost wages and hire back all striking workers. For Powderly, the success of the 1885 strike showed what a strong union could do. By 1886, the Knights had 700,000 members. In an even larger railroad strike that began in Marshall, Texas, in 1886, some 9,000 workers stopped freight on lines in Texas, Missouri, Arkansas, and Kansas. Strikes, it seemed, were becoming a national phenomenon, and the Knights were in the forefront. However, while national leaders of the Knights urged peaceful negotiations, in the 1886 strike, strikers pushed rail cars off tracks and set fires to railroad buildings. To avoid further violence, the Knights called off the strike while claiming a victory that was not really theirs.
The railroad strike of 1886 showed the power of a union to bring the trains, and thus the country, to a halt. It also demonstrated the split between many members of the Knights who harbored deep hatred for industrial owners and union leadership that still sought conciliation. While the Knights remained strong and were an essential element in the Populist political campaigns of the 1890s, the split was never fully healed. In time, other unions, some more moderate, some more radical, would replace the Knights.
1ST
The Knights of Labor
Labor union that included skilled and unskilled workers irrespective of race or gender; founded in 1869.
; 132
American Federation of Labor (A.F. of L.)
Labor organization formed in 1886 as a federation of smaller elite craft unions.
The American Federation of Labor
While the Knights of Labor attempted to organize all workers, those in some of the more skilled trades created their own separate unions. In 1886, many of these small elite unions came together to create the American Federation of Labor with 50,000 members.
Samuel Gompers of the Cigar Makers Union was elected as its president and, except for 1 year, served as president of the A. F. of L. until his death in 1924, by which time it had grown to 3 million members, by far the strongest labor union in the United States.
Under Gompers’s leadership, the A.F. of L. continued to organize workers in separate craft unions with membership in each union restricted to workers in a specific trade such as cigar makers or plumbers or iron molders. Gompers carefully avoided larger issues, preferring to negotiate specifically for immediate ends increased wages, job security, an 8-hour day, benefits, and the right of the union to bargain collectively for workers. “We fight only for immediate objects.. .that can be realized in a few years,” Gompers said.
He was happy to leave political ideology and more far-reaching social change to others.
If the growth in the A. F. of L.’s membership is a measure, it was a successful strategy.
Chapter 18 Responses to Industrialism, Responses to Change 525
18.1!
I
IS J
j _____J
18.3
Haymarket
The name given to the strike, rally, and bombing that took place around Haymarket Square in Chicago in May 1886 as well as to the subsequent executions of four leaders of the incident.
Haymarket, 1886
On May 4, 1886, many of the tensions in the United States exploded at Chicago’s Haymarket Square. Between 40,000 and 60,000 of Chicago’s workers went on strike on Saturday, May 1, chanting their demands for an 8-hour work day, ‘eight hours for work, eight hours for rest, eight hours for what we will.” The A. F. of L. supported the strike. So did socialists and anarchists in Chicago’s diverse immigrant communities.
Socialism and anarchism, though quite different political philosophies, were both very strong in Chicago. Socialists believed that the workers should own the means of production and that private ownership of factories, businesses, and lands should be abolished in favor of ownership by all, which often meant government ownership. Anarchists deeply distrusted any government—including a Socialist government—and disdained elections as fraudulent exercises in futility. In place of government, anarchists wanted small, local, voluntary organizations. They believed that by abolishing higher authorities, a new era of peace and freedom would come. Nevertheless, for two anarchist leaders, Albert Parsons and August Spies, the 8-hour movement was an opportunity to bring skilled and unskilled workers together as a step toward their larger goal.
As the strike continued on Monday, May 3, Spies issued a call for a mass meeting to be held the following night at Haymarket Square and asked Albert Parsons to join him. Perhaps 3,000 people showed up at the Haymarket rally. But just as the rally was ending and Parsons himself was enjoying a beer at a nearby tavern, a police contingent marched into the rally to end it. Someone—no one ever found out who—threw a bomb into the middle of the police ranks, killing one police officer. Six more officers soon died of their wounds.
As news of the Haymarket bomb spread, newspapers blamed anarchists and socialists for the violence. Eventually, Albert Parsons, August Spies, and six others were tried and convicted for being part of “a general conspiracy to annihilate the police force and destroy property,” even though none of them could possibly have thrown the actual bomb. Appeals and a nationwide campaign for clemency ensued. Samuel Gompers, who certainly disagreed with anarchists, nevertheless said that Parsons, Spies, and the others had been “fighting for labor from different sides of the house.” In spite of all the appeals, four, including Parsons and Spies, were hung on November 11, 1887.
Haymarket—as the strike, rally, bombing, and executions all came to be called— was a pivotal moment in American labor history. For some, the trial and executions were a validation of the rule of law. For others, the trial and execution of men who never threw the bomb and did not have any known links to whoever did, provided proof that justice was not possible for those who protested in Gilded Age America. Lucy Parsons, Albert’s widow, spent the rest of her long life speaking and writing about their cause. Emma Goldman, a young girl at the time, traced her own career as a life-long radical organizer to the stories of the Haymarket martyrs.
Homestead Strike, 1892
While the 1886 strike for an 8 hour-day was a national event, other strikes followed, none more important than the 1892 Homestead Strike at Andrew Carnegie’s plant at Homestead, Pennsylvania. By the 1890s, Carnegie owned a dozen plants in western Pennsylvania and northern West Virginia. Workers at these huge mills turned out a quarter of the nation’s steel supply and earned $40 million per year in profits for Carnegie. Carnegie wanted to be seen as a friend to working people, but profits still came first. In 1892, when workers at Carnegie’s Homestead Steel Mill went on strike, Carnegie left his top lieutenant, Henry Clay Frick, in charge while he remained at his castle in Scotland. Frick decided that the time had come to break the 24,000-member Amalgamated Association of Iron, Steel, and Tin Workers.
In June 1892, when it came time to negotiate a new contract, Frick offered only a cut in salary. When the union rejected the offer, Frick closed the plant, fired all of the workers, and built an 8-foot fence around it. He then hired new nonunion workers
526 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Coxey's Army
A protest march of unemployed workers, led by businessman Jacob Coxey, demanding a public works highway program and guaranteed jobs during the depression of the 1890s.
and 300 Pinkerton agents to protect them. The Pinkerton Agency had been created to support the North during the Civil War but turned into a quasi-police force for industrial owners who were caught in conflict with unions in the late 1800s. The Homestead workers fought back.
On July 6 when two barges of Pinkerton detectives came down the river to the plant, strikers who had been patrolling the area rushed the pier. No one knows who shot first, but both sides kept shooting. Eventually, between five and nine steelworkers and between three and ten Pinkerton agents were killed. Pennsylvania’s governor sent 8,000 militia troops to Homestead to keep the peace, and Frick brought in new workers who began operating the mill. Union leaders were arrested, but were acquitted (it was hard to find an antiunion jury in the region). Public opinion generally blamed Carnegie and Frick for the bloodshed. Nevertheless, Frick had won his battle. He had defeated the union and reopened the mills with nonunion workers. Unlike Andrew Carnegie, he did not care about public opinion. Carnegie also blamed Frick for the troubles, and the two never spoke again, but Carnegie also did not reinstate the union. Coxey's Army, 1893-94
In 1893, a grand worlds fair, the Columbian Exposition, opened in Chicago. Like earlier fairs, this one displayed the nations technological marvels and industrial success, including 400 buildings lit with 10,000 electric lights. While the fair was a booming success, the nations economy was collapsing in the Panic of 1893. J. P. Morgan rescued the country’s gold reserves (see Chapter 17) but did not end the terrible unemployment. By the end of the year, one-fifth of those who had been working before the panic were out of a job. Many were desperate, and the contrast between the desperation and the fair’s glitter was obvious.
An Ohio businessman, Jacob Coxey, was dazzled when he attended the Chicago fair, but deeply touched by the poverty and desperation he saw among unemployed in the city. Back in his hometown of Massillon, Ohio, near Akron, Coxey announced a plan to put the unemployed to work building roads. Coxey argued that America needed to improve its mostly dirt roads and also end unemployment. The solution was clear to him. Congress should appropriate $500 million in government bonds and offer every man who wanted to work $1.50 per day for an 8-hour day fixing the country’s highways. (Coxey assumed that the key was putting men, not necessarily women, to work.) And, Coxey insisted, if Congress did not act, the unemployed should march to Washington and demand action.
Although only about 100 marchers assembled at the beginning of the march, by the time the march got to Homestead, Pennsylvania, site of the Carnegie strike, it had grown to 600. All along the way, people gave them food and shelter. Coxey marched into Washington, DC, on schedule on May 1, 1894. The New York Times called the march a “Battle between Law and Anarchy.” Federal troops were put on alert. By mid-May, some 800 Coxeyites were in the District of Columbia, a number that grew to 1,200 in August. But Congress, dominated as it was by the corporate interests, did not pass Coxey’s legislation or do anything else to aid the unemployed. In August, police scattered Coxey5s Army, as they were called by the press. Coxey returned to Ohio where he lived to the age of 97 and died in 1951, still advocating federally financed highway improvement and pleased to see his goals partially fulfilled by the New Deal’s employment programs in the 1930s.
The American Railway Union, the Pullman Strike of 1894, and the Socialist Party
The American Railway Union was created in 1893 and led by Eugene V. Debs, who would go on to play an important role in American labor and political life for the next several decades. Debs was born in 1855 in Terre Haute, Indiana, and left school at 15 to take a job on the railroads. In 1875, he joined the Brotherhood of Locomotive Firemen but soon came to believe that having different unions for engineers, firemen, brakemen, and for the workers who maintained the tracks, was a recipe for defeat. His response was to help organize one union for everyone who worked on the railroads
Chapter 18 Responses to Industrialism, Responses to Change
Coxey's Army with their supporters marched though towns from Ohio to Washington, DC, on their way to make their demands of Congress.
Almost immediately after its founding, the American Railway Union won a strike against the Great Northern Railroad in 1894. It looked like a new force was emerging. But then Debs found himself pulled into a strike he did not want, and the early successes of the American Railway Union turned to failure when the new union was involved in another strike at the Pullman Palace Car Company.
George Pullman did not operate a railway; he made railway cars—the very best railway cars anywhere in the United States. Pullman cars were elegant sleeping cars that cost four times as much as other railway cars and that allowed travelers who could afford the accommodations to cross the country in comfort. Having designed and manufactured the cars, Pullman leased the cars and their staff to various rail lines that attached them to regular trains. Both Pullman and the lines profited handsomely from the exchange.
To keep his employees out of industrial strife, Pullman built his own town, Pullman, Illinois, 12 miles outside of Chicago. In Pullman, 8,000 workers and their families lived in 1,400 houses that they rented from the company. They were provided with schools, an athletic club, free lectures, a local theater, and health care. The housing at Pullman was substantially better than housing available to most other industrial workers, but the rents were high and the rules strict. Pullman did not allow alcohol, and he had “spotters” who kept an eye on the behavior and home life of his employees.
Facing the Panic of 1893, Pullman thought that the only prudent thing was to lay off some workers and cut wages for the rest. He did not, however, reduce rents in Pullman since he also expected the town to pay its own way. Nevertheless, in spite of the depressed economy, the Pullman Company paid its standard dividends to its shareholders. In response, the workers went on strike. Ninety percent of the residents of Pullman did not show up for work. They called on Debs and the American Railway Union for support.
Debs told the Pullman workers that the midst of a depression was a terrible time to call a strike and urged them to postpone. They refused and Debs felt bound to support them. The American Railway Union refused to handle any train that had a Pullman car attached. By June, rail traffic through Chicago had stopped. The union took special
528 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
care to keep the mail trains running so there would be no reason for federal intervention, but the federal government intervened anyway.
The Cleveland administration obtained an injunction ordering the strikers back to work, and when they refused, Cleveland ordered 14,000 federal troops to Chicago to end the strike. When the army arrived in Chicago, there was a riot and 34 people were killed. Federal authorities not only ended the strike but also arrested Debs and disbanded the union.
Ihe strike and the jail term transformed Debs. He went to jail a charismatic labor leader. He came out convinced that the American economic system was permanently stacked against workers and their unions and that the only way to bring about change was political. He supported the Populist movement in the 1896 election but then founded the Socialist Party in the United States. The Socialists advocated government ownership of the nation’s major industries and a mandate for higher salaries for workers. In the national elections of 1904 through 1920—except 1916—Debs ran for president as the party’s candidate, winning hundreds of thousands of votes and giving himself a platform to advocate for a completely different economic system.
Miners and Their Unions
The steel that was transforming America required two key ingredients, iron ore and coal to fuel the smelting process that turned iron into steel. Coal also heated most of the nation’s cities, and coal-fired generators produced much of the nation’s electricity. These two ingredients had to be mined from deep in the earth, as did several other resources of great importance to the United States. Gold and silver were still the most valued forms of exchange. Lead pipes provided water to most houses. Bringing these resources to the industrial process required the backbreaking and dangerous work of miners. As the United States industrialized, the need for mines and miners grew exponentially However, since every dollar paid to a miner increased the cost of finished products, or reduced the profits of those who owned the manufacturing process, mine owners were determined to keep the pay of miners as low as possible; recruiting new immigrants who found themselves with few options.
18.1
18 J
18,3
of the Pullman Strike.
Chapter 18 Responses to Industrialism, Responses to Change 52|
United Mine Workers of America
A new union organized in 1890 to bring together mine workers in the Eastern half of the United States in one organization that eventually became a national union.
Even before the Great Railway Strike of 1877, the country’s coal miners had been an angry lot. Coal had been mined in Pennsylvania’s Schuylkill Valley for generations, but in the 1860s and 1870s, miners had to dig deeper than ever, using pumps to lower the water table and machinery to ventilate the mines. Those deep mines were dangerous. The pumps could fail or a new stream could break through and drown miners. Tunnels could collapse. Methane or other dangerous gasses could collect and kill miners before they knew what was happening. And of course, the very properties that made coal valuable made fire an ever-present danger.
In the aftermath of the Panic of 1873, the mine owners cut pay, and in response, the miner’s union called a strike. By January 1875, Pennsylvania coal production stopped. Since cities were heated with coal, midwinter seemed like a good time to win a strike, but the mine owners had stockpiled coal and the cities stayed warm while miners starved. By July 1875, the strike was defeated and the miners went back to work, at the reduced wages.
The failure of the 1875 strike produced a secret organization among the Irish immigrant coal miners in Pennsylvania, the Molly Maguires, who attacked and sometimes murdered foremen, superintendents, and even a mine owner. The mine owners hired the Pinkerton Detective agency, which had played an important role in the Homestead Strike. A Pinkerton agent infiltrated the Mollys, and eventually 10 men were convicted of murder based on their involvement in the Molly Maguires and were executed in June 1877.
In the 1880s and 1890s, new efforts were made to create a new and stronger union among the coal miners of Pennsylvania, Ohio, Virginia, and West Virginia that was focused not on violence against owners but on victories for the workers. The United Mine Workers of America was founded in Columbus, Ohio, in 1890. The new union’s charter called for ensuring that the miners received a fair share of the wealth they created, “fully compatible with the dangers of our calling.” The United Mine Workers of America was open to all races and religions to avoid the divisions that had undermined earlier unions. During an 1894 coal strike in Alabama, the Chicago Tribune reported, “For the first time in this district, no distinction as to color was made. Negroes marched in companies sandwiched between the white men. A negro and a white miner carried a banner.” It was an all too rare moment in American labor history.
Under the leadership of a former Knights of Labor member, John Mitchell, who knew how to call a strike and when to call for arbitration, the United Mine Workers won a 10 percent raise in 1900 and then in 1903 won another raise along with recognition for the union and guarantees of fair weighing of the coal (since miners were paid by the weight of the coal they dug and often felt that they were cheated). By the early 1900s, the mine workers of the Eastern part of the country were better paid and living in better conditions than had been thought possible even a few years earlier, although it had been a hard road for them to get there.
Mining developed later in the West than in the East (see Chapter 16) but expanded rapidly. In 1883, gold was discovered in the Coeur d’Alene region of Idaho, the narrow northern part of the state. Before long, the gold was played out but deposits of silver, lead, and coal were found. The lead and coal, however, were buried much deeper than silver and gold, and Western miners found themselves working deep underground in dangerous conditions as employees of large corporations that were financed by Eastern stockholders. Several unions merged in 1891 to create the Miners’ Union of the Coeur d’Alenes. When the price for silver and lead fell on national markets in 1892, the Miners’ Union went on strike to protest a cut in wages from $3.50 a week to $3.00 a week, for a 7-day week of 10-hour days.
As in Pennsylvania, the mine owners hired the Pinkerton agency to infiltrate the union, and pitched battle broke out between unionized miners and nonunion workers. The governor of Idaho called for federal troops to end “a state of insurrection and rebellion.” In April 1899, striking miners used dynamite to blow up the Bunker Hill Mine in the Coeur d’Alene region after the mine superintendent fired all union workers. The governor of Idaho, Frank Steunenberg, who had been elected with union support in
530 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
1896, called for federal troops to restore order. When Steunenberg was assassinated in 1905, the Western Federation of Miners was blamed, but none of its leaders were convicted. The struggles in the West continued, and some of the union leaders, especially the charismatic William D. (Big Bill) Haywood, became national labor leaders.
The Industrial Workers of the World
On June 27, 1905, over 200 delegates gathered in Chicago to found a new union, the Industrial Workers of the World, known as the Wobblies. The IWW s founders wanted to create “one big union” of all workers no matter what their trade or skill. Western Federation of Miners leader Big Bill Haywood opened the convention saying, they were there to build, a working class movement that shall have for its purpose the emancipation of the working class.” Eugene V. Debs expressed the hope that the time had come to “begin the work of forming a great economic or revolutionary organization of the working class.” Mother Jones, Lucy Parsons, and other labor leaders joined in launching the IWW.
Industrial Workers of the World (IWW) | Popularly known as Wobblies, organized in I 1905 to bring together the nation's workers in "one big union" to fight for a radically different economic system that favored workers over owners.
American Voices
Mother Jones, “Victory at Arnot” 1897
Mother Jones became a union organizer and traveled the country supporting mine workers, other unions, and later the Socialist Party and the Industrial Workers of the World. She was arrested often but continued leading strikes with approaches such as described below from her autobiography, most likely an incident that took place during the United Mine Workers strike of 1897.
In Arnot, Pennsylvania, a strike had been going on 4 or
5 months. The men were becoming discouraged....Sunday afternoon I held a meeting...."You've got to take the pledge," I said. "Rise and pledge to stick to your brothers and the union till the strike's won!"
The men shuffled their feet but the women rose, their babies in their arms, and pledged themselves to see that no one went to work in the morning....
Then the company tried to bring in scabs [nonunion workers]. I told the men to stay home with the children for a change and let the women attend to the scabs. I organized an army of women housekeepers. On a given day they were to bring their mops and brooms and "the army" would charge the scabs up at the mines....I selected as leader an Irish woman who had a most picturesque appearance. She had slept late and her husband had told her to hurry up and get into the army. She had grabbed a red petticoat and slipped it over a thick cotton night gown. She wore a black stocking and a white one. She had tied a little fringed shawl over her wild red hair. Her face was red and her eyes were mad. I looked at her and felt that she could raise a rumpus.
I said, "You lead the army up to the Drip Mouth. Take that tin dishpan you have with you and your hammer, and when the scabs and the mules come up, begin to hammer and howl. Then al, of you hammer and howl and be ready to chase the scabs with your mops and brooms. Don't be afraid of anyone."
Up the mountain side, yelling and hollering, she led the women, and when the mules came up with the scabs and
the coal, she began beating on the dishpan and hollering and all the army joined in with her. The sheriff tapped her on the shoulder.
"My dear lady," said he, "remember the mules. Don't frighten them."
She took the old tin pan, and she hit him with it and she hollered, "To hell with you and the mules!"
From that day on the women kept continual watch of the mines to see that the company did not bring in scabs. Every day women with brooms or mops in one hand and babies in the other arm wrapped in little blankets, went to the mines and watched that no one went in. And all night long they kept watch. They were heroic women. In the long years to come the nation will pay them high tribute for they were fighting for the advancement of a great country....
The last of February the company put up a notice that all demands were conceded...before I left, the union held a victory meeting....The women came for miles in a raging snow storm for that meeting, little children trailing on their skirts, and babies under their shawls. Many of the miners had walked miles. It was one night of real joy and a great celebration.
Source: Mary Harris Jones, The Autobiography of Mother Jones (Chicago: Charles H. Kerr, 1990), pp. 30-39.
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
What unique strategy did Mother Jones employ during the
1897 miners'strike?
2.	Comparison
Compare the strategy used by Mother Jones with that used by workers during the Homestead Strike. Do you think the different strategies help explain the differences in outcome that you note?
Chapter 18 Responses to Industrialism, Responses to Change 53,
The IWW supported strikes all over the country, like this one by women from the Ladies Tailors union on the picket line during the "Uprising of the 20,000" garment workers strike.
The convention adopted a constitution that began, By organizing industrially we are forming the structure of the new society within the shell of the old. This mission was very different from the incremental goals of the American Federation of Labor. For the IWW, contract negotiations and strikes were only a step “within the shell of the old” to help launch the new world.
In the early 1900s, workers were not embarrassed to sing about their dreams and the IWW Song Book described them in songs, including one that mocked the idea that the poor should hope that, “You’ll get pie in the sky when you die” instead of taking action now. Another IWW song promised that, If the workers took a notion, they could bring the current economy to a halt.
The IWW was attacked by the press, the corporate world, and the government. It was also torn by ideological splits, personality tensions, and factional divisions. But for 15 years, the IWW was a major force in labor organizing around the country and included some of the country’s most charismatic labor leaders among its members.
The Garment Industry and the Triangle Shirtwaist Fire of 1911
The garment industry, one of the nation’s largest, employed mostly women. Between 1900 and 1910, New York City became the nation’s center in the manufacture of ready-to-wear clothing. Led by innovative owners, much of the work moved from the small sweatshops of the Lower East Side to larger factories in the new high-rise buildings of 10 and 12 stories in southern Manhattan. Max Blanck and Isaac Harris operated their factory, the Triangle Shirtwaist Company, in Greenwich Village. There, over 500 workers, most of them young Jewish and Italian women, assembled the popular shirtwaists (as women’s blouses were called) that were sold in department stores across the country.
In New York City alone, over 40,000 people worked in the garment trades in the early 1900s. Although divided by language—Yiddish, Italian, English and a host of other languages—the garment workers joined together to protest low salaries. The International Ladies’ Garment Workers Union (ILGWU) had a tough organizer, Clara Lemlich, who had emigrated from Russia in 1903 and who led women in a number of strikes. During some of the strikes, factories hired replacement nonunion workers while police arrested strikers or thugs beat them up. Women from New York’s social elite, including Anne Morgan, daughter of J. P. Morgan, sometimes joined the picket lines and they, too, were sometimes arrested or beaten.
In the late fall of 1909, as the ILGWU considered a general strike in the garment industry, many, including A. F. of L. president Samuel Gompers, urged caution. But Clara Lemlich said, “I have no further patience for talk... .1 move that we go on a general strike.” Workers cheered and the strike began. Factories all over Manhattan were picketed that fall. The garment industry owners organized their own association and refused to give in to the striker’s demands.
Striking garment workers got help from the national leadership of the A.F. of L., and from the Western Federation of Miners whose leader, Big Bill Haywood, sent word that “the Western miners are hearty admirers of your courage and fighting qualities.” They also got support from society women like Morgan and from African-American women who were being recruited as strikebreakers but who refused, though in a meeting they asked the union to “exercise a proper consideration of the claims and demands of the men and women of color who desire to enter the various trades.” The long strike ended in exhaustion for both sides in early 1911 when the union and the owners agreed to a compromise.
On Saturday March 25, 1911, only a month after the strike ended, a fire started under one of the cutting room tables
132 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Bread and Roses Strike
A spontaneous strike of workers in the mills of Lawrence, Massachusetts in 1912.
at the Triangle Shirtwaist Factory. Perhaps a cigarette butt had been tossed in the bin of cotton scrap and dust, which exploded in a massive fire. Workers tried to put the fire out with buckets of water they kept on each floor, but it spread too rapidly. The fire started on the eighth floor and quickly filled the cutting room with smoke. Flames spread up airshafts to the ninth and tenth floors. Workers ran for exits, some of which had been blocked by the owners who, fearful of theft, insisted that all workers use only one exit.
New York’s firefighters arrived, but none had ladders that could reach to the eighth or higher floors. Some workers were quickly consumed by flames. More than 50 jumped from the windows, and 20 were killed when a flimsy fire escape on the outside of the building collapsed. In the end, 146 workers, most of them young women, were killed in the Triangle Shirtwaist Factory Fire, the deadliest industrial catastrophe in
Manhattan for decades. Eventually, the Triangle Shirtwaist Fire led to new industrial regulations and important labor reforms. At the time, however, when devastated husbands, parents, friends, and relatives lined up at the makeshift morgue on Twenty-Sixth Street to try to identify the bodies, only the terrible loss seemed real.
Bread and Roses: The Lawrence Strike of 1912
A few months after the Triangle Fire, on New Year’s Day 1912, a new Massachusetts law limited the work week to 54 hours, a cut from the 56-hour norm in the mills of Lawrence. The management of the mill companies complied with the law and cut wages accordingly. They saw little reason to worry about any protest. The workers of Lawrence spoke 45 different languages and were divided into different crafts; less than one in ten was a union member. Cutting their pay seemed both prudent and low risk. But when the pay cuts appeared in the pay envelopes, workers immediately started to walk off the job. An estimated 14,000 workers were on strike by the end of the first day. In response to the strikers’ spontaneous action, the IWW, then at the height of its influence, sent some of its top organizers to Lawrence. They planned smaller meetings by language groups and large rallies on the Lawrence Common. To get around a city ordinance that banned gatherings in front of any of the mills, the strikers devised a new tactic—a moving picket line in which strikers did not stop but kept walking in a continuous line around the mill.
When IWW leaders were accused of putting women in the front lines, the IWW’s Elizabeth Gurley Flynn responded, “The IWW has been accused of putting the women in the front. The truth is, the IWW does not keep them in the back, and they go to the front.” At some point in the strike, when women, with their babies in their arms, marched through the streets of Lawrence with signs reading, “We Want Bread and Roses, Too” the strike was given a new name. The public generally supported the strikers, and the mill owners eventually agreed to an increase in salary and no discrimination against strikers. The Bread and Roses strike was a success; probably the greatest success in the IWW’s short history.
Ludlow, Colorado, 1914
In the mountains of southern Colorado, brutal working conditions persisted in the coal mines that were owned by John D. Rockefeller. On September 15, 1913, delegates from the mining camps gathered at Trinidad, Colorado, and voted for a strike demanding recognition for their union, a 10 percent increase in wages, an 8-hour day, the right to elect those who would weigh the coal, free choice of stores and doctors
Chapter 18 Responses to Industrialism, Responses to Change 53
Violence during a coal strike in Ludlow, Colorado, in 1914 in which at least 30 people, including 11 children, were killed.
(rather than only company stores and doctors), and enforcement of Colorado mining laws. Mother Jones told the miners, “Don’t be afraid boys. . .Fear is the greatest curse we have.” Within a week, 80 to 90 percent of the miners were on strike.
Ihe strike lasted 14 months. It was long and bloody. The coal companies evicted the striking miners from their company-owned housing and the union arranged tent camps. Violence erupted between the coal company’s guards and strikers, and by the end of the first month, more than 20 people had been killed. Worse violence followed.
On April 20, 1914, militia troops recruited by the coal company took up positions around the miners’ camp at Ludlow, Colorado, and the nervous inhabitants then took up their own positions. No one knew who fired the first shot, but one shot quickly led to several hours of murderous fighting. Tents burst into flame, possibly from a bullet striking something explosive. Over 30 people were killed, including several women and 11 children found under one of the tents where they had huddled for safety. The Ludlow Massacre became a rallying cry for labor, and the loss of life, especially of children, permanently tarnished and troubled the Rockefeller family. President Woodrow Wilson sent U.S. army troops to restore order and the United Mine Workers Union declared that ending the strike was “doing the best thing possible for the men on strike who have suffered so long in order that justice might be done.” Further justice would take much longer.
183
Quick Review Was the violence that accompanied many strikes inevitable? Why or why not?
CONCLUSION
The rapid industrialization of the United States after the Civil War generated wealth and progress for some Americans and serious new problems for others. Very quickly, the disparities that emerged created new and violent tensions in the United States.
In the South, the end of Reconstruction set the region on a path that would continue to deny civil rights and economic opportunities to African-Americans for many decades to come. Combined with the country’s growing indifference to the original goals of Reconstruction, the New South successfully limited the advancement of African-Americans through legal exclusions. Even as the South was opening up to the world with the introduction of new railroad lines and the diversification of its economy, power and prosperity came only to some. Those who were excluded fought back, particularly African-Americans, who challenged segregation, violence, and their economic exclusion.
Farmers, white and black, also challenged their economic exclusion from the prosperity that Gilded Age America was generating. Through a number of organizations, especially the Farmers’ Alliance and later the Populist Party, farmers sought economic might equal to the giant corporations and political access at the highest levels.
Industrial workers also organized to fight for their rights. New Unions—the Knights of Labor, the American Federation of Labor, the United Mine Workers of America, and the Industrial Worker of the World—sought to protect worker’s rights. The nation was wracked by strikes, from the Railroad Strike of 1877 to the Miners Strike in Pueblo, Colorado, in 1914 as well as tragedies including the Triangle Shirtwaist Fire of 1912. Between the railway strike of 1877 and the Colorado strike of 1914, American workers fought to better their lives and working conditions. While some owners were sympathetic, the nation was divided by a great gulf between those who owned the industries and those who worked in them. Grand visions of a different kind of society were born but not achieved. More basic demands—for higher pay, safer conditions, shorter work days—were only partially met, and it would be another 2 decades, during the Great Depression and New Deal era, that industrial workers could get much of what they were asking for from 1877 onward.
CHAPTER
REVIEW
How did some of the disenfranchised (workers, blacks, farmers, etc.) attempt to make their voices heard in the late 1800s and early 1900s? Why were their tactics different? How successful were they?
534 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Chapter 18 Chapter Review
18.1
CONFLICT IN THE NEW SOUTH_________________________________
Analyze how the combined impact of industrialism and the end of Reconstruction created the unique character of the New South.
Review Questions
1.	Historical Interpretation
What was new about the New South?
2.	Constructing an Argument
What factors contributed to the increased rigidity of racial segregation and renewed white efforts to exclude blacks from political life in the late 1800s?
3.	Comparison
Compare and contrast the response of Booker T. Washington and W.E.B. De Bois to racial segregation and discrimination. To what groups within the white community might each appeal? Why?
THE POLITICS OF CONFLICT—FROM POPULIST MOVEMENT TO POPULIST PARTY______________________________________
Analyze how agrarian unrest and protest came to have a significant impact on American politics.
Review Questions
4.	Historical Interpretation
What factors contributed to the rise of farmers’ organizations in the late 1800s?
182
5.	Crafting an Argument
How would you explain the emphasis that farmers’ political representatives placed on federal fiscal policy?
6.	Contextualization
What factors contributed to the nomination of William Jennings Bryan by both the People’s Party and the Democrats?
WORKER PROTEST AND THE RISE OF ORGANIZED LABOR
183
Explain the tensions in industrial America that led to major labor strife between the 1870s and 1914.
Review Questions
7.	Comparison
Compare and contrast the Knights of Labor and the American Federation of Labor. How would you characterize the approach of each to the challenges facing American workers in the late 1800s and early 1900s?
8.	Historical Interpretation
What role did government play in the labor disputes of the late 1800s?
9.	Crafting an Argument
What group or groups bears greatest responsibility for the violence that often accompanied labor disputes in the late 1800s and early 1900s?
Chapter 18 Responses to Industrialism, Responses to Change
CHAPTER OBJECTIVE
Demonstrate an understanding of the many ideas that were labeled progressive and the impact of those ideas on life in the United States.
LEARNING OBJECTIVES
THE REVOLT OF THE INTELLECTUALS
Explain the role of muckraking journalists and intellectuals in shaping a progressive agenda.
THE TRANSFORMATION OF THE CITIES
Analyze the changes in urban life that inspired progressive reforms and the impact of those reforms on cities.
RELIGIOUS RESPONSES TO THE GILDED AGE
Explain the main currents of religiously based reform movements during the progressive era.
PROGRESSIVE POLITICS ON THE NATIONAL STAGE_____________________________________________
Analyze the three "progressive presidents" and their administrations.
No one individual symbolized the Progressive movement as much as Theodore Roosevelt. As an advocate of the outdoor life, a "trustbuster," and a conservationist, he captured the hearts of many Americans in the early 1900s.
Theodore Roosevelt had been president for less than 4 months in December 1901 when he sent his first annual message to Congress. The new president said that, in light of the “tremendous and highly complex industrial development” in the country, the “old laws, and the old customs which.. .were once quite sufficient to regulate the accumulation and distribution of wealth.. .are no longer sufficient.” He asked Congress for new laws and new presidential authority to meet the new situation. Roosevelt was ready to act.
Roosevelt rejected the radicalism of Democrats like William Jennings
Bryan or Socialists like Eugene V. Debs. He insisted, “it cannot too often be pointed out that to strike with ignorant violence at the interest of one set of men almost inevitably endangers the interests of all.” He was full of praise for the corporate leaders who had created great wealth. Nevertheless, he asserted, “There is a wide-spread conviction in the minds of the American people that the great corporations known as trusts are in certain of their features and tendencies hurtful to the general welfare.” And since the “conditions are now wholly different,” therefore “wholly different action is called for.” As Roosevelt defined those “wholly different” actions in the weeks and months that followed, it became clear that he was charting a new course in American politics. He was no radical, but he was not a McKinley Republican either. He was determined to address the anger that fueled strikes—though
-Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
k536 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power-
certainly not to adopt the economic changes advocated by many strikers. In addition, he was committed to changing urban and industrial conditions and conserving the country’s natural resources.
As a result of his efforts, Roosevelt and the two presidents who followed him, William Howard Taft and Woodrow Wilson, came to be known as the progressive presidents. Presidential politics, however, were far from the only aspect of the larger Progressive movement that dominated American life between 1890 and 1917 and, indeed, led to the electoral success of Roosevelt and his successors. This chapter seeks to understand the many ideas that were labeled progressive and the impact of those ideas on life in the United States.
THE REVOLT OF THE INTELLECTUALS
19.1
Explain the role of muckraking journalists and intellectuals in shaping a progressive agenda.
Long before Theodore Roosevelt became president, numerous people in the United States were thinking about how best to respond to the extraordinary changes brought about by immigration, urbanization, and the rapid industrialization of the country. Upper-class reformers, newspaper reporters, ministers, writers, and college professors proposed new ways of ordering economic and political life. At the end of the 1800s, rapid industrialization and urbanization across the United States produced a radically different intellectual climate. New ideas, and those who envisioned them, began to shape the future of industrialized America.
Utopian Idealists
Henry George, a young journalist in California, was deeply troubled by the railway strike of 1877. Two years later, he published Progress and Poverty. The book quickly became a bestseller. George understood that there were benefits from industrialization, but the result, he said, was that “[f]rom all parts of the civilized world come complaints... of want and suffering and anxiety among the working classes.”
As a solution, George proposed a 100 percent tax on any increase in the value of land or any rents on land. He argued, “We already take some rent in taxation. We have only to make some change in our modes of taxation to take it all.” George said that his proposal would reduce the value and cost of land, thus allowing workers to turn to farming if they wished, which would create a labor shortage that would inevitably raise wages and improve conditions in factories. While many economists argued with George’s logic, the single tax movement became a political force, and single tax clubs sprang up everywhere. In 1886, New York’s Central Labor Union persuaded George to run for mayor of the city. Although George lost, his campaign led to a permanent reform coalition in New York.
Ten years after George’s book, Edward Bellamy, a journalist from Massachusetts, published Looking Backward in 1888. The book described a new perfect society in which class and class warfare had disappeared in a country of prosperous citizens who enjoyed their lives free of poverty or wealth and also free of lawyers and politics.
In contrast to Bellamy’s hopeful work, Ignatius Donnelly wrote Caesars Column in 1891, a book that described a country rigidly divided between a large working class living brutal lives and a small, comfortable elite. In Donnelly s fictional story, a few Americans are able to escape from their world and start a happy new community organized around the platforms of the Greenback Party, the Knights of Labor, and the Farmers’ Alliance.
George, Bellamy, and Donnelly and other authors like them were often unrealistic. Their images of a new perfect society seem romantic and their economic proposals unworkable. Nevertheless, in a county groping its way to a different economic order, all of them gave ideas, energy, and optimism to other reformers.
Significant Dates
1879	Progress and Poverty by Henry George
published
Frances E. Willard elected president of Woman's Christian Temperance Union
1881 Henry Demarest Lloyd publishes expose of Standard Oil Company
1889 Ellen Starr and Jane Addams open Hull House in Chicago
Hazen S. Pingree elected as reform mayor of Detroit, Michigan
1893 McClure's Magazine publishes first issue
1897 Samuel M. "Golden Rule" Jones elected reform mayor of Toledo, Ohio
1899	John Dewey's School and Society published
1901 Theodore Roosevelt becomes president at William McKinley's assassination
1904	Ida Tarbell's History of the Standard Oil
Company published
1906	Upton Sinclair's The Jungle published
1912	Woodrow Wilson defeats Theodore Roosevelt, William Howard Taft, and Eugene V. Debs for the presidency and launches New Freedom
1913	Federal Reserve System launched
1914	Clayton Anti-Trust Act
1917	Walter Rauschenbusch's A Theology for the
Social Gospel published
single tax movement
Proposed by Henry George in 1879, the single tax—a 100% tax on any increase in the value of real estate—was designed to keep property values low and therefore limit the accumulation of wealth while spreading opportunity more broadly in the society.
Chapter 19 Progressive Movements, Progressive Politics 537
Social Darwinism
The application of Charles Darwin's theory of biological evolution to society, holding that the fittest and the wealthiest should thrive and lead, the weak and the poor "deserve" their fate, and government action is unable to alter this "natural" process.
The Professors
John Dewey is best remembered for his educational ideas, but his goal was a wider philosophical response to industrialism. Dewey was born in 1859 in a small town in Vermont, studied philosophy at Johns Hopkins University, and taught at the University of Michigan. In 1894, Dewey was invited to the new University of Chicago. Dewey accepted the offer with enthusiasm. Chicago in the 1890s was the center of social reform in which Dewey and his wife Alice Chapman Dewey were deeply interested. When it came time to make the move, however, Dewey had a hard time getting to Chicago.
When Dewey set out for Chicago in July 1894, most of the nation’s rail lines were shut down because of the Pullman strike. He found transit on a Michigan Central train that did not use Pullman cars. Traveling in the midst of a nationwide strike was informative to the young philosophy professor. He spoke with one of the American Railway Union organizers and wrote to his wife that “my nerves were more thrilled than they had been for years.” He wondered “if I had better resign my job teaching & follow him round till I got into life.” Dewey was considerably less impressed by another passenger who was “voluble on the outrage” of the strike because it was preventing him from getting home for dinner. For Dewey, the focus was on higher considerations.
Young intellectuals like Dewey were then challenging the dominant economic theory of the time, “Social Darwinism.” The foremost American exponent of Social Darwinism, the economist William Graham Sumner, opposed what he called “the absurd effort to make the world over.” For Sumner, Charles Darwin’s description of biological evolution showed that the fittest of each species survive and thus shape the future. So, Sumner argued, in the social order, the fittest were rightfully the owners and the dominant class of society. Those less fit are condemned by their natural “un-fitness” to be laborers and employees. Any interference with the system, Sumner argued, would destabilize the economy and weaken the nation. Herbert Spencer, a British writer, proposed similar ideas, coining the phrase “survival of the fittest.” He, too, had a large following in the United States, especially among the wealthy.
Dewey saw the ideas of Spencer and Sumner as easy but unethical justifications for privilege. Instead, Dewey believed that wise people could and should intervene in the economy to make it more just. His thinking was shared by a generation of philosophers, including William James, Charles S. Peirce, and future Supreme Court Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes, who in the 1880s and 1890s doubted all ideological certainties and certainly did not want to see Social Darwinism become the dominant mindset in society.
Another young scholar, Richard Ely at Johns Hopkins University, also attacked the Social Darwinists. Ely had visited the town of Pullman before the strike and noticed that workers would not talk to him, fearing that he was a spy. He called the town’s culture “benevolent, well-wishing feudalism.” As a counter to Social Darwinism, Ely was developing a very different economic theory that allowed for—indeed called for— government to intervene directly in the economic affairs of the country.
While Dewey focused on philosophy and Ely on economics, Albion Small was helping to build the new academic discipline of sociology. For Small, sociologists did not simply study society; they meant to reform it. In 1896, Small sought to help define his field when he wrote in the new American Journal of Sociology that “action, not speculation, is the supreme teacher.” Dewey, Ely, and Small were all part of a generation of academics who shared the goal of changing society.
The Muckraking Journalists
Although newspapers had been important in the United States since well before the American Revolution, newspapers changed significantly in the late 1800s. When Joseph Pulitzer bought the New York Evening World in 1887, he made it the largest circulation paper in the country with several innovations—banner headlines, comic strips, and investigative journalism. The World did an expose of the speculative adventures of the managers of the Equitable Life Assurance Society, which the paper said were
|538 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
“gambling with the peoples money. Public anger over this news of the insurance industry’s excesses led to the election of a reforming Republican, Charles Evans Hughes, as governor of New York in 1906 and to new regulations on the insurance industry. In addition, the huge response to the expose made the World a very successful paper.
Almost a decade later, William Randolph Hearst, who had used the Pulitzer formula for his San Francisco Examiner exposes of the Southern Pacific Railroad, purchased the New York Morning Journal to compete directly with Pulitzer. Hearst hired some of the country’s best reporters, Edward Markham, Ambrose Bierce, and Winifred Black, and published his own exposes of New York City corruption. Many other newspapers began to imitate Pulitzer and Hearst.
The trend toward investigative reporting to expose misconduct of important people or organizations was emerging even before Pulitzer and Hearst took advantage of it. Henry Demarest Lloyd, who wrote for Chicago newspapers, became one of the first of the so-called muckraking journalists. The term muckraking referred to the job of raking through filth. Muckraking journalists saw it as their duty to expose the filth of corruption. Not everyone liked the new investigative journalism, and those who objected included more than just those being investigated. President Theodore Roosevelt thought the journalists described problems but failed to offer solutions. It was Roosevelt who coined the term muckrakers. He said the journalists were simply raking up the muck from the bottom of society’s pond, and the name muckraker stuck. For many, however, it became a term of respect.
Early in his career, Lloyd covered the 1877 railroad strike. He wrote that if something did not happen to improve the lot of the country’s workers, “the country will drift into a convulsion as much greater than the convulsion that wrecked the Roman Empire.” Lloyd’s 1881 expose of Standard Oil Company and his 1894 book, Wealth Against Commonwealth, denounced the monopolies as a threat to the welfare of everyday people.
Hearst also launched Cosmopolitan magazine as a vehicle for investigative journalism. In 1893, S. S. McClure launched McClure's Magazine, which until 1926 was the
muckraking journalists
Journalism exposing economic, social, and political evils, so named by Theodore Roosevelt for its "raking the muck"from the bottom of American society.
The Jungle, by muckraking journalist Upton Sinclair, exposed the inhumane and unhealthy conditions of meat processing in Chicago. One result was typical of progressive legislation designed to improve peop es lives, the Pure Food and Drug Act, which regulated the meatpacking industry.
Chapter 19 Progressive Movements, Progressive Politics 539
leader in the investigative field. Investigative journalists writing with the conviction that if people knew more of what was wrong in society they would act to change it-played a key role in the Progressive movement.
Ihe January 1903 issue of McClure's included articles by Ida M. Tarbell as part of her continuing analysis of John D. Rockefeller and the Standard Oil Company, later published as The History of the Standard Oil Company in 1904, Ray Stannard Baker s report of visiting striking coal miners and their families; and the report by Lincoln Steffens on “Ihe Shame of Minneapolis” about the trial of the infamous four-term mayor of Minneapolis who got rich from payments from opium joints, unlicensed saloons known as “blind pigs,” and “disorderly houses of prostitution. Issue after issue of McClure's, Cosmopolitan, and daily newspapers were forcing cities to clean up corruption, compelling sometimes reluctant legislators to enact new restrictions on monopolies, and helping political reformers gain office.
In 1906, a young reporter named Upton Sinclair took a job in Chicago’s slaughterhouses to report, from the inside, on the meatpacking industry. He found a world where workers suffered terrible injury, animals suffered inhumane treatment, and unsanitary conditions poisoned the meat consumed by Americans. When Sinclair’s expose, The Jungle, was published in 1906, the public response was immediate. Consumption of meat fell precipitously, and within months, Congress passed the Federal Meat Inspection Act and the Pure Food and Drug Act regulating the meat industry as well as the food and drug industries. While Sinclair’s main goal had been to draw attention to inhumane working conditions, the primary result of his efforts was sanitary regulation of meatpacking plants. As Sinclair reflected years later, “I aimed at the public’s heart and by accident I hit it in the stomach.” Nevertheless, the passage of reform legislation within months of a Sinclair’s book showed the power of such reporting and, at the same time, raised journalism to new heights as a respectable profession.
Quick Review Which was more important to launching the Progressive movement: the theory behind it or the identification of specific problems? Why?
THE TRANSFORMATION OF THE CITIES
Analyze the changes in urban life that inspired progressive reforms and the impact of those reforms on cities.
The United States grew from a little under 40 million people in 1870 to just over 75 million people in 1900 (for comparison, the 2010 census showed the United States at over 300 million people). Perhaps one-third of the growth between 1870 and 1910 was due to immigration and two-thirds to a high-birth rate. While the population almost doubled, it also became concentrated in cities. Many of the nations cities were much larger and more densely populated in 1900 than they had been in 1870, when the majority of people still lived on farms and in rural communities. In 1870, the United States had only seven cities with over 250,000 people and none yet held a million people. Thirty years later, three cities had passed the 1 million mark—New York with 3.4 million, Chicago with 1.7 million, and Philadelphia with 1.3 million. Ihere were also dozens of large cities scattered among most of the states and territories of the union. Americans were adjusting to urban life, and the adjustment was not always easy.
The Rise of Machine Politics and the Progressive Response
As cities grew, a new kind of urban politics took root in the United States, shaped by the fact that cities were the major points of entry for new immigrants to the nation. Many immigrants desperately needed services, especially help with a job. Some took quickly to city political life, finding in politics a way to gain social respectability.
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Nowhere was the mix of urban growth, immigration, and the need for new services greater than in New York City. Within that mix in New York, a new kind of political organization, the political machine, was created. In political machines, constituents supported a candidate in return for anticipated favors, which would be repaid when that candidate was elected. New Yorks Democratic political machine was known as Tammany Hall, named for the building where it first met. Tammany effectively ruled New York for most of the years from the 1850s to the 1930s. Many other urban political machines were often associated with Irish political leaders, but Tammany predated the Irish influence. In fact, gaining access to Tammany was part of the Irish rise to power in New York City.
The most famous, or infamous, of early Tammany bosses was William M. (Boss) Tweed, who led Tammany in the 1860s and 1870s. Tweed was a Protestant of English background. After holding the office of alderman (city council member) and then being elected to Congress, Tweed turned to where he saw the real power, in Tammany.
In 1863 at the age of 40, Tweed became the chief of Tammany. He made sure one of his close allies, Abraham Oakley, was elected mayor while he stayed in the background and kept control of the political process. Tweed became immensely wealthy as he and his Tammany associates benefited from—some said stole from—development projects like the Tweed Courthouse in lower Manhattan (now the home of the city’s school department) and Riverside Park, built over the New York Central Railroad tracks— beautiful municipal improvements that provided jobs but cost many times what they should have, with large kickbacks going to the chosen developers and to Tweed himself.
Tweed and the New York political bosses who came after him robbed the city shamelessly, by one estimate taking 45 million dollars (1 billion in current dollars). At the same time, the political machine made sure that the city’s poor—or more specifically, those among the city’s poor who supported them on election day—got jobs when they needed them. When necessary, Tammany created more jobs than the city needed
Tammany Hall
New York City's Democratic Party organization, dating from well before the Civil War, that evolved into a powerful political machine after 1860, using patronage and bribes to maintain control of the city administration.
Political cartoons like this one showing a corrupt political boss handing out special privileges and demanding
votes in return, did much to turn public opinion against machine rule in politics.	Pnlitir.
Chapter 19 Progressive Movements, Progressive Politics 5-

to be sure that every loyal voter got one, even if that meant that the city had 20 inspectors for its four water pumps and Central and Riverside parks were kept immaculate by an impressively large number of park workers. Tammany and other political machines could also be counted on for more direct aid when it was needed a handout to tide a family over a rough spot, a basket of food for the holidays, someone to show up at court and indicate to the judge or district attorney when charges should be dropped.
Tweed’s corruption was attacked by the cartoonist Thomas Nast and eventually provoked a public backlash. Tweed was arrested, convicted of theft, and died in jail in 1878. Some of his collaborators fled the country. But Tammany survived, and the new leader, John (Honest John) Kelly was the first of a long line of Irish politicians to direct Tammany. Kelly avoided the kind of theft that led to Tweed s downfall. But he did ensure that a tightly organized political machine maintained close links to immigrant communities and Catholic parishes, as well as local and district bosses. Kelly controlled the city’s 40,000 jobs and made sure that loyal Tammany supporters-those who remembered to vote the Tammany ticket on election day—got those jobs.
One of Tammany’s district leaders, George Washington Plunkitt, was also a state senator. In 1905, Plunkitt described how New York politics worked. He said that reformers failed to draw “the distinction between honest graft and dishonest graft. There’s all the difference in the world between the two.” Plunkitt would have nothing to do with “dishonest graft—blackmailin’ gamblers, saloon-keepers, disorderly people, etc.” But there was another way, he said, “There’s honest graft, and I’m an example of how it works. I might sum up the whole thing by sayin’: T seen my opportunities and I took em.”’ He explained, “Well, I’m tipped off, say, that they’re going to lay out a new park at a certain place... .1 go to that place, and I buy up all the land I can in the neighborhood.... ain’t it perfectly honest to charge a good price and make a profit on my investment and foresight?” It was an arrangement that Plunkitt saw no reason to hide. Reformers might not have liked it, but that was how cities worked in Plunkitt’s day.
New York was far from alone in the rise of machine politics that was often Irish dominated. Most large cities had something similar. Politics in Boston was played at the neighborhood level, where a number of legendary figures—Patrick J. Kennedy in East Boston, John F. (Honey Fitz) Fitzgerald in the North End, P.J. Maguire and later James Michael Curley in Roxbury, and most powerful of all Martin Lomasney in the West End—each ruled their neighborhood. In 1905, Fitzgerald won election as mayor. He served two terms and was succeeded by his arch-rival James M. Curley, who dominated Boston politics for the next half century. Fitzgerald’s favorite daughter, Rose, married Patrick Kennedy’s son Joseph, and their son, John Fitzgerald Kennedy, became the first Irish Catholic elected president.
While the political machines met real needs for their poor and working-class constituents (and along the way made a few of their leaders very wealthy), the closed-door deals, the graft—“honest” or “dishonest”—and the political favoritism dismayed many. The political machines greatly increased the cost of municipal government. They also shut many out of office, especially the children and grandchildren of the native-born elite who thought it was their duty and destiny to rule. A new generation of political reformers began challenging the political machines, making municipal reform an important element in the progressive agenda.
The Progressive Challenge to City and State Government
Progressive reformers believed that the country’s political and economic systems could be fixed if honest people of good will put their minds to it. They had little interest in radical reforms like socialism and little sympathy for the old-line politicians like Boston’s Martin Lomasney. They were what they said they were, reformers, trying to reform current structures of government.
In their campaigns for efficient urban management, progressive reformers sometimes came across as cold and heartless to residents who preferred the
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
542
American Voices
Lincoln Steffens, “Boston—1915,” 1908
Lincoln Steffens, one of the leading "muckraking" journalists, was invited to support a reform effort in Boston—called Boston 1915—by local businessmen in 1908. Boston taught Steffens some important lessons about not only the role of political machines but also the place of reformers like himself in the life of the urban poor.
My sponsor, E. A. Filene, called together a group of earnest, representative men, some of them reformers, not all...I [asked them], Who was the worst, the most impossible, man in Boston?
"Martin Lomasney," they said, all in quick agreement. A politician he was....and the next morning early I took my little dog, Mickey Sweeney, and went over in the bad wards where Martin Lomasney was the boss....
"Who do you want?" he demanded.
"Martin Lomasney."
"That's me," he said. "Who are you?"
I told him. "Sure," he said. "I've read your stuff. What do you want?"...
"The reformers sent me to you,"..."I asked them who was the worst man in town, and they named you. So I've come to get the low-down on things, and—will you give it to me?"..
"You must want something," Martin grumbled at me....
"Yes," I said. "Police graft. What do you do about the petty
crooks?"
He was cross, or he pretended to be. "What do you mean by petty crooks?"
"Oh, you know, the dips, the burglars and thieves, the regular professional crooks that we honest grafters call criminals."
"And what do you mean by what I do about them?"
"Well, you go to the front for them, don't you? See the dis-
trict attorney or a judge or the cops—you get them off, don't you?"
"Yes, I do," he said, dropping his feet and facing me with three fingers thrust under my nose. "Three times."
I laughed."Ah, now, don't you sometimes do it four times?" He was defying me. "Seven times? Martin, don't you even
get'em off seventy times seven times?"
"Yes, I do," he burst. "I never quit some of'em, not the way you do."
"Of course," I said. "You stick, but tell me, how do you justify it to yourself, saving these hopeless crooks over and over and over again when you know they'll come back and do it over and over and over again!"
I did not expect him to answer this question. It was more of an exclamation on my part, but he did answer it; inarticulate people can sometimes express themselves.
"I think," said Martin Lomasney, "that there's got to be in every ward somebody that any bloke can come to—no matter what he's done—and get help. Help, you understand; none of your law and your justice, but help."
That hit me hard, and we got no further that day.... They provided help and counsel and a hiding-place in emergencies for friendless men, women, and children who were in dire need, who were in guilty need, with the mob of justice after them. And, as I sat there and thought I saw that if we were to build up in Boston an organization to replace the political machine and so win the town the loyalty that now went to the boss and his party, we must provide for that service.
Source: Lincoln Steffens, The Autobiography of Lincoln Steffens (New York: The Literary Guild, 1931), pp. 612-618.
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
What did Lincoln Steffens, and the men who invited him to Boston, think about the way that Martin Lomasney ran his ward in Boston? What did Lomasney think of the reformers?
2.	Historical Interpretation
How did Lomasney justify his politics? What do his justifications suggest about the challenges faced by the reformers who hoped to supplant him?
face-to-face dealings of old-style political bosses. Moreover, in their desire to cut costs, some reformers attacked services that others thought essential. Progressive reform was also seen—sometimes accurately—as an effort by an older Protestant and native-born elite to reclaim power from more recent immigrant groups, especially the Irish, who had built up their own political organizations.
Nevertheless, candidates committed to cleaning up urban corruption and providing more efficient urban services came to power in a number of cities. Progressive reform cut across the political parties. Republicans and Democrats alike included both reformers and those who resisted reform.
Chapter 19 Progressive Movements, Progressive Politics
initiative
Procedure by which citizens can introduce a subject for legislation, usually through a petition signed by a specific number of voters.
referendum
Submission of a law, proposed or already in effect, to a direct popular vote for approval or rejection.
recall
The process of removing an official from office by popular vote, usually after using petitions to call for such a vote.
Grover Cleveland was elected mayor of Buffalo, New York, as a Democrat in 1881 with a promise to clean up the municipal corruption. Cleveland established a reputation for honesty, especially after he rejected a street-cleaning contract approved by the city council as a “bare-faced, impudent, and shameless scheme.” Cleveland’s honesty led to his election as a reform governor of New York and, only 2 years later, to the presidency and the White House.
Hazen S. Pingree was elected mayor of Detroit, Michigan, as a Republican reformer. Born in Maine in 1840, Pingree served in the Union army, then moved to Detroit where he went to work in a shoe factory, and by the 1880s, owned one of the largest shoe manufacturers in the Midwest. In 1889, Republican business leaders, determined to oust Detroit’s Democratic machine, sought out Pingree who quickly took to politics, was a tough campaigner, and became a popular mayor. Pingree challenged the awarding of city contracts for the schools, ferries, toll roads, and street and sewer services. When the private City Railway Company wanted a long-term contract, Pingree forced them to cut fares from 5 cents to 3 cents, a significant benefit to Detroit’s citizens.
When the depression of 1893 put 25,000 of Detroit’s 250,000 people out of work, Pingree, who did not want to increase municipal spending, convinced owners of vacant lots to allow the city to use them, provided seeds and farm implements to the unemployed, and urged people all over the city to start their own potato patches and vegetable plots. In time, he became known as “Potato Patch Pingree” for his efforts.
Samuel M. Jones, known as “Golden Rule Jones,” served as mayor of Toledo, Ohio, from 1897 until 1904. Jones started work as a day laborer, but eventually started his own oil company. When Jones sold the company to Standard Oil, he emerged a rich man. Reform-minded business leaders nominated Jones for mayor in Toledo in an effort to dislodge a corrupt machine. Jones spent municipal funds freely, opening kindergartens, building parks, and instituting an 8-hour day for city workers. He also called on voters to renounce political parties, believing that a nonpartisan approach to politics would work best. The Republican Party, unhappy with Jones’s free-spending ways, refused to renominate him, but he was elected as an independent and continued to serve as a popular mayor until his death. His successor in office, Brand Whitlock, continued his policies through four terms until President Woodrow Wilson appointed Whitlock as U.S. ambassador to Belgium on the eve of World War I. Between them, Jones and Whitlock gave Toledo a national reputation for good government and effective public services when many cities were still mired in corruption and inefficiency. Other cities were also known for their progressive mayors, including San Francisco’s James D. Phelan, 1897-1902, and Cleveland’s Tom Lofton Johnson, 1899-1909.
Grover Cleveland and Hazen S. Pingree both moved from the mayor’s office to become governor of their states. The move was not merely upward political mobility. Many progressive reformers became convinced that legislation at the state level was essential to limit the power of corporations or corrupt urban machines. Other state reforms became core progressive issues, especially proposals for initiative, referendum, and recall, measures aimed at limiting the power of political elites by giving voters the chance to change government policy. South Dakota in the 1890s, Oregon in 1902, and then other states, especially in the West, began adopting these measures. Initiative laws allowed voters to put new laws on the ballot through a petition process while a referendum allowed a similar process to review legislation already in force in a state. Finally recall petitions and votes allowed voters to remove public officials—legislators, mayors, governors—from office before their terms ended. Never as popular east of the Mississippi as in the West, initiative, referendum, and recall were typical progressive measures, based on the same assumption that drove muckraking journalists: an educated and informed public would do the right thing once the right information was in hand.
Governors and legislatures also adopted other reforms in the progressive era. Workers who were injured on the job had been left on their own or blamed for accidents, but progressives passed worker’s compensation laws. Some passed limits on
544 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
This young Pittsburgh miner lost his leg in a mine accident. Referring to people like this worker helped progressives pass worker's compensation laws.
the length of the work day, especially for women, and tried to regulate the safety of working conditions.
Reform came to New York City by a different route. Seth Low, the president of Columbia University, was elected mayor of New York as an anti-Tammany candidate in 1901. He fought graft and instituted civil service reform, but Low was not popular, especially in communities that depended on Tammany, and he was defeated for reelection 2 years later. At that point, New York was back in Tammany hands, and Tammany’s boss, Charles Murphy, was also the most powerful politician in the state although he held no office. After state elections in 1910, however, Murphy launched his own reform efforts. He selected two Tammany loyalists who were among the youngest and newest in the legislature, 33-year-old Robert F. Wagner in the Senate and 38-year-old Alfred E. Smith in the House, to be the party leaders. Wagner and Smith were known as the “Tammany Twins.” In their long political careers, they were also among the most important reformers in American history.
After the Triangle Factory Fire in 1911 (see Chapter 18), Murphy knew they had to do something or lose the support of families who had lost so many daughters and sons in the fire. Murphy directed Wagner and Smith to sponsor the creation of the New York Factory Investigating Commission, which the legislature approved within 3 months. Where Tammany-controlled police officers had harassed striking garment workers only months before, the Tammany-created Factory Investigating Commission hired some of the same strikers to investigate conditions in the city’s garment industries, where they found unsafe and unworkable fire escapes and locked exits. A social worker, Frances Perkins, who had witnessed the Triangle Fire, was one of many to volunteer her services to the Factory Investigating Commission. Perkins also wrote much of the legislation that came from the commission’s work. In the 2 years, Wagner and Smith, working closely with Perkins, pushed 36 measures through the New York legislature, including those requiring sprinklers in high-rise buildings, fire drills in large shops, unlocked exits, and a reorganization of the state Department of Labor to enforce the new regulations.
Later, these New Yorkers would bring progressive legislation to a national stage. Frances Perkins served as the head of the state s Department of Labor and then from 1933 to 1945 as the U.S. Secretary of Labor, the first woman to serve in a
Chapter 19 Progressive Movements, Progressive Politics
19,1 j
____j
19.2
W’ '
: £ '■
presidential cabinet. Robert Wagner went to Washington as a U.S. Senator where he sponsored legislation creating the Social Security system and legislation guaranteeing unemployment insurance and workers’ compensation. In addition, he sponsored the Wagner Act, which gave labor unions the right to bargain effectively—the most important piece of labor legislation enacted in the United States in the 1900s. Al Smith served as a progressive governor of New York in the 1920s and as the Democratic nominee for U.S. president in 1928, the first Catholic nominated by a major party. Progressive reform had influenced one of the most powerful political machines, Tammany, and in turn, Tammany had cultivated powerfully effective legislators who generated historic reforms.
Progressive Education
In 1899, John Dewey wrote The School and Society, describing what he thought a progressive approach to education should be, one that he had tried to create with his wife, Alice Chapman Dewey, and Ella Flagg Young, a Chicago teacher leader (who would later be superintendent of schools in Chicago, the first woman to lead a big city system). Together, they opened the Laboratory School at the University of Chicago in 1896, a child-centered approach. For Dewey and others, the focus was not on structure at all, but on the child. These child-centered progressives wanted to shift the emphasis in schools from the curriculum to the needs of the child. Progressive education meant many different things to different people, and Dewey represented only one aspect of it. Other educators who also called themselves progressives argued bitterly with him. For some, progressive education meant reorganizing schools to be more business-like, with centralized administrations and bureaucratic top-down modes of decision making. Progressive teachers wanted to restructure schools to give themselves more voice and more influence while also earning better pay and teaching smaller classes. For yet others, the goal was to make education scientific and to use standardized testing to improve schools. Certainly in the field of education there were many movements that called themselves progressive, and no one definition fit all of them.
Jane Addams and the Settlement House Movement
Jane Addams (1860-1935) spent all of her adult life at Hull House in Chicago, living among the city's poor. She not only provided social services but also learned much from her neighbors.
In 1913, when Jane Addams had been living at Hull House on Halsted Street in Chicago for more than 20 years, she summed up her belief about the role of the settlement house and all efforts to improve society. “We have learned to say,” she wrote “that the good must be extended to all of society before it can be held secure by any one person or any one class; but we have not yet learned to add to that statement, that unless all men and all classes contribute to a good, we cannot even be sure it is worth having.” While many progressives might have agreed that society must find a way to extend the good things of life to all citizens, far fewer would have agreed with Addams that all citizens needed to play a role in defining what “good” looked like. Nevertheless, she held firm on both points. At Hull House, social reformers met those they were trying to help in face-to-face encounters, and all involved learned from each other.
Addams was born to a comfortable life in 1860 (her father was a friend of Abraham Lincoln’s) and moved to Chicago in 1889 when she and her friend Ellen Starr opened Hull House. Chicago’s Hull House, though not the first American settlement house, became the model for most others. Addams said she was at Hull House to be a part of the community, not to offer help from above. She knew that she was living there as much to learn as to help her economically poorer neighbors.
Hull House and similar settlement houses in other cities organized badly needed social services in poor urban neighborhoods. Lillian Wald and Mary Brewster founded the Henry Street Settlement and the Henry Street Visiting Nurse Services in New York City’s Lower East Side. Others settlement houses, including Hull House, did the same. Visiting nurses based in settlement houses visited the tenement apartments of the poor and brought medical help.
546 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
American Voices
Jane Addams, Twenty Years at Hull House, 1910
Jane Addams was a younger contemporary of Mother Jones but from a very different background. She and her good friend Ellen Starr opened Hull House in one of Chicago's poorest neighborhoods in September 1889, and Addams lived there for the next 45 years serving successive generations of Chicago's poor. In the process, she became a nationally and internationally known advocate for settlement houses and, later, for political reform and an end to war. Nevertheless, for all of her national and international travel and fame, her home and her roots remained on Halsted Street where she lived until she died in 1935.
The next January [1889] found Miss Starr and myself in
Chicago, searching for a neighborhood in which we might put our plans into execution. In our eagerness to win friends for the new undertaking, we utilized every opportunity to set forth the meaning of the Settlement as it had been embodied inToynbee Hall, although in those days we made no appeal for money, meaning to start with our own slender resources....
In those early days we were often asked why we had come to live on Halsted Street when we could afford to live somewhere else. I remember one man who used to shake his head and say it was "the strangest thing he had met in his experience," but who was finally convinced that it was "not strange but natural." In time it came to seem natural to all of us that the Settlement should be there. If it is natural to feed the hungry and care for the sick, it is certainly natural to give pleasure to the young, comfort to the aged, and to minister to the deep-seated craving for social intercourse that all men feel. Whoever does it is rewarded by something, which, if not gratitude, is at least spontaneous and vital and lacks that irksome sense of obligation with which a substantial benefit is too often acknowledged....
From the first it seemed understood that we were ready to perform the humblest neighborhood services. We were asked to wash the newborn babies, and to prepare the dead for burial, to nurse the sick, and to "mind the children."...
But in spite of some untoward experiences, we were constantly impressed with the uniform kindness and courtesy we received. Perhaps these first days laid the simple human foundations which are certainly essential for continuous living among the poor: first, genuine preference for residence in an industrial quarter to any other part of the city, because it is interesting, and makes the human appeal; and second, the conviction in the words of Canon Barnett, that the things which make men alike are finer and better than the things that keep them apart, and that these basic likenesses, if they are properly accentuated, easily transcend the less essential differences of race, language, creed, and tradition.
Perhaps even in those first days we made a beginning toward that object which was afterward stated in our charter: "To provide a center for a higher civic and social life; to institute and maintain educational and philanthropic enterprises, and to investigate and improve the conditions in the industrial districts of Chicago."
Source: Jane Addams, Twenty Years at Hull House (originally published 1910).
Thinking Critically
1.	Documentary Analysis
Why did Jane Addams believe that living among the poor was a central part of her mission?
2.	Contextualization
How did Addams see her relationship with the people she served? What aspects of the Progressive movement were reflected in her views?

Under Addams leadership, Hull House did more than provide services to the poor. It also took the side of the poor in labor and legal disputes. When Addams realized that young women strikers were in danger of losing their company housing, Hull House launched a cooperative women’s boarding house. Such direct support for strikers did not endear Addams to some of Chicago’s most powerful leaders who were willing to tolerate, even support, social services but were hostile to her involvement in a strike. Nevertheless, such efforts solidified her base within the communities that mattered the most to her.
Quick Review Why were political reforms, school reforms, and assistance for the working class deemed necessary to improve life in American cities? Which were the most beneficial? Were some harmful?
Chapter 19 Progressive Movements, Progressive Politics 547
RELIGIOUS RESPONSES TO THE GILDED AGE

19.3
Id J

Explain the main currents of religiously based reform movements during the progressive era.
In the late 1800s, reform movements seeking to improve the lives of working people, bring an end to municipal corruption, and build a just economic order often took on the language and style of evangelical religion. Both reform movements and religious revivals emphasized personal and social transformation. Both wanted changes in peoples hearts and were unafraid to use government to bring about changes in behavior. Many reformers were themselves Protestants, and reform efforts were often rooted in the ideas and individualistic ethos of Protestant Christianity.
Temperance and the Woman's Christian Temperance Union
Certainly no political renewal movement was more rooted in Protestant Christianity than the womens campaign against alcohol that began in the 1870s (see Map 19-1). Early in the 1800s, many Protestant ministers began to oppose excessive drinking, and some Protestants took a strong stand against liquor. Still, most Americans continued to drink alcohol. The Panic of 1873, however, led a group of Midwestern women to start a new temperance movement. Many women seemed to reach the same conclusion at about the same time: liquor was consuming their husbands’ wages while leading the men to arrive home drunk and ready to abuse wives and children. The answer to this problem, and the key to defending their homes and families, they said, was a campaign against “Demon Rum.”
State-wide
Prohibition
Before 1900 |	| By 1910
I I
By 1919 Local Option
MAP 19-1 Prohibition in the States. The power of the Woman's Christian Temperance Union is shown in the number of states that, starting with Kansas in 1881, prohibited the sale of alcohol outright and those many more that passed local option laws giving cities and towns the right to ban alcohol.
548 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
In Hillsboro, Ohio, women began to meet to pray and then to take their prayers into the local saloons or, if banned, to stand outside and pray. Through the depression winter of 1873-1874, Ohio women claimed credit for closing some 3,000 saloons. The following fall, in November 1874, 200 women from 17 states met in Cleveland and formed the Woman s Christian Temperance Union (WCTU). They were determined to make temperance abstinence from liquor—the key moral and political issue of the decade. In the process, the WCTU empowered a generation of women who had been taught that ladylike behavior meant quietly taking care of home and family and leaving politics to men.
When the WCTU began, Frances E. Willard, dean of women and professor at Northwestern University in Chicago, was too busy with her academic duties to pay much attention. Soon thereafter, however, she left Northwestern to become a full-time organizer for the WCTU. Five years later in 1879, Willard became its second president, and she led the WCTU for the next 24 years until her death in 1898, becoming probably the most prominent woman in the United States at the time.
Under Willard s leadership, the WCTU broadened its goals while never losing sight of ending the use of alcohol. Willard was convinced that “much of the evil by which the country is cursed,” especially the evil of drink, is the fault of “the men in power whose duty is to make and administer the laws.” She took the organization into the political arena, demanding for women the right to vote so they could vote on matters affecting drink and the home. She coined the phrase “home protection” to describe the WCTU’s agenda. If drink was destroying families, she argued, then women needed the right to defend their families. If the WCTU was going to pursue its mission of saving homes and reconstructing the nation, then Willard insisted, “We must show power.”
By the time Willard died, the WCTU had almost 200,000 members, a 12-story national headquarters in Chicago, and a powerful national presence.
Others took the temperance cause in very different directions. Carry Nation, from Kiowa, Kansas, was married to a man who turned out to be a hopeless drunk. After he died, Nation moved and married a nondrinker. In response to what she believed was a call from God, Nation went back to Kiowa and smashed up the local saloon, breaking bottles, mirrors, and pictures. She followed up with “hatchetations” of other saloons and became a national symbol of one version of the temperance movement.
Whether in the direct action of Carry Nation or the more organized approach of Frances Willard, the temperance movement changed the United States. It laid a solid foundation not only for the Eighteenth Amendment that in 1919 banned the manufacture and sale of liquor but also for the Nineteenth Amendment that a few months later in 1920 gave women the right to vote. The temperance crusade also demonstrated the power of organized religion, both in churches led by clergy and in extradenomina-tional organizations often led by women. The United States in the late 1800s was still an overwhelmingly Protestant country, and a movement that could tap the Protestant religious fervor of the nation’s majority could go far.
The Social Gospel
In 1897, Charles M. Sheldon, a young Congregationalist pastor in Topeka, Kansas, published a novel, In His Steps, which eventually sold 15 million copies. In His Steps told of a fictionalized minister who asks his congregation, What would be the result, if in this city every church member should begin to do as Jesus would do?... What would Jesus do in the matter of wealth?” In the novel, the question What would Jesus do?” transformed the town. Similarly, In His Steps also struck a chord in the country. Sheldons question, “What would Jesus do?” led many Protestants to embrace reform movements.
Other religious leaders began to talk of what they called the Social Gospel, which was based on the idea that improving society was both the right thing for religious
Frances Willard (1839-1898) led the Woman's Christian Temperance Union from 1879 to 1898, making it a powerful force in the United States.
Woman's Christian Temperance Union
National organization formed after the Civil War dedicated to prohibiting the sale and distribution of alcohol.
Social Gospel
Application of religious ethics to industrial conditions and thereby alleviating poverty, slums, and labor exploitation.
Chapter 19 Progressive Movements, Progressive Politics 549
THINKING HISTORICALLY
How the Other Half Lives

193
Jacob A. Riis, an immigrant from Denmark working as a newspaper police reporter, published How the Other Half Lives in 1890. In that book, Riis sought to describe to the city's well-off residents the housing conditions of New York's poor, especially through his photographs. He described parts of lower Manhattan:
The death of a child in a tenement was registered at the Bureau of Vital Statistics as "plainly due to suffocation in the foul air of an unventilated apartment.".. .Another was the case of a hard-working family of man and wife, young people from the old country, who took poison together in a Crosby Street tenement because they were "tired." There was no other explanation, and none was needed when I stood in the room in which they had lived. It was an attic with sloping ceiling and a single window so far out on the roof that it seemed not to belong to the place at all. With scarcely room enough to turn around in they had been compelled to pay five dollars and a half a month in advance. There were four such rooms in the attic, and together they brought in as much as many a handsome little cottage in a pleasant part of Brooklyn.
Riis said, "the proprietors frequently urged the filthy habits of the tenants as an excuse for the condition of their property, utterly losing sight of the fact that it was the tolerance of those habits which was the real evil, and that for this they themselves were alone responsible." In pinning responsibility for poverty and misery directly on those who profited from it, Riis created considerable hostility toward himself but also great publicity for the book.
Later, Riis described the difficulty he had in getting the How the Other Half Lives published:
For more than a year I had knocked at the doors of the various magazine editors with my pictures, proposing to tell them how the other half lived, but no one wanted to know.... [I]n the church one might, at all events, tell the truth unhindered. So I thought; but there were cautious souls there too.
Eventually, Riis met Dr. Schauffler, the manager of the City Mission Society, and Dr. Josiah Strong, the author of Our Country.
They were impressed with the photos and arranged for Riis to tell the stories within How the Other Half Lives to a group at the Broadway Tabernacle, a Congregational church associated with Schauffler and Strong. Riis continues the account:
One of the editors of Scribner's Magazine saw my pictures and heard their story in his church, and came to talk the matter over with me. As a result of that talk I wrote an article that appeared in the Christmas Scribner's, 1889, under the title "How the Other Half Lives," and made an instant impression.... It could not have been long after I wrote "How the Other Half Lives"that he [Theodore Roosevelt, then Police Commissioner of New York City] came to the Evening Sun office one day looking for me. I was out, and he left his card, merely writing on the back of it that he had read my book and had "come to help."...There is very little ease where Theodore Roosevelt leads, as we all found out....Mr. Roosevelt was a member of the Health Board, and sometimes it was the tenements we went inspecting when the tenants slept. He was after the facts, and learned speedily to get them as he could. When as Governor, he wanted to know just how the Factory Law was being executed, he came down from Albany and spent a whole day with me personally investigating tenements in which sweating [sweatshop manufacturing done at home] was carried on.
Source: Jacob A. Riis, The Making of an American (New York: Macmillan, 1901), pp. 191 -225.
Thinking Critically
1.	Contextualization
What might have been some of the reasons Riis had trouble getting his pictures published? How do you think real estate owners responded to his pictures and his explanations of conditions?
2.	Comparison
Compare and contrast the contributions of Riis, Roosevelt, and Addams to the Progressive movement. What common beliefs, approaches, and goals did they share?
people to do and, indeed, God’s will. There were many social gospel preachers, but the most prominent was Walter Rauschenbusch whose 1917 book A Theology for the Social Gospel broadened the definition of sin from a focus on individual flaws to include social institutions that oppressed others. Rauschenbusch was far from alone in advocating a social gospel. George D. Herron was a pastor whose most famous sermon, “The Message of Jesus to Men of Wealth” claimed simply that “a rich Christian is a contradiction of terms.” Josiah Strong edited a social gospel magazine, The Gospel of the Kingdom, and published a book, Our Country, pleading for missionary work within American cities and around the world. In every city, local city mission societies carried out their own social gospel mission.
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914

Even more than his writing, the photographs that Jacob Riis made, like this one titled "Sleeping Quarters Areaway, Mulberry St.," showed middle-class America the poverty in which "the other half" lived.
i 19/1
; M2
WJ
While the social gospel was a Protestant movement, social issues also swept Catholic America. Cardinal James Gibbons, the long-time archbishop of Baltimore and nominal leader of American Catholics, defended the American labor movement and the role of Catholics in it to a wary Vatican. Gibbons argued that the rise of monopolies with their “heartless avarice” demanded action.
Not all religious communities shared in the social gospel movement, however. Many first-generation Jewish immigrants put all of their religious energy into secular political reform and labor movements. Some rabbis, in turn, worried that the focus on secular politics would undermine the spiritual world of the immigrants. Parish priests in Italian, German, and Czech parishes in Chicago tangled with the anarchists and union radicals whom they saw as taking people away from the faith. Some Catholics focused on private devotional activities or large street festivals often devoted to the Virgin Mary, seeing their faith as a refuge from the larger society rather than a way to change society. They valued the ministry of individuals like Frances Xavier Cabrini—Mother Cabrini—sent to the United States by an Italian bishop in 1889 to serve the needs of the Italian immigrants but who, unlike Cardinal Gibbons, avoided labor organizing and politics. Religious people, like others, had widely differing ideas about how to live well in the new urban and industrial society of the United States.
Quick Review How were religiously inspired progressives similar to or different from other progressive reformers?
PROGRESSIVE POLITICS ON THE NATIONAL STAGE
Analyze the three "progressive presidents" and their administrations.
A significant turning point in American politics came early in the morning of
September 14, 1901, when President William McKinley died in Buffalo, New York.
He had been visiting the Pan American Exposition when he was shot by a lone anar-
chist, Leon Czolgosz, on September 6. Ihe president survived the bullet but died of the
infection that followed. McKinley was the third American president to be assassinated
Chapter 19 Progressive Movements, Progressive Politics 55
19.4
Theodore Roosevelt
552 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power-
after Abraham Lincoln in 1865 and James A. Garfield in 1881. Ihe fact that Czolgosz described himself as an anarchist led to a strong backlash against the anarchist movement, just regaining its political standing after the widespread hostility to anarchism engendered by the Haymarket violence of 1886 (see Chapter 18).
Vice President Theodore Roosevelt, who had been on a camping trip with his family in New York’s Adirondack Mountains when McKinley was shot, arrived in Buffalo to take the oath of office. Sitting on the train bringing McKinley’s body from Buffalo to Washington, DC, was Ohio Senator Mark Hanna, who had helped McKinley select Roosevelt as Vice President. Hanna understood what the transition meant for many like him who constituted the old guard of the Republican Party. “Now look!” Hanna muttered, “That damned cowboy is President of the United States!”
There was a reason that some referred to the new president as a cowboy. Theodore Roosevelt had already had an extraordinary career in and out of politics when he ascended to the presidency. Born to a wealthy New York family whose roots went back to Dutch New York, he grew up as a sometimes awkward and sickly child. He compensated by lifting weights and learning to box. He attended Harvard College, was elected to the New York state assembly at 23, a year after his marriage to Alice Hathaway Lee. When his wife died, Roosevelt abandoned politics for a cowboy life in the Dakotas. He soon returned to New York, married Edith Kermit Carow, and started on his rapid political ascent. He was appointed U.S. civil service commissioner at age 31, police commissioner of New York at 37, and assistant secretary of the Navy at 39. During the Spanish-American War, Roosevelt took command of a unit in Cuba known as the Rough Riders, making himself a war hero. He was elected governor of New York when he had just turned 40 and was already plotting his own campaign for the presidency.
Roosevelt’s hopes for the presidency were almost derailed by his differences with the old guard in the New York Republican Party. As governor, Roosevelt wanted to end corruption, tax the street railways, and provide for industrial safety as well as workmen’s compensation for those injured on the job. He had advocated for the inspection of tenement housing since being shown their conditions by Jacob Riis. But not everyone in New York, Democrats or Republicans, liked those new ideas.
Ihe boss of the Republican Party in New York, state Senator Tom Platt, supported Roosevelt for governor in November 1898 because his war hero popularity and anticorruption image seemed the only way to win the election and maintain Republican power. But once Platt discovered that Roosevelt actually meant what he said, the boss decided he needed to get rid of the governor before he wrecked the Republican machine. Platt planned to sideline Roosevelt by getting him the nomination as McKinley’s running mate for 1900. Roosevelt did not want the nomination. In 1900, no sitting vice president had been elected president since Martin Van Buren succeeded Andrew Jackson more than half a century earlier. Even so, the nomination was hard to reject without seeming disloyal to the party. McKinley and Roosevelt won the election, and state politics in New York returned to normal. Then, only months into McKinley’s second term, the president was dead and the reforming politician from New York was the president of the United States. At the age of 42, he was also the youngest president ever. Teddy Roosevelt—Progressive President
Taking the oath of office, the new president promised “to carry out absolutely unbroken” the former president’s policies. One observer responded, “yes, the same way one carries out the trash.” That comment represented an accurate view of the new president. After a brief period of mourning, very brief for him personally, the White House and the country started to experience Roosevelts considerable reforming energy, which New Yorkers had known for some time.
-Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
THE TRUSTBUSTER AND THE SQUARE DEAL
Roosevelt soon outlined his departure from McKinley and his determination to limit the power of industrial corporations. TR (as he came to be known to everyone) told Congress that “there are real and grave evils that come from the power of the great corporations, and the federal government needed to assume the authority to supervise and limit that power. Only a month before Roosevelt spoke to Congress, James J. Hill, owner of the Great Northern Railroad, and E. H. Harriman, who controlled the Union Pacific Railroad, met with representatives of J. Pierpont Morgan, who controlled the Northern Pacific Railroad. These three lines were competitors across the northern plains. Ihe competition among them kept prices low and helped farmers and industries who wanted to ship their products. As had been the case with steel less than a year before, such competition struck Morgan as terribly inefficient and a drain on profits. Hill, Harriman, and Morgan solved their problem by creating a new entity, The Northern Securities Company Limited, to which they then sold all of their railroads. In place of competition, the transcontinental railroad routes would now be one happy family.
Roosevelt did not mention Northern Securities in his December speech, and some industrialists hoped that his speech was mere rhetoric. Then in February 1902, the attorney general announced that, at the president’s request, he was filing suit under the 1890 Sherman Antitrust Act to break up Northern Securities. To the new president, the Northern Securities Company was too big and too powerful, and the lack of competition on the rails meant that the new trust could charge virtually any rates it wanted to haul freight and passengers.
Roosevelt’s actions were not the first time that the Progressive movement led the federal government to take action. In response to the assassination of President Garfield by a disappointed office seeker in 1881, Congress passed the Pendleton Civil Service Reform Act of 1883, which sought to replace political patronage with merit in the selection of government employees. Chester A. Arthur, the vice president who became president when Garfield died, strongly supported the act and lost the backing of the bosses in his own party for doing so. The act created the Civil Service Commission whose job it was to give federal employees a measure of protection from losing their jobs over their political ideas while keeping federal civil servants—not elected officials—from actively fundraising or campaigning. In addition, in response to public pressure about the power of monopolies, Congress had passed the Sherman Antitrust Act in 1890, which its sponsor Senator John Sherman of Ohio said was to outlaw any business practices that would unfairly raise costs for the consumer.
The Pendleton Act, however, covered only about 10% of federal employees when it was passed and none at the state or local level. The Sherman Act had been a virtual dead letter after a series of court cases reduced its scope soon after it was passed. Suddenly, with the Northern Securities suit, a new administration was bringing the Sherman Act back to life and warning of further progressive initiatives to follow.
Soon after the suit was announced, J. P. Morgan visited the White House for a private meeting with the president and the attorney general. Morgan told the president, If we have done anything wrong, send your man to my man and they can fix it up. Roosevelt, who saw things quite differently said, “That can t be done, and Attorney General Philander Chase Knox added, “We don’t want to fix it up, we want to stop it.” Morgan then asked if the government was now going to attack his other interests, especially U.S. Steel, and Roosevelt responded, “Certainly not—unless we find out that in any case they have done something that we regard as wrong. After Morgan left, Roosevelt told Knox he found it quite revealing that Morgan could deal with him only as “a big rival operator,” with whom to make a deal. But there would be no deal.
The Northern Securities case took 2 years to move through the federal courts, but in March 1904, the U.S. Supreme Court affirmed Roosevelt’s interpretation of the Sherman Act. The majority opinion said that “No scheme or device could...more
Sherman Antitrust Act
The first federal antitrust measure, passed in 1890; sought to promote economic competition by prohibiting business combinations in restraint of trade or commerce.
Pendleton Civil Service Reform Act
A law of 1883 that reformed the spoils system by prohibiting government workers from making political contributions and by creating the Civil Service Commission to oversee their appointment on the basis of merit rather than politics.
Chapter 19 Progressive Movements, Progressive Politics 55.
effectively and certainly suppress free competition and ordered the Northern Security trust broken up into competing lines. From then on, Roosevelt would be known as the “trustbuster,” and he liked the title.
Roosevelt kept up the pressure for change. In a series of speeches in the summer of 1902, he told audiences, “The great corporations which we have grown to speak of rather loosely as trusts are the creatures of the State, and the State not only has the right to control them, but it is in duty bound to control them wherever need of such control is shown.” His natural inclination to expand the government’s power to supervise corporations was supported by many in Congress and by muckraking publications like McClure’s, which Roosevelt may have disliked, but which nonetheless provided him with new ammunition with every issue. Roosevelt wanted a new cabinet-level Department of Commerce with investigative authority, a ban on secret deals between railroads and specific companies (of the sort that launched Rockefeller’s oil empire), and additional funds for the Department of Justice to expedite antitrust cases. Ironically, once Roosevelt had won his Northern Securities victory and gained the tools that Congress gave him, he did not pursue many other antitrust cases. The Taft and Wilson administrations would use the new tools more than Roosevelt himself. The president had made his point. As was often the case during his 7 years in office, having done so, he moved on to other issues.
CONSERVATION IN NATURE
As a child, Theodore Roosevelt was a birdwatcher and developed an intense love of nature. Years later, he walked into a cabinet meeting and asked, “Gentlemen, do you know what has happened this morning?” The members of the cabinet waited for important news. Roosevelt told them, “Just now I saw a chestnut-sided warbler—and this is only February!” The birds did not usually appear in Washington on their return from Central America until much later in the spring. While Roosevelt loved nature, watched birds, and as president saved thousands of acres of land from development, he was also an avid hunter who loved to shoot bear, cougar, or just about anything in the wilderness. However on one bear hunt in 1902, Roosevelt refused to shoot a bear that had been captured and tied to a tree so the president could have the honor of the shot. He was happy to kill many other bears on real hunts, but attacking a tied-up bear was unsportsmanlike. His refusal made national news and sparked a new craze, fostered by the Steiff and Ideal toy companies—a new toy known as a Teddy Bear in honor of the president who would not shoot one.
Just before he became vice president, Roosevelt published The Strenuous Life in which he argued that Americans were getting far too little time to replenish their bodies and souls in the great outdoors. But the strenuous life in nature that he advocated was only possible if the wilderness and the wildlife were preserved for future generations to enjoy. Once he became president, Roosevelt combined all of this considerable enthusiasm for nature with his political skill to become perhaps the most conservation-minded of any president.
Although a keenly passionate advocate, Roosevelt was not, however, the first president to care about conservation. Harrison, Cleveland, and McKinley all set aside federal lands for permanent parks, and both Yellowstone and the Grand Canyon were federal reserves before Roosevelt took office. But from Roosevelt’s perspective, too few animals were protected, too little land had been put aside, and too little was being done to protect the environment.
Even though his attack on the trusts got most of the headlines, a short line in TR’s December 1901 message to Congress said, “The preservation of our forests is an imperative business necessity.” People like his friend Gifford Pinchot and members of the Audubon and Sierra clubs cheered. Western senators were furious at an attack on the prime source of wealth in their states. Again, some hoped that it was a mere rhetorical flourish. They soon learned differently. When Roosevelt came to the presidency in 1901, 43 million acres of land were included in U.S. forest reserves. When he left office in 1909, that number had increased more than fourfold to 194 million acres.
34 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Roosevelt also professionalized the protection of nature. He wrote that the “Nation as a whole should earnestly desire and strive to leave to the next generation the National honor unstained and the National resources unexhausted,” and only new conservation efforts would preserve either honor or resources. He appointed a former Rough Rider, David E. Warford, as a federal forest ranger with authority to protect the 4.15 million acres of federal land in Arizona and Colorado. He nominated Gifford Pinchot, who shared the president’s commitment, to be head of the Division of Forestry and, later, head of the U.S. Forest Service in the Department of the Interior and gave him “an absolutely free hand.”
Between 1906 and 1908, Roosevelt used—or misused, as his critics said— authority given to him by the Antiquities Act of 1906 to declare a 295-acre stand of giant redwood trees just north of San Francisco as Muir Woods National Monument; 800,000 acres in Arizona as the Grand Canyon National Monument; and 2,500 acres, later expanded to 26,000 acres, as the Pinnacles National Monument in California. He also set aside the Natural Bridges National Monument in Utah and a dozen other similar monuments, ensuring that the land would never pass into private hands (see Map 19-2).
The president’s continued expansion of the amount of land protected by the federal government provoked resistance in Congress. In early 1907, Senator Charles W. Fulton, a Republican from Oregon, attached an amendment to the Department of Agriculture’s appropriations bill that said that no further forest reserves or expansions of reserves could be created within six western states without an act of Congress. When the bill reached the president, he had 10 days to sign it or risk having no funds to operate the Department of Agriculture. Roosevelt quickly approved a total of 21 new forest reserves in the six states—Medicine Bow Forest in Colorado, Priest River Forest in Idaho and Washington, Toiyabe Forest in Nevada, Blue Mountain in Oregon, and
Hawaii Volcano-1916/191
PACIFIC OCEAN
National parks with date of initial protection and date of current designation
National forests
ATLANTIC
OCEAN
Biscayne 1968/1980
Everglades
1934
MAP 19-2 Major National Parks. While the federal government claimed ownership of much of the land in the West, no president matched Theodore Roosevelt in setting aside large tracts of that land as national parks and forests so it would be preserved for future generations rather than be sold or developed.
r,______A A_____Drnnmrci\/a PnlitirC

Olympic and Rainier forests in Washington. When the paperwork creating these new forests was done, Roosevelt then signed the agriculture bill with Fulton’s amendment, saying that no additional forests would be created.
Roosevelt and African-Americans
One of Roosevelt’s first moves as president was to invite Booker T. Washington, the country’s best known African-American, to the White House for a meeting and then, in October 1901, for dinner with the president and his family. No African-American had ever before eaten a meal as a guest at the White House. Roosevelt was making a very public statement about race relations in the United States. He was also taking a first step toward securing a full term as elected president for himself. Booker T. Washington controlled a block of delegates to the Republican nominating conventions since even though blacks could not vote in the segregated South of Roosevelt’s day, they could and did win election as delegates to national Republican nominating conventions.
Although neither Roosevelt nor Washington discussed the dinner in public, the press made a great deal of the evening. While some reports were positive, papers like the Memphis Scimitar called the dinner “The most damnable outrage which has ever been perpetrated by any citizen of the United States.”
For the rest of his 7 years in the White House, Roosevelt had a decidedly mixed record on African-American concerns. He did not mention black disenfranchisement or lynching in his first presidential message to Congress. However, in his 1906 annual message to Congress, he said, “The members of the white race... should understand that every lynching represents by just so much a loosening of the bands of civilization.” They were important words, though with too little follow-up. In symbolic ways—the White House dinner and speeches on lynching—Roosevelt did more to support African-Americans than several of his predecessors or successors. In comparison to the energy he gave to other issues he considered important, however, his track record was certainly lackluster.
Roosevelt's Continuing Popularity
Roosevelt’s obvious joy at life and enjoyment of the presidency was infectious. People loved having a young and enthusiastic chief executive. A friend once said of Roosevelt that he “wanted to be the bride at every wedding and the corpse at every funeral.”
Roosevelt’s large family brought life and vitality to the previously staid White House. Alice, daughter of his first marriage, was a young adult who flirted with and charmed everyone she met, including Ohio Congressman Nicholas Longworth whom she married in a White House wedding. She would continue to charm Washington society for the next three-quarters of a century. The president and Edith’s younger children, Ted, Kermit, Ethel, Archie, and Quentin played at the White House, chasing rabbits on the White House grounds, marching with the White House police, and riding bicycles on the lawn and occasionally down the stairs.
In 1904, the Republicans easily nominated Roosevelt for a full term. Having lost with Bryan in 1896 and 1900, Democrats were looking for a fresh face and nominated Alton B. Parker, chief justice of the New York Court of Appeals. It was not a close contest. Parker was a colorless candidate, but it is unlikely that any Democrat could have won. Republicans were the country’s major party and Roosevelt’s energy carried the day. He won by a landslide.
After his reelection, Roosevelt’s popularity only grew, and he and everyone knew that he could easily win a third term or, as his daughter Alice kept saying, “a second elected term” if he were a candidate in 1908. Nevertheless, he had promised himself and the country in 1904 that he would not seek a third term, saying as he claimed victory in November 1904, “The wise custom which limits the President to two terms regards the substance and not the form.” As 1908 approached, the president was tempted to break the pledge but did not. Roosevelt’s goal in 1908 was to find a
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
556
candidate who would carry on the policies that he had championed. He thought he had found just the right candidate in Secretary of War, William Howard Taft.
Taft Wins, Taft Loses—The Elections of 1908 and 1912
William Howard Taft, who had served as a federal district court judge in Ohio before becoming governor general of the Philippines and then secretary of war, would have loved an appointment to the Supreme Court, one he finally won in 1921 when Warren Harding appointed him. But in 1908, Roosevelt had picked Taft as the successor most likely to continue his programs, and once Roosevelt had made up his mind, there was little that Taft or anyone else could do to stop him.
Having failed miserably with the conservative Alton Parker in the 1904 election, the Democrats returned to William Jennings Bryan for a third try for the White House. The Socialist Party was also growing in strength and their candidate, Eugene V. Debs, made a respectable showing. But the election was never really in doubt, and Taft won easily on the promise to continue Roosevelt’s progressivism.
TAFT’S ADMINISTRATION, TAFT’S POLICIES
Not surprisingly, given their very different personalities, tensions between the outgoing and the incoming president began even before Taft’s inauguration. Roosevelt expected Taft to keep most of the existing cabinet; Taft wanted some of his own people. Most disappointing to the conservationist Roosevelt, Taft replaced Secretary of the Interior James R. Garfield, an ardent conservationist, with Richard A. Ballinger, a Seattle lawyer and former reform mayor, who was more interested in exploiting public lands than conserving them. Nevertheless, Taft kept Gifford Pinchot on at the U.S. Forest Service, and Roosevelt sailed for Africa soon after the inauguration, confident that the country was in good hands. Taft kept a key Roosevelt-Taft pledge and called Congress into special session in early 1909 to lower the nation’s tariff rates. Ida Tarbell, one of the best known muckraking journalists, insisted that the poor could not afford warm clothing because of the high tariff charged on imported wool, and many economists felt that overly high tariffs were protecting industries that no longer needed protection. Income and inheritance taxes seemed more equitable ways to pay for the government. But not everyone in Congress agreed, especially Rhode Island Senator Nelson Aldrich and House Speaker Joe Cannon.
New York Representative Sereno Payne proposed reducing the tariff rates and substituting an income tax. But when the bill reached the Senate, Aldrich dropped the income tax and revised the tariffs up—significantly. Aldrich acknowledged that the Republican platform had promised to revise the tariff, but he asked, “Where did we ever make the statement that we would revise the tariff downward?” Everyone knew that the downward revision had been the promise, but it was not the outcome. Even most moderate Republicans criticized the Payne-Aldrich tariff, but Taft signed the bill. When Congress later passed bills to lower the tariff on cotton, wool, steel, and iron, Taft vetoed them. In the process, he built an alliance with the conservative Aldrich wing of the party, losing the support of many Roosevelt progressives.
While Roosevelt was in Africa, word came to him in January 1910 that Taft had fired Pinchot. Pinchot wrote to the former president, “We have fallen back down the hill you led us up.” The tariff might be abstract to Roosevelt, but conservation was the issue nearest and dearest to him, and Pinchot was the agent TR had counted on to keep the movement alive in the new administration.
On many fronts, Taft kept his pledge to carry out Roosevelt’s policies, in some cases with more vigor than TR had ever shown. It was Taft, not Roosevelt, who decreed an 8-hour workday for government employees and who advocated the Sixteenth Amendment to the Constitution, passed in 1913, to ensure that federal income taxes could be collected. In addition, Taft was a far tougher trustbuster than Roosevelt, breaking up John D. Rockefeller’s Standard Oil Company and bringing more antitrust suits in his 4 years than Roosevelt did in 7.
Chapter 19 Progressive Movements, Progressive Politics 5
A widely distributed cartoon showed former president Roosevelt's disappointment with his hand-picked, but ensnarled, successor president Taft.
THE UNIQUE ELECTION OF
1912 Roosevelt was not alone in his estrangement from the Taft administration. Critics abounded, and Senator Robert La Follette of Wisconsin was hinting broadly that he might challenge Taft for the Republican presidential nomination in 1912. La Follette was a different kind of progressive from Roosevelt. He advocated a more open nominating process for candidates and an income tax to limit the power of the very rich. He wanted to destroy the monopolies that Roosevelt wanted only to regulate. La Follette was also appalled by concessions to the white South, believing that if African-Americans “had been fairly treated,” then they would have been able to take the places now denied them as farmers and businessmen. As Roosevelt waited, La Follette campaigned for the nomination. Then in February 1912, La Follette gave a speech in Philadelphia in which, either exhausted or drunk, he went on for over 2 hours, repeating himself again and again. He lost not only his audience but also the nomination with that speech. A week later, seven Republican governors asked Roosevelt to run. TR announced, “My hat is in the ring” and wrote, “I will accept the nomination for President if it is tendered to me.” He also set out to be sure that the 1912 nomination was, in fact, so tendered.
Through the spring, Taft and Roosevelt fought it out—Taft always reluctantly, Roosevelt with his usual exuberance. In the South, Taft used the party machinery to control the delegates. Roosevelt defended his challenge saying, “If that be revolution, make the most of it.” Taft responded, “This wrenches my soul... .1 do not want to fight Theodore Roosevelt, but sometimes a man in a corner fights. I am going to fight.”
Taft won in the states where delegates were controlled by caucuses while Roosevelt won nearly all of the states that held primary elections, including Pennsylvania, California, Minnesota, Nebraska, Maryland, South Dakota, and even Taft’s home state of Ohio. After seeing the primary returns, Idaho Senator William E. Borah declared, “There can be but one result, and that is the nomination of Mr. Roosevelt,” and Nebraska’s Senator George Norris happily said, “Taft is out of the race.”
Taft, however, was not out of the race. He still controlled the party machinery. When delegates were contested—and 254 convention seats were contested—the Republican National Committee decided who should vote at the convention. The committee awarded 235 of the contested delegates to Taft and only 19 to Roosevelt, sealing the nomination for Taft.
Two months after the Republican convention, in early August 1912, a new Progressive Party held its convention in the same hall. The 14,000 delegates were mostly middle-class reformers—social workers, teachers, and owners of small businesses.
558 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
It was the first major political convention to include female delegates, and there were
many. Also attending were a few African-American delegates from border states and
New England, none from the Deep South where Taft controlled the party. Few of the
farmers and laborers representing past Populist Party conventions were there. The plat-
form included support for the rights of labor unions, conservation, women’s suffrage,
the 8-hour workday, workplace safety, as well as unemployment and old age insurance.
In a doomed effort to court white Southern votes, the platform was silent on the rights
of African-Americans. By acclamation, the convention nominated Theodore Roosevelt
for president and California Governor Hiram Johnson for vice president. In the first
convention speech by a woman, Jane Addams seconded Roosevelt’s nomination.
Roosevelt, saying that he felt as fit as a Bull Moose,” happily accepted the nomination.
A convention like no other launched a presidential election like no other.
Many Democrats saw the Republican split as the chance for a Democratic
presidency. Champ Clark of Missouri, the speaker of the house, was the frontrunner.
He was popular within the party, but was a dull speaker. Oscar Underwood of Alabama
was more conservative, but perhaps a better speaker than Clark. Others hoped to
be kingmakers. Charles Murphy, the boss of Tammany, controlled the New York
delegation while William Jennings Bryan controlled many other delegates. Finally, the
governor of New Jersey, Woodrow Wilson, campaigned for the nomination.
Wilson had only held elected office for 2 years. He was an expert on constitutional
law with a Ph.D. from Johns Hopkins, who had served as the president of Princeton
University from 1902 to 1910. He had sought to transform Princeton from a country
club for rich boys to a serious academic institution. He battled with faculty, alumni,
and trustees and showed little aptitude for compromise.
In 1910, just as Wilson saw some of his most cherished goals defeated at Princeton,
the political bosses who ran the Democratic Party in New Jersey were looking for
an appealing candidate for governor. They offered Wilson the nomination, and he
surprised even his supporters by being a magnetic candidate, winning easily. Then,
to the surprise of the bosses, Wilson kept his word that he would be independent,
broke with those who had put him in the governor’s office, and refused to follow their
lead in patronage. He governed as a progressive, getting the state to adopt workmen’s
compensation, a commission to regulate public utilities, and more open election laws,
winning great popularity as well as the undying hatred of political bosses. Wilson
entered the Democratic nominating convention as a strong candidate, but not the
leader. While Clark led on the first ballots, Wilson kept gaining; on the 46 ballot,
exhausted delegates gave Wilson their party’s nomination.
With the nominations of Roosevelt, Taft, and Wilson—a former, the current, and
a future president—the 1912 election was unique. In addition, a fourth candidate,
Eugene V. Debs, was once again the candidate of the Socialist Party, and by 1912, the
Socialists were a force to be reckoned with. In local elections the year before, Socialist
candidates had been elected as mayor in 56 cities and towns, and one of the party’s
candidates, Victor Berger, was elected to Congress from Wisconsin. The Socialist
Party, always highly factionalized, enthusiastically nominated Debs as their standard
bearer for a fourth time. Some Socialists worried that Roosevelt’s Progressive Party
would steal their platform, but while the Progressive Party called for governmental
oversight of the monopolies, the Socialists called for government ownership of all
large-scale industries—especially the railroads. Like the Progressives, the Socialist
platform also called for shorter working hours, workers compensation, electoral
reform, and giving women the right to vote. However, unlike the Progressives, it also
called for ensuring blacks the right to vote.
Wilson wrote to a friend that “Roosevelt’s strength is altogether incalculable. Ihe
contest is between him and me, not between Taft and me. He was right. It was dif-
ficult for Wilson, who was running as a progressive Democrat, to differentiate himself
from Roosevelt’s Progressive Party. If the contest was to be one of personal popularity,
no one was more popular than Teddy Roosevelt. Boston attorney Louis D. Brandeis
Chapter 19 Progressive Movements, Progressive Politics
559
New Freedom
5 Woodrow Wilson's 1912 program for govern-| ment intervention in the economy to restore i competition by curtailing the business
_ monopolies, thereby providing opportunities __ fQr jnjjyjjuai achievement.
19.4
suggested a way forward to Wilson. While Roosevelt spoke of the New Nationalism and governmental controls over the monopoly trusts, Brandeis suggested Wilson should speak of a New Freedom that would give people the greatest freedom by simply breaking up the great trusts and fostering competition at every level. Four years later, Brandeis would receive his reward when Wilson appointed him as the first Jew to serve on the U.S. Supreme Court.
In the fall campaign, Wilson called Roosevelt a “self-appointed divinity” who wanted to control the trusts and people’s lives. Wilson, in contrast, wanted freedom from trusts and from government regulation. “Ours is a program of liberty,” he said, “theirs is a program of regulation.” Roosevelt struck back, saying that Wilson’s approach was “simply the laissez-faire doctrine of. ..three-quarters of a century ago.” Taft morosely stayed on the sidelines. Debs went after them all.
While Roosevelt was speaking in Milwaukee, Wisconsin, in October, a would-be assassin shot him at close range. The bullet lodged in Roosevelt s chest but a heavy coat and the text of a long speech that was in the coat pocket prevented a serious injury. Roosevelt, with typical pluck, went ahead with an hour-long speech before allowing himself to be taken to a hospital. His chances of victory improved as stories of his courage spread. In the end, however, the deep division within the Republican ranks, their failure to crack the Democrats’ hold on the “solid South,” and Wilson’s use of Brandeis’s antitrust rhetoric all ensured the outcome. Wilson won the popular vote with over a million votes more than Roosevelt, who defeated Taft by another half-million. Debs came in fourth with just over 900,000 votes (see Map 19-3).
	Electoral Vote (%)	Popular Vote (%)
WOODROW WILSON
435 6,296,547 (Democrat)	(82)	(42)
Theodore Roosevelt		4,118,571
(Progressive)		
William Taft		3,486,720
(Republican)		(23)
Eugene Debs		900,672
(Socialist)		(6)
MAP 19-3 The Election of 1912. This map shows the breadth of Woodrow Wilson's electoral victory after Roosevelt and Taft split the Republican vote and Debs failed to gain traction as the Socialist Party candidate.
Woodrow Wilson's New Freedom
Woodrow Wilson planned four major initiatives for his administration—conservation, access to raw materials, banking and finance, and the tariff and taxes. He announced that he would call the new Democratic-majority Congress into a special session in April 1913, a month after his inauguration and months ahead of when it would normally meet.
While Wilson spoke to the importance of conservation in his inaugural address, and while he did push the creation of the National Park Service, his commitment to conservation did not come close to Roosevelt’s. Wilsonian progressivism focused elsewhere.
Only a month after the inauguration, Wilson broke a custom followed by every president since Jefferson and gave a speech in person to a joint session of Congress. Widely televised presidential addresses to Congress are now such a normal feature of American life that is it easy to forget that no president from Jefferson to Taft ever spoke directly to Congress. Nevertheless, Wilson did, and he continued to do so throughout his two terms in office.
Wilson’s first congressional victory was the passage of the Underwood-Simmons tariff, which the new president signed in October 1913. Cleveland, McKinley, Roosevelt, and Taft all failed to get tariff reductions through Congress, mostly because of the power that lobbyists had with the Senate. But Wilson managed to embarrass several senators with a very public investigation of the role of lobbyists. He also met privately with several Democratic senators to hear their concerns and shore up their support. In the end, Wilson got a new tariff that reduced the tax on goods imported into the United States by at least 10 percent across the board, more on some things. The new law also used the power given in the new Sixteenth Amendment to introduce the first federal income tax since the Civil War, starting at 1 percent on incomes above $4,000 (considerably more than most Americans made in 1913).
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Woodrow Wilson broke a precedent going back to Thomas Jefferson and began the modern practice of presidential speeches to a joint session of Congress.
Wilson then turned to reform of the nation’s banking system. Since Andrew Jackson closed the Bank of the United States in the 1830s, the federal government’s role in the nation’s banking system had been very limited. In the financial panics of 1893 and 1907, J. P. Morgan had acted as the nation’s banker, ensuring that the nation’s credit system stayed intact. While Morgan’s interventions were essential to protect the government and the nation’s largest banks, they did little to help farmers or proprietors of small businesses or to allow the government to control the supply of money, a role that Bryan and his followers had been demanding for a long time.
Working closely with Virginia Senator Carter Glass, Wilson was able to create the Federal Reserve system in a matter of months. Following the advice of Brandeis that “concessions to big business interests must in the end prove futile,” the president spent no time with representatives of business but, instead, built a coalition of the many factions within the Democratic Party and of progressive Republicans. The final bill passed the House 287 to 85, and the Senate, after a desperate last-minute attempt to derail the bill by Frank A. Vanderlip of the National City Bank of New York, passed the bill 54 to 34. Before the end of his first year in office, Wilson and the Congress had created the Federal Reserve that remains the core of the nation’s banking system.
During the presidential campaign, Wilson had differentiated himself from Roosevelt with his claim that he was the real “trustbuster.” In office, he supported his Attorney General James McReynolds in attacking the American Telephone and Telegraph Company, United States Steel, and the New Haven Railroad, all companies in which J. P. Morgan had an interest. Then he went to Congress and asked for more authority. The Clayton Anti-Trust Act, signed in October 1914, outlawed interlocking directorates (under which the same individuals might serve on the boards of directors of supposedly competing companies), and defined unfair trade practices, including the kind of collusion over prices that had allowed John D. Rockefeller to create the
Chapter 19 Progressive Movements, Progressive Politics 561
1
!
19.2
----- Federal Trade Commission
Government agency established in 1914 19 J t0 provjc|e regulatory oversight of business _____activity.
19.4
Standard Oil monopoly. Perhaps most important, the Clayton Act exempted labor unions and farmer cooperatives from the definition of a combination in restraint of trade,” a charge that had been used in federal court cases against unions since Eugene Debs was sent to jail the 1890s. Although the bill did not give unions everything they wanted, Samuel Gompers declared it to be the Magna Carta, of labor union organizing. Separate legislation also strengthened the investigative powers of the Interstate Commerce Commission and created a new Federal Trade Commission with a specific, if somewhat vague, mandate to limit the growth and power of monopolies.
While Wilson delivered quickly on some of his reformist campaign pledges, he deeply disappointed other followers. When the House passed legislation outlawing child labor in February 1915, Wilson did nothing and the bill died in the Senate. Only much later in his presidency did he support effective child labor legislation. He also disappointed farmers, a key Democratic constituency, when he quietly allowed a plan for rural credits to help farmers with mortgages to die in congressional conference committee.
African-Americans were greatly disappointed with Wilson. Booker T. Washington had a long-standing link to the Republican Party, but during the 1912 campaign, younger blacks, including African Episcopal Zion Bishop Alexander Walters and W.E.B. Du Bois, endorsed Wilson. It was a significant departure from the African-American-Republican Party alliance that had existed since Reconstruction. Perhaps, these leaders argued, this Virginia-born and Georgia-reared intellectual could finally break the hold of segregationists on the Democratic Party. During the campaign, Wilson was happy to receive their support, but once in office, Wilson spoke only vaguely of a federal commission to investigate race relations in the United States and allowed his cabinet to set policy that did not support the African-American cause.
Citing what they said was white anger at “racial mingling,” especially in Southern post offices, Post Master General Albert S. Burleson and Secretary of the Treasury William Gibbs McAdoo ordered the segregation of offices, rest rooms, and eating facilities at the Post Office, Treasury Department, and Bureau of Printing and Engraving. Federal employees who had long worked in racially integrated settings were now segregated by race. The Democratic majority in Congress allowed segregationist senators like James K. Vardaman of Mississippi to block black appointments to federal jobs that previous Republican presidents had provided.
The black press attacked Wilson for the segregation policy and the lack of federal appointments. Wilson’s most pointed confrontation about his racial policies was with the African-American editor William Monroe Trotter of Boston. In November of 1913, Trotter met with the president to lay out a long list of specific concerns about segregation in the federal service and the lack of African-Americans being hired in the government. Wilson responded blandly, saying, “Now, mistakes have probably been made, but those mistakes can be corrected.” A year later, Trotter led another delegation to the White House and received another round of bland vagueness. Trotter lost his temper saying, “We are here as full-fledged American citizens” and reminded Wilson of the support he had received from African-Americans. Wilson in turn lost his temper, telling Trotter, “You are an American citizen...but you are the only American citizen that has ever come into this office who has talked to me with [such] a tone.” The president insisted that Trotter be excluded from any future meeting, but there would be few future meetings with African-Americans with or without Trotter.
Wilson’s reputation in the African-American community was further tarnished when in early 1915 he allowed one of the first full-length motion pictures, D. W. Griffith’s Birth of a Nation, to be shown at the White House. The National Association for the Advancement of Colored People was actively protesting the film, which, though a masterpiece of cinematography, was also a glorification of the Ku Klux Kian. Wilson did not endorse the film, but the president also refused to announce his nonendorsement. Later, Wilson signed a letter prepared by his personal secretary saying that “the President was entirely unaware of the character of the play before it was presented and
Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
Part VI Becoming an Industrial World
has at no time expressed his approbation of it.” Nevertheless, the film incident, along with the segregation of the federal work force, seriously undermined Wilson’s reputation among African-Americans.
When Wilson became president, his agenda focused exclusively on domestic policy. In his first year in office, with the Underwood Tariff, the Clayton Anti-Trust Act, as well as the creation of the Federal Reserve System and the Federal Trade Commission, he had extraordinary success. A little more than a year after the inauguration, however, a political assassination in the far off town of Sarajevo, Bosnia, began a chain of events that would change the president’s and the nation’s focus in succeeding years. After 1914, international matters, far more than his domestic agenda, dominated his administration. Indeed, the assassination in the Austrian Empire in June 1914 can be seen as the ending of the progressive era. In the new era, discussed in the next chapter, international matters are central.
Quick Review Which progressive president had the greatest effect on living and working conditions for the American people? Give three reasons to support your answer.
CONCLUSION
Between 1870 and 1900, America’s population almost doubled, from 40 million in 1870 to 75 million in 1900, with immigration responsible, perhaps, for one-third of this growth. As more and more Americans crowded into the nation’s cities, drawn there by jobs in America’s rapidly expanding industrial economy, a new urgency to focus on the challenges of immigration, urbanization, and industrialization took hold. By 1900, a rising cohort of Americans—including intellectuals, social reformers, and political leaders—seemed to recognize that new ideas and new levels of activism would be needed to create a solid foundation for the country’s future.
Muckraking journalists such as Ida Tarbell, Upton Sinclair, and Lincoln Steffens sought to convince other Americans to heed the call to solve a wide range of problems related to the health and well-being of American society. Some reformers attempted to rein in the excesses of industrialists and the financial markets; others focused their attentions on the urban poor, the nation’s education system, preservation of the natural world, electoral reforms, decent wages for the laboring classes, industrial safety and sanitation, or—in one of the strongest movements—ending the use of alcohol by Americans.
Beginning at the city and state level, progressive reformers sought elected office and sought to use their offices to implement many progressive reforms in the conduct of elections and in the protection of individuals through such things as pure food and drug laws. Theodore Roosevelt, who gained the presidency after the assassination of William McKinley in 1901, successfully brought progressivism to the White House. He expanded the powers of the presidency to control the power of giant corporations, protect the nation’s natural resources, and bring a new vitality to electoral politics. The two presidents who followed him, William Howard Taft and Woodrow Wilson, shared some of Roosevelt s reformist tendencies and furthered the goals of progressivism, changing, in particular, the relationship between business and government in the decades leading up to World War I.
CHAPTER
REVIEW
How progressive was the "Progressive Era"? Include the work of individuals, government policy, and philosophy in your answer.
Chapter 19 Progressive Movements, Progressive Politics
Chapter 19 Chapter Review
19.1
THE REVOLT OF THE INTELLECTUALS__________________________
Explain the role of muckraking journalists and intellectuals in shaping a progressive agenda.
Review Questions
1.	Comparison
Compare and contrast the ideas of John Dewey and William Graham Sumner. What assumptions about social and economic inequality underlay each author’s position?
2.	Constructing an Argument
How would you explain the popularity of muckraking journalism in the late 1800s?
THE TRANSFORMATION OF THE CITIES
Analyze the changes in urban life that inspired progressive reforms and the impact of those reforms on cities.
Review Questions
3.	Contextualization
Why did many poor and immigrant residents of American cities support political machines? How might such machines have looked from their point of view?
4.	Synthesis
What ideas and objectives underlay progressive reform?
5.	Historical Interpretation
In what ways was Jane Addams’s Hull House typical of the Progressive movement? It what ways did it depart from other progressive initiatives?
19.2
193
RELIGIOUS RESPONSES TO THE GILDED AGE____________________
Explain the main currents of religiously based reform movements during the progressive era.
Review Questions
6.	Historical Interpretation
What light does the rise to prominence of the Woman’s Christian Temperance Union shed on the relationship between social reform and religious revival in the late 1800s?
7.	Comparison
Compare and contrast the strategies and motives of Frances Willard and Carry Nation. How did each contribute to the gains made by the temperance movement?
PROGRESSIVE POLITICS ON THE NATIONAL STAGE_______________
Analyze the three "progressive presidents" and their administrations.
Review Questions
8.	Comparison
Compare and contrast the policies of Roosevelt, Taft, and Wilson. What aspects of the progressive agenda did each emphasize?
9.	Historical Interpretation
How did the progressive presidents discussed in this section change the place of the presidential role in American politics?
10.	Historical Interpretation
How did Roosevelt and Wilson respond to the concerns of African-Americans? What light do their actions shed on the issues of race in politics of the late 1800s?
19.4
564 Part VI Becoming an Industrial World Power—Costs, Benefits, and Responses 1865-1914
War,
Prosperity,
and
Depression
1890-1945
